title,selftext,subreddit
Reminder: please only post selfies/pictures of yourself in the Wednesday and Saturday mega threads,Lately there's been quite a few selfies/self pictures being posted outside of the Saturday and Wednesday mega threads. Please only post your selfies/self pictures to those threads. We will remove all selfies/self pictures outside of these threads. Thanks!,actuallesbians
Sunday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
😍😍 im gay,,actuallesbians
Me as a girlfriend,,actuallesbians
I can feel it in me bones,,actuallesbians
I know these are advertised at best friends but all I could think about is how cute it would be to wear with a girlfriend,,actuallesbians
If you’re from the west and just saw India decriminalize lgbt sex,,actuallesbians
Girl: *does literally anything*,,actuallesbians
Kittens will also do the trick.,,actuallesbians
Yup... I should have caught that.,,actuallesbians
Lmaooo I made this,,actuallesbians
Is this you too?,"Is it just me? Or do some of you out there also have this dilemma? 

When I see or meet lesbians in public...

In my head: *Secretly hoping that some mystical force will link our gaydars towards each other, and rainbows will just explode around us.*

Reality: *Suddenly acting like a self conscious awkward potato, that blushes up to the tip of my ear if I'm caught staring.* 😑",actuallesbians
yassss,,actuallesbians
Why tho,,actuallesbians
"Holy Mary Mother of God, Eva Green",,actuallesbians
Hmmmmm.,,actuallesbians
never stop running your hand through your hair,"nothing knackers my banger on a barbie more than when a fine-ass-beautiful-knock-your-socks-off kinda woman runs her hand through her hair. gives me all the feels. or when she tilts her head and pulls all of her hair to one side so her neck. is. just. there. 

just never stop, never stop. that's all, sorry for wasting your time.",actuallesbians
Holy shit you guys...,"Apparently there's a TV show called All Girls Garage. If pretty girls in ponytails using lug wrenches is your turn on, this is a game changer.",actuallesbians
"I feel called out (minor OITNB s6 spoilers, maybe?)",,actuallesbians
When the girl you like is sending you mixed messages,,actuallesbians
Just a silly little thing I realized,"I recently realized something. Growing up I always wished for ""pretty"" eyes. My eyes are dark dark brown, I always wished for blue or green eyes. I was always so jealous of girls with these eye colors. I felt plain and boring, especially with my brown hair.

Well after years of struggling with my sexuality and finally (kinda) figuring it out, I've noticed almost all of the women I've been attracted to have dark brown eyes and brown hair. Just found it kinda funny, I'm not out enough to share that thought with anyone besides strangers, so enjoy lol.",actuallesbians
There goes my Hero🙃,,actuallesbians
Wishing I had someone to watch the sunrise with.,,actuallesbians
"""Adventure Time"": just Gal Pals liking each other a lot!",,actuallesbians
"Ladies of the subreddit, I present...",,actuallesbians
"Recorded before I was born, but Joan Jett is the hottest woman I've ever seen",,actuallesbians
Look at these little potatoes 😻💜,,actuallesbians
I think Aubrey Plaza just made me gayer.,,actuallesbians
All I want is pizza and a cute girl dancing next to me tbh.,,actuallesbians
Love all you wholesome women,"Ok, is anyone gonna talk about how cute and wholesome this sub is? 

All these chill women helping each other out and sharing what makes them thirsty makes my heart melt.

That's all, just wanted to share because you all really make my days brighter.",actuallesbians
I was wondering...,"Do boys/men gush about (their) girls like lesbians gush about girls?

It’s like we love other girls in such a more genuine way???? ",actuallesbians
butch_irl,,actuallesbians
This is my very bestest friend ❤️✨,,actuallesbians
Realized I was the other woman,"I’m not sure what to make of this situation, considering the incident took place a year ago but...

Last year, I went to a party and hooked up with a girl. I didn’t know her well at all but we had a few mutual friends and I clearly thought she was cute. We didn’t actually have sex the first night because her roommate walked in and I bolted. Like a true rom com, I somehow left one of my earrings and she was so gracious to return it to me the next day or so. I wasn’t expecting sex, but one thing led to another and yeah. Two days later she had a girlfriend... or so I thought. She’s been with her girlfriend the entire time since then and still continues to contact me nearly every day. Let me reiterate that I didn’t know her at all before hooking up, and the sex was exactly what you’d expect from two college students who don’t know each other. 

I’m like a nonconfrontational person, so I stay pretty cordial with her. Refuse to flirt because I’m not interested and she’s in a relationship. Honestly, I’m pretty cold even though she’s expressed her interest in friendship. But I stay cordial because we have a lot of mutual friends.

Fast forward to this weekend where we’re all hanging out and someone asks her how long she’s been with her girlfriend... her response? A year and a half.

Excuse me... what? 

We hooked up a year ago. She said she was single. I took her for her word because why wouldn’t I? Was it suspicious that she was in a relationship suddenly two days later? Yes... but in the moment she was supposed to be single.

So now I’m working through a lot of emotions. I had a dream that offered me some clarity but it keeps bugging me for some reason. I don’t know. I would never consent to being the “other woman,” so being that unbeknownst to myself makes me feel... well, gross. ",actuallesbians
Proof that just a woman's voice can make my clothes fall off (HAIM),,actuallesbians
I'm a disaster,,actuallesbians
why are all the cute girls straight,,actuallesbians
I feel a little guilty,"I’m not out to my folks yet, or any of my family really.

I’ve been going on dates with this girl and it’s going really well. She knows I’m not out to my family and is OK with it, so that’s a bit easier.

I am not necessarily lying to my family when I say I’m going to hang out with my friend, but I can tell they’re starting to get suspicious. I feel like it’s going to come out eventually and it probably won’t go well. 

I know I’m not the only person out there going through this, but does anyone have any advice? ",actuallesbians
oh baby do you know what that’s worth? found this gem at an antique market in the cemetery!,,actuallesbians
Being closeted and around homophobes 24/7 is taking a toll on me mentally. I need help.,"My parents are major bible thumpers. They would rather me be a murderer than a lesbian. You may see this statement as a hyperbole, but I say it with almost 99.9% accuracy. 

Everyone I’m around and know (except for maybe 2-3) is homophobic to the extreme. It’s like loving the same sex is the worst thing they can imagine a person being. Who cares if I love girls but I donate all of my earnings to charity, I’m still a piece of shit. 

I’m so tired of having to listen to this abuse and nobody knows. Nobody knows how deep it cuts and how much it takes a toll on me. Nobody knows that I spend everyday in fear of someone outing me. 

It’s caused me more emotional damage than I’m willing to admit. 

If I wasn’t a dependent minor I would get the hell out of here. ",actuallesbians
"Saw this question on /r/askwomen yesterday, but the comment section was a dickfest, so I'm asking here: what turns you on the most during making out?",,actuallesbians
One thing a girl does that makes you weak at the knees,putting their chin on their hand and giggling. ,actuallesbians
Dreams suck,Anybody else dream about their ex and then suddenly their ex is on their mind all day? I really thought I was over this girl and moved on and then I had a dream about her and now I’m all sorts of fucked up. Thanks gals ,actuallesbians
My girlfriend posted this in a group chat and it reminded me of a majority of people in here.,,actuallesbians
I’m just gonna leave this here...,,actuallesbians
When you’re in a romantic mood,But don’t have a girlfriend so you just cuddle with your dog ,actuallesbians
[F21] Fantasies having lesbian sex with mature women in 40s,"Girl grew up in a traditional family. Only one boyfriend since 16, though he is also conservative in sex and would love some more spicy things, we love each other. Healthy sex and keep having orgasms with him. Believe we love each other.

However, months ago started having a special fantasy. Drives me crazy just to think I could be kissed, licked and fingered by one or more mature experienced women in their 40s. Anywhere. Executives, teachers, doctors... Hot mature. No men involved. Do not consider myself lesbian, but it really turns me on and keep masturbating myself thinking about it. 

Never had mother relationship issue. Healthy childhood. But sexual intense, spent hours per day masturbating and watching porn. Lately mature women with younger girls videos.

Any girl of my age range with similar fantasies here?  Or any mature women having relations with young girls?  
Both scenarios would be excellent to share thoughts and ask questions.

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
When you can’t find a girlfriend and think “I’ll just date my damn self”,,actuallesbians
Please help a baby gay here.,"So I'm new to this whole dating thing and I recently matched with this girl on Her. So far we've been talking for a few weeks and I met her recently for dinner. She's really cute and smart and what amazes me is that I can be really lame and stupid with her. However, things have mellowed down over the weekend, not too sure why. We still text occasionally but I'm panicking over what to text her about because I don't want to seem needy but I also want to show my interest in her. I'm thinking of asking her out for another meal but I don't know how to approach it. 

&amp;#x200B;

Please help me get a girlfriend!",actuallesbians
What counts as sex?,"My girlfriend and I were discussing when we would actually ""lose our virginities"" and I was wondering what y'all think. Like is there a specific thing which counts as the equivalent of hetero sex? ",actuallesbians
Any football fans?!?,"With football season officially started, who’s your team?!?",actuallesbians
Gave my gf a tantric massage this morning.,And holy shit was it worth the dozens of articles and video tutorials I went through for weeks. I highly recommend giving/getting one ;),actuallesbians
Unintended subtext or directed advertising?,,actuallesbians
This is exactly why I don’t support men being on dykesgonewild 🤗,,actuallesbians
I had a date on thursday...,"We have lots of things in common but was kinda worried before the date - that feeling ""is she gonna like me/find me attractive??""

When I saw her, oh my! I just thought ""holly shit, how pretty she is 😨""

She was wearing jeans, sports sneakers and a jacket. Many people would find it pretty normal/common, but there is something is this basic style that really gets me. I don't care about fashion clothes or make up, the more natural she looks, the prettier. She got me right there.

We had a great dinner together in a bar, nice music as well. We had fun.

I knew she was having fun as well but wasn't sure if she liked me as more than a friend. Then she invited me for a walk and took me to a street where LGBT people use to party. Then she held me close and kissed me.

Omg. What a kiss, all I can think of is that fucking kiss.. 

We stayed there kissing and telling each other funny stories about us, it was a great evening but unfortunately it lasted only 2 hours because the subway was going to close..

Then she messaged me saying she loved it, but wanted more... and on the next day she said she was missing my delicious lips..

Is it possible to miss someone after only 2 days? And have nothing else going on in your mind, except her face, her beautiful smile and the way she kissed you? And hope the week goes fast so you can see her again..

How screwed am I? 🙈",actuallesbians
"Found on r/shittylifeprotips and I just, ungf the woman 😍😍",,actuallesbians
long distance sucks and i don’t know how you all do it,i’m so fucking in love with a girl who’s the most incredible person i’ve ever met and i only get to see her once a month which is honestly so unfair. i promised myself to not get into a LDR ever again and i’m at a point where i’m so in love with her i can’t see myself with anyone else. i hate this. i don’t even wanna tell her i love her cause i don’t want us to both get lost in the sauce and all. i don’t know what to do with myself ,actuallesbians
"Not sure if someone cross posted this already, but enjoy anyway 😙",,actuallesbians
Advice on (what feels like) unrequited love *Juicy*,"It's 2014 and we're madly in love.  It was the kind of bliss I can't let go of, even after all this time. 

(we've been apart since shortly after (2015) and she has since been sober 2 yrs, which was a large reason we broke up) 

I recently ended a two year relationship (with another person) that was empty and sad. The first thing I did (not literally but in terms of moving on) was reach out to my ex, who I thought about every day. She told me she was hoping I'd call her someday, and that we could be connected again. Fast forward a few months, and one cross country trip: she's still *emotionally* involved her most recent EX.... it's a guy, she says she feels obligated to care for him as he experiences some severe mental illness &amp; has threatened suicide. She says she loves me and wants to be with me, but we can't get a clear intention on what the timeline is of her letting him go and us officially getting back together. 

Some days I feel like on an episode of the bachelorette, others I feel that with patience things will be alright. 

I'm trying to practice patience, understanding, and love with her, but I just want to know: 
Is this plausible? am i delusional in thinking that it's possible for us to heal and move forward?  

Details: 
She and I both have some issues with communicating and often let things go unsaid, I NEED words of affirmation and her love language is very different (physical touch). 

Should I trust that our love is strong enough to transcend this hard time, or am I settling for less than what I deserve? I read a poem that said you never have to wait for someone to meet you on the ""bridge""... but is it really that black and white?  

Thank you for your kindness and any insight, storytelling, or advice you're willing to share. XO. ",actuallesbians
"I just rewatched Love, Simon","The scene that gets me (and probably every other closeted person) is the one where his mom tells him he can exhale. 

I feel so tense all the time. Just really unsure of who I really am. And I know it all sounds so cliche, but I just feel stuck and lost and like I may never find my way out of the labyrinth. I know it is probably easier to admit to myself and the people around me what is going on. Most of my friends know, although my new friends don't. And my parents definitely don't...I just don't want to be alienated and feel like an outsider in my family. I want to be able to be confident about who I want to love.",actuallesbians
Dating apps?,"I’m ready to get back into dating, but I’m having a hard time finding a good dating app. I’m on HER and Zoe but so far no luck. It’s like there aren’t any ladies in my area. Idk maybe it’s just me ?",actuallesbians
First encounter question,"I’m embarking on my first lesbian encounter in a few days. She says wants to use her strap on  on me. I’m not necessarily into it because this whole exploration for me is about getting away from straight sex and having a more intimate, nurturing experience.  I feel like she feels like I need penetration to be pleased and wants to show off her prowess. Should I mention that I’m not that into it, or just let her do it and see how it goes?  ",actuallesbians
"Unexpected bit of representation in Star Trek Online (even has a female voice actor for the lines, so it's not an accident)",,actuallesbians
I just came out to my mom and I’m sobbing tears of joy,,actuallesbians
My Girlfriend and I are Moving In Today,"It's been 2 months since I've met this wonderful girl on Her and it's been so amazing. 

Today though, we're moving and she's wearing a dress and heels. We carried a couch up 4 flights of stairs and she did it in heels!! I couldn't be more in love.",actuallesbians
Feeling grateful&lt;3,Today was a very special day for me because I sold my 600th card in my little LGBTQ greeting card store! It started as just a fun/creative way for me to express myself but has turned into a meaningful part of my life. I didn't know it would connect me to such a great supportive community&lt;3 Feeling grateful :),actuallesbians
"Don't know how many Great British Bake Off fans there are here, but Ruby, from S2, just married her girlfriend!",,actuallesbians
How on earth do I meet women I can date?,"A little about me. Late 20s, school/career focused, pansexual lady who would really love to date a woman, but has yet to have any luck. I haven't dated much in general honestly (regardless of gender) and I'm finding it difficult to meet any single ladies despite living near a large city (Houston). I've tried different apps and sites. I honestly don't even care if it's someone long distance as long as they would meet up as well. I just want to create a loving relationship with a wonderful human being, and I'd love for that person to be of the female variety. 

Does anyone have any tips or advice, or should I just adopt three more cats and give up? ",actuallesbians
Actual footage of me in the bar foiling male attempts at flirtation,,actuallesbians
Spotted our official flower out in the wild 🇩🇴,,actuallesbians
TIL: The girl I have a crush on has a bf...,"Why? Is this a curse? Why do I always fall for straight girls or unavailable girls? 

After months of small talks and randomly ran into each other, the girl with the most beautiful smile I’ve ever seen - she has a bf. My gaydar binged the hell out it for her - short nails, piercings, noticing the new small accessories I had every time, always initiated those small talks with me...

Girl, you are so beautiful! And your smile! Gosh! It really lights up the vibe and everyone around you! And you have a great personality! You’re are so friendly and nice and considerate to other people. You really make my day every time we run into each other.

I bet you are a keeper. I hope life treats you well, so I can always see your beautiful smiles!

END RANT. *climbing back into my closet*",actuallesbians
If I have only ever felt sexually attracted to strangers who were women am I gay?, I have only ever felt *sexually* attracted to strangers I saw randomly walking around who were women. Never men. But I don’t think I’m gay at all idk help,actuallesbians
Disobedience,"Disobedience is available on Amazon Prime! I’ve heard great things about this film and that it was nominated and/or won awards? It’s currently on my watch list. Unfortunately, I cannot watch it at the moment as my friend is tripping balls on shrooms for the first time and I have to babysit him for probably 8 hours. Grrr. No, I’m not shrooms in case y’all were wondering.

What are your thoughts on the film? Any likes or dislikes about it? ",actuallesbians
"If she weren't disgusting, she would be too perfect, I suppose. Question in the comments if my kitty-loving people can help?",,actuallesbians
Were you ever outed before you were ready?,"- either based on how you dress
- not having boyfriends
- talking about girls
- any other?",actuallesbians
What. The actual eff.,"THAT is how the L Word ends??!????

Okay, I’m aware I’m 10 years behind in pop culture, but in my defense I watch very little TV.  And now I’m reminded why I don’t watch TV. I seriously thought I had another 3 seasons of tacky lesbian soap opera to occasionally binge. But no. God, that was worse than the 4th season of The O.C. 

Damn, I’m disappointed. 

",actuallesbians
Not incorrect,,actuallesbians
Self portrait Saturday 🌸✨,,actuallesbians
Isn’t this a second date?,,actuallesbians
Closeted ladies 25+ how do you answer when questioned why you have never had a boyfriend?,,actuallesbians
Need advice about my wife (both of us 26/f),"Two days ago my wife texted to ask if it was okay to go out to drinks with coworkers after her shift, she said she probably wouldn't go because she still had a lot of work to do and if she did go she probably wouldn't stay long. I had a migraine and wanted to spend time with her (the two nights previous to this she had to work until midnight at her second job so we hadn't seen each other since sunday) but I dont like to tell her what to do so I said it was fine. I got off work at 4:30, she got off work at 6:30. I spent the evening laying on the couch, miserable. 

I texted her at around 7 asking if she'd be home soon, she said probably. I texted her right after saying that I was sad she wasn't home and I didn't feel good still and I wished she would come home because I missed her, all she said back was ""I'm sorry baby"" I sent her the eye roll emoji and told her to stay out if she wanted and I was going to go to bed soon anyway. 

I went to bed at 9 and woke up at 2 am and she still wasn't home. 2 is last call in our area, so i figured she was still out and was just going to have a bad day tomorrow as she worked at 6 am. 

I fell back asleep and woke up at 4, she still wasn't home. Usually if she's out and has too much to drink she'll get an uber home and then pick her car up the next day. I tried calling her twice to see where she was but her phone was saying the number wasn't in service for some reason. 

I woke up at 6 for work (going into work on my day off with a migraine after my wife never came home, fun!) and I had three texts from her.

-I'm sorry. I stayed at someone's house so I wouldn't drive

-And I'm late to work

-I'm a piece of shit

So already I was pissed because she never came home, never told me where she was going, and left me home alone after knowing I was sick. I sent her a long text telling her all this. she said I'm so sorry. I said whose house did you stay at? She said a girl from work, Linda. I said did you sleep on the couch? She didn't answer. I didn't really suspect she would cheat, I honestly was just trying to guilt trip her and show her that anything could've happened and I wouldn't know because she wasn't telling me where she was, not healthy I know, but I should lay out all the facts here. 

At two I started to feel bad about everything so I texted Hows work? No answer. 

At 4:45 I asked again and she said just finished. I said how was it? she said pretty awful. I figured it was from being hungover and late. 

Something about my wife is she doesn't stop drinking when she starts until she runs out of beer or someone drags her away. When she's sober she is the sweetest person in the world, always telling me how much she loves me and loves our life. We bought a house together in march and quickly after adopted a dog. She's funny and a hard worker, plus super laid back. If she gets home before me she will start making dinner (something I struggle with). But she's a mean drunk. I refuse to go out to drinks with her anymore because the last three times we did she made everyone uncomfortable when I wanted to go, either ignoring me and going to the bar for another beer, or passive aggressively making comments about how she wishes she could stay but I'm making her go. I went to a friends house for a bbq two months ago when another friend was in from a few states away and my wife made a big scene when I jokingly offered to give our dog away. 

When I got home from work yesterday my wife was sitting in the living room. I asked her why her day was awful and she said ""I need to tell you something."" 

I asked her what but she wouldn't say. I asked her if it had something to do with Linda and she nodded. I asked her if she cheated on me and she nodded. I asked her what she did and she said she didn't want to say. I asked her if they had sex and she said yes. 

We sent the rest of the night crying and trying to figure out what we would do. We own a house together. We are legally married but were planning on having a party in october and we just sent out invites to that this week. We've only been married a month. This is so shitty. 

I don't want to leave her, but I don't really feel comfortable being with her. I still love her so much. I asked her why she did it, why not leave after one drink like she was planning to, why not take an uber home instead of going to some lady's house, why not sleep on the couch? She says she doesn't remember what led up to it. I asked if she remembered it happening, she said yes, so I asked why she didn't stop it all then? I can't remember what she said, but she told me she had a drinking problem. I asked her if she didn't know why she did it, whats to stop it from happening again? She said this is.

She said I was the best thing that ever happened to her, and she loves our life together and doesn't want to lose me. But then she said she would be willing to do whatever I want to do. I asked her what she wanted to do, she said whatever I wanted to do. 

I don't know what to do. She didn't keep it a secret, which is good I guess... But it still happened. I could drink all the liquor in the world and I would never ever ever do this to her. I wish things could just go back to how they were before. Now I just feel awkward around her. She's mopping around. Everything is different. What should I do?

tldr; wife cheated on me one month  into our marriage, says it was a drunk mistake and it will never happen again, says she wants to handle it however I want to",actuallesbians
Does anybody else feel weird when straight girls change in front of you?,"Or is it just me? I don't like it when my straight girl friends change in front of me because my train of thought is that they wouldn't change in front of a straight guy. But the other part of me thinks well no, it's not like you're lusting after them. So I'm pretty conflicted about the whole situation. Anybody else? ",actuallesbians
Ring the gay alarm. 🔥🔥🔥🔥,,actuallesbians
My gf’s parents demanded her to get married...to a man.,"I’m from a conservative country where gay marriage is not only illegal but I can even be jailed for being gay.

I’m actually pretty close to her family and they seem to accept us for the past 8 years. Then all of a sudden,her mom told her that she thought us being together was only for a few years, but now since it has gone for too long that we even bought a house together, it was time for her to say something. She doesn’t mind if my gf still wanna be with me but as long as she gets married to a man. My gf responded that she can never go against her family. I think she’s seriously considering it.


I don’t know how to react to this. This is the girl that I wish to spend the rest of my life with, to grow old with. But I know if she were to choose between me and her family, her family always comes first.


I never would have thought that there’s an expiry date on this relationship.",actuallesbians
To the 6’ tall honey w hella tattoos who smirked at me last night,And then I stared up at you and I think made a dumb noise and you smirked even more: Seriously how do you exist? You stood up so straight. Please help??? I wanted your number but instead I just stared. Sorry 🤷🏼‍♀️,actuallesbians
Question about my girlfriend,"Hey there raptors. I'm using a throwaway since my girlfriend knows my reddit handle.

Anyway, my girl and I are going out for almost a year now. We're both in our 30s and we both have stable jobs. The thing is, I'm her first girlfriend. She had boyfriends in the past and that's about it.

You see, I'm very open to my family and friends about my sexuality. My family knows her well and they adore her which is really nice.

However, her family does not have a single clue about her being gay. I've never met anyone from her family, nor she plans to introduce me to her clan in the future. I live in the shadows and that hurts me a lot.

I am a very affectionate person and I have this habit of stealing kisses on the cheeks or forehead when I'm in public. But the tragedy is that I can't do it with her. She gets upset and scowls at me.

She's sweet when we're in private but it ends the moment we get out of the room.

Please help. I love her dearly, but it kills me slowly.",actuallesbians
Crushing on coworkers is a curse.,"Option 1: I don't tell her how I feel. I end up unhappy ever after.

Option 2: I tell her how I feel. She replies that she's straight. Then she proceeds to report me to HR for harassment.

How do you people get over co-workers?! It's like, I'm fucking trying, and then we run into each other in the hallway and exchange a glance that lasts one millisecond longer than it should and BAM back to square one.

I wish I could find out if she's straight without being creepy so I can end this freaking curse.",actuallesbians
Are switches really that rare?!,"So myself as well as my lady are both switches. I was talking with a lesbian coworker recently and she commented how ""rare"" that is. I was puzzled by it and she went on to say she doesn't think she's known many switches. Never a couple who both are. So-is it really that rare?! Where my girls at?! ",actuallesbians
Wholesome gf activities,,actuallesbians
I got a suit and no ones been as excited as I have been about finding one that fits almost perfectly off the rack,,actuallesbians
If this ain’t the truth.,,actuallesbians
Got this shirt in the men's section of target!! Why men's section?!,,actuallesbians
Positively spinning,"At 29 I finally have the ability to be gay and publicly out and start again. 
It’s given me an opportunity to be the person I actually am instead of hiding myself away. 
My issue is that every single lesbian I’ve met wants more than a friendship and I’m really struggling with this. I’m left with a situation where I need to rebuild my positive surroundings but all everyone wants to do is date and I’m just not looking for that right now. Once I tell them this they aren’t interested anymore. 
The friends I retained after being outed are really supportive and amazing people who are all straight and trying their hardest to understand but don’t. 
Any advice? Because man I could use it. ",actuallesbians
Triple Dare: Post the first name of your current crush/love interest.,,actuallesbians
told my coworker i cut my nails and this was her response.. help my dumb lesbian self decode this please,,actuallesbians
who was/is your strangest public figure/celebrity crush?,Mine was Supernanny. I watched her show as a child and remembered liking her but can't rlly explain why haha,actuallesbians
My friend introduced me to one of her friends that thought I was cute. we talked for awhile and then all of a sudden it just felt like a chore talking to her and that I’m not attracted to her at all. I’m afraid if I don’t go forward with this relationship or what ever it is I’ll be single forever.,,actuallesbians
Somebody please tell me Sophie from GBBS is gay,"I'm only two episodes into the new season so if she gets eliminated next week I'm gonna be mad as hell.  So, while I appreciate that we've got representation in a married gay contestant this time round (Yan), the girl who really catches my attention is Sophie.  Her army background and kickboxing stunt woman deal really do it for me.  Please somebody just look her up for me and tell me if she's gay because I know if I search her name it'll spoil me on what week she gets eliminated.",actuallesbians
Super happy with my gf! (Update!),"Check out the other 2 posts I made about the little piece of perfection that is my girlfriend first for context!

Hi everyone! I mentioned that I would update you on how things went with her. I forgot a little, but here it is!

First off I that want to say that I am as happy as I think it's possible for a human. Things are going smoothly and beautifully. We've come very close now that we have spent more time together. We talk about anything for hours and we just click so well. One day we even spent 3 hours talking on the phone about aliens and how the universe might end! 

School started last week and we only have 1 class together every 2 days. But that's okay, it's really hard for me to focus on history with her over there lmao.  We spend the morning together in the library before class starts and it's so beautiful. We sit in a table where we are kinda hidden so we can secretly kiss! It's so cute I don't know how I can handle it. The best part is that now her parents let her come to my house more often, with the excuse of doing ""homework"" ;) Well ww actually do homework sometimes, but we mostly cuddle and eat tons of food lmao, nothing beyond that point (for now hehe). 

Well that's all I'm gonna say for now because I think I've revealed more details than I should have lol. Also I know this is so childish, but I am fucking loving it 😊.
",actuallesbians
How many of y'all own a reptile?,Is it a lesbian thing to have a scaley? Send pics of your babies &lt;3,actuallesbians
Heading to Pride Today,"And when my partner came into the bathroom while I was getting ready and she's wearing jeans and plaid and my little gay heart just beat like crazy. God, I love being a lesbian.",actuallesbians
Mixed signals,"So, I got a new coworker almost 2 months ago and we've recently been a bit more flirtatious than normal. When she first started we exchanged the lesbian smirk &amp; chit chatted about work things. I think she's the most cutest thing in the world &amp; I am genuinely attracted to her. Now, we don't work exclusively together, but I've noticed that we do both go out of our own way to walk into each other, she asked my best friend if I was single (I am), but here's the dilemma, I recently found out she has a girlfriend of 3 1/2 years. So I'm a bit confused on if she is actually interested or maybe I'm reading too much into it???",actuallesbians
Lol can y'all tell who I have a crush on?,,actuallesbians
"[Rant] Ugh, should I just give up?","I recently met an amazing woman on Her after being screwed around by my ex-girlfriend. We voice/video verified and she only lives 20 minutes from me, perfect right? Wrong!

Our first date was suppose to be on August 29th, but she got called into work last minute to cover someone else's shift at the restaurant where she works as a chef. I understood, and we agreed to meet for a quick lunch the next day, but it got cut short because the lunch line was long and I had to get back to work myself. We did meet in person but it was just long enough to order lunch, and she's even more breathtakingly beautiful than in her pictures.

Since then, we've been texting like crazy, but we haven't been able to meet up again due to conflicting work schedules, and now to top it all off I've been told by the record label that I'm associated with (I'm an audio engineer who has a lot of clients that come from a certain major label) that I need to head to Europe starting next week until November to produce an album with a singer who I've worked with before. I really don't want to go, because A) I really want to try to start something with the woman, and B) The singer is a perfectionist, very controlling and demanding. It's not unusual for me to work 12-18 hour days, 6 days a week with her, even going as far to sleep in the studio and not shower/change my clothes for up to five days. The only good thing is that she pays a premium for my services and she listens to the direction I want to go with the album.

This sucks, but do any of you Raptors have any suggestions on what to do?",actuallesbians
"new favorite grungy band, new hot lesbian crush","hello Slothrust! I'm obsessed with the lower reaches of Leah's voice ugghhhh

[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rewp0va-UGo](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Rewp0va-UGo)

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
It’s hard to talk to girls when you’re autistic,God I’m just so fucking lonely. I’m shy and I’m on the spectrum and I’ve been single for over 2 years (only had 1 relationship and it destroyed a large part of my self esteem bc my ex is only attracted to guys so I still feel like I had a whole year wasted and was used). I want to meet girls but I hate going to loud an noisy places and I’m still underage so no bars. I’ve had tinder for over a year and I’ve had a ton of matches but the few conversations I have have always fizzled out. I’m in college rn and seeing everyone having a good time hurts sometimes. The few friends I have never seem to want anything to do with me. I’m so fucking alone. I look and act like a child so I don’t blame anyone for not being interested it just really hurts when I think about how different I am. Sometimes I just want to curl up into a ball and not leave my bed for days. I just want to hold someone’s hand sometimes idk. This is really disorganized I’m sorry ,actuallesbians
How do you pronounce wlw?,,actuallesbians
Guys are trying to lie about their identities to get into my pants… help please?,"So, I have a policy with dating where I don’t care what genitals someone has, I only go by their gender.

Like if a trans woman approached me, I’d be down regardless of what genitals she had; but if a trans man approached me, I’d have to turn them down regardless of what genitals they have.

Unfortunately, guys have not taken kindly to this, and now they’re lying and pressuring me into doing it with them. I now have guys saying to me “well, I identify as trans mtf”, when they very clearly don’t, and they’re just tying to bone me. Keep in mind that I’m not denying them if they are actually trans, I know these people, I’ve known them for years, and they’ve never mentioned it outside of with me.

This is really starting to get under my skin and is making me less willing to trust people. I don’t wanna be transphobic, but at the same time, I absolutely do not wanna fuck cis/trans men pretending to be something they’re not.

It’s a really hard conundrum, and I’m honestly worried it’ll bite me in the ass one day when I refuse to date someone who’s actually a trans woman, but just acts really suspicious.

I could use some help on how to deal with this. I’m not quite sure how to tackle this",actuallesbians
Super excited to date,"There's a girl I've been seeing for a little while and she's really amazing. Things aren't official, but we're getting there and she's the first serious relationship I've had. I'm so excited to take her on dates. So excited to do cute little stuff for her. She saw some of my drawings and jokingly said she wants me to draw her a picture. I'm gonna do it and have a good idea of what I want to draw for her. I also want to take her to this restaurant in a neighboring city that she's really wanted to go to. I want to do so much and a bunch of ideas go through my mind every time I'm with her. I'm just so fuckin excited. But until we can find time to go to that restaurant, I'll just take her to get ice cream this week XD 

&amp;#x200B;

On another note, I'm still in the closet and that complicates things. I'm working on it because I really don't want to push her away and ruin this. Thinking about it for the past few weeks has made me so anxious, but I know it's something I have to do if I want our relationship to reach its full potential. I feel like I need to be at least partially out before I ask her to be my girlfriend. This whole thing makes me so excited and so terrified at the same time, it's insane. ",actuallesbians
Don’t know where else to vent,"For most of my post-college life I’ve been struggling with loneliness. I struggled with my sexuality for the better part of my teenage years to early adulthood. While all I was dealing with my inner struggles many of my close friends moved away, started their own families, got married etc.

Fast forward a few years and I meant the woman whom at the time I thought I spend the rest of my life with. That turned out to be a devasting mistake. She hurt me badly, cheated through most of the relationship, and pretty much gas-lighted me. It took awhile but eventually I got to the place where I moved past this heartache. The only problem is that now more than ever I’m alone. I don’t have any friends left except one who I see and talk to occasionally. 

My job doesn’t really lend itself to an active social life. I work evenings and usually sleep or work-out during the day. That’s it. I’ve tried the whole hobbies thing and I meet people but never anything that grows into a friendship. Now if I want to goto a concert, restaurant, movie, whatever I’m usually alone. 


My romantic life is in even worse condition. Dating as a lesbian on a good day isn’t the easiest thing in the world. The last legit date I had was over two years ago. I made the mistake of dating a co-worker who became obsessive fairly quickly and made work very uncomfortable. Dating apps seem daunting to me hoping that people will pick you based mostly on your looks I think it would be pretty soul-crushing for someone like me.

I’m an average chick, with a decent career, and no social life. I just don’t how or if I can ever break out of this cycle. I don’t mean to come off as whiny or pathetic, nor am I bitter. I guess more than anything I just feel defeated and wanted to vent in a place that I felt comfortable.",actuallesbians
To everyone thinking they are gonna end up alone,"I waited 4 years thinking my standards where too high and I thought I would just end up tolerating someone just to avoid loneliness. 

Guess what? 
I found the perfect girl and we are in love. 

Don’t give up. ",actuallesbians
hey lesbians how do i approach this cute girl at a coffee shop,"Ok so one morning i was coming out the train and i saw this gorg girl looking at me she was inside this cute coffee shop. And so after that i decided to check it out and its actually quite nice i like working there, but i never saw the girl again sadly, but a few days ago i went in with my friend and i saw her sitting outside with a huge group of friends all of them were guys and she had a plaid shirt and a baseball cap backwards ive never seen such big gay energy. 

I wouldve had come up to her but the guys just made it very intimidating to me :(  ",actuallesbians
True,,actuallesbians
Sexy af rocker Laura Jane Grace (aka my favorite transbian of all time),,actuallesbians
Finally came out (mostly)....,"So this past Labor Day weekend I officially came out to my family, all except my parents. NGL, my parents are the ones that scare me the most. Any time I hint at being gay I get a comment along the lines of ""don't even go there""  I've always been given the impression by them that it is completely unacceptable- basically have been told so in one way or another my whole life.

Anyhow, I'm actually really happy with how it went with the rest of my family, mainly cousins, but also my brother. He's the one I was most afraid to tell that weekend, but he was really great about it. Told me straight up that he loves me and just wants me to be happy and stressed that he is in no way our father and it doesn't bother him at all. 🤩

One day I will tell my parents... hopefully they don't disown me 😬 but if they do, their loss I guess. ",actuallesbians
When did you call them your girlfriend?,"Despite being in one relationship before — albeit a terribly unhealthy one — I guess this is still kind of a foreign concept to me. 

I know there aren’t rigidly defined rules...but I’m curious on what others have to say. ",actuallesbians
Confused mother,"Even as a kid, I had this attraction to girls I always just felt was normal, and not anything more than thinking they're pretty. Noticed when girls started getting chests,etc. I grew up as a tomboy, and even liked dressing like a boy to confuse the neighborhood girls and make them like me in late elementary. Played soft ball, played football at recess, was a gamer, etc. 
I really don't know why I didn't realize it was more than just for fun. 

As I got older I just went after guys, I had fun with them,  enjoyed the sex, etc. But as I become older I've realized I'm not really sexually attracted to them. I look at girl porn 100% of the time. I find women more attractive. I swoon over them. 

I've seen a few romance movies, and while they're cute, I was mostly attracted to the idea of someone loving me like that, not necessarily a man. 
I watched v for vendetta, and the story of the lesbian couple really made me reflect and realize I love the idea of being in a woman/woman relationship. 

I do love my fiance, but he can tell I'm not really sexually involved (although with recent weight gain I blame most of that on self confidence issues).

I've brought this up to him and were not really sure what to do about it.

I had a sexual dream a month or so ago. Of me and a woman playing in the sheets, laughing, kissing eachother everywhere, and me going down on her. I woke up steamy as hell. I've never had a dream like that about a man. 

I don't really want to break up our family over confusion. What if I don't end up enjoying a female relationship? At the same time i dont wanna become that person living a lie their whole life and leaving their spouse for someone in 20 years either.

Sorry just ranting , hoping for other similar situations, advice, etc.",actuallesbians
Going to Comic Con with the lady. Give me your best rapor cosplay ideas!,Pretty please. Our top contender right now is Yorkie and Kelly from San Junipero.,actuallesbians
Anyone know if they're actually together?,,actuallesbians
I've found our official candy.,,actuallesbians
Bought my first flannel today. I’m official now! Gonna go ahead and order my Subaru tomorrow.,,actuallesbians
Selfie Saturday Mega Thread!,"Welcome to the Selfie Saturday mega thread! This is for all pictures of you. Bathroom mirror selfie? yes please. Professional glamour shots? post 'em. This is for all pictures of yourself, not just regular selfies.

This thread will be posted automatically at 9am EST on Saturday, and will be taken down at 9am EST on Sunday. 
",actuallesbians
"It's Friday, here's Alison Bechdel holding a whole mess of garlic",,actuallesbians
I have a magic hat,"This hat is not special in the slightest but whenever I wear it my interaction with queer ladies increases by 100%.  No idea why it makes me a magnet but it makes me happy and anxious at the same time.  That is all. 

Edit:  [THE DANG HAT](https://imgur.com/gallery/1eBpiFh) is from [Target](https://www.target.com/p/women-s-baseball-hat-mossimo-supply-co-153-black/-/A-52976556?ref=tgt_adv_XS000000&amp;AFID=google_pla_df&amp;CPNG=PLA_Accessories+Shopping_Brand&amp;adgroup=SC_Accessories&amp;LID=700000001170770pgs&amp;network=g&amp;device=m&amp;location=9001722&amp;gclid=EAIaIQobChMIoJW7lb2s3QIVk0wNCh3xywa1EAQYBSABEgK-FPD_BwE&amp;gclsrc=aw.ds) ",actuallesbians
To my fellow sober raptors,"Tonight was a difficult night for me, sobriety-wise. One of those nights where you can’t point to a specific trigger, and it feels like the world is coming down around you.

I’ve been sober for 16 months and 3 weeks today, but there are days when it feels like my active drinking days were yesterday. When all the work I’ve put in, the long days and long nights, the AA meetings, the time and energy I’ve spent avoiding that first drink mean nothing, and it’s at the back of my mind.

Some days I feel on top of the world - happy, content, accomplished, and sober. Others, like today, hit me like a freight train and try to steal away all of my progress. 

So tonight, after sobbing the hour drive home from an event to my girlfriend’s house before she got home from work, I asked my girlfriend’s kind roommate and her girlfriend to sit with me for a couple minutes while I cried and let out all of the reasons why I wanted to drink, and the reasons that I should choose not to. And they did. They sat with me for an hour, and made me smile and laugh for 90% of it.

I write to you all on r/actuallesbians because I hope that another sober raptor can find solace in that it does get easier, though it is one-day-at-a-time progress. 

The advice I can give is to always reach out, even when it feels like the world wants nothing to do with you and your battles.

Pick up the phone and call until someone picks up.

Talk it out, cry it out, or even yell it out to someone else until you can take a full, deep breath. And then keep taking deep breaths until you no longer need to think through the process. 

We find strength in connection, and peace in communication. 

Together, we can accomplish anything. 

And to the struggling raptors wondering about their drinking habits or how their drinking may be impacting their day-to-day lives, remember, there are so many people in this world who will love you until you can learn to love yourself. And they will listen, and hold your hand, until you can stand up on your own. 

Each and every one of you is beautiful, strong, and courageous, in so many colorful ways. Much love to this subreddit, thank you for always being a bright spot when I open this thread in the morning (and before I go to sleep.) 

-aml15 ",actuallesbians
RANT is it possible we’re just friends?,"I’m newly out n dating (within the last 6 months) and I’m currently talking to a girl, M. We met on tinder where we both clearly stated our interest for women in the bio (I’m les, she’s bi). 

We first made plans and I nervously stood her up (I know it was wrong!! But we also didn’t confirm time/place and hadn’t yet exchanged numbers, just tinder). Luckily she understood when I apologized and explained how intimidated I was by her. So we planned a real first date. 

I took her out for tacos, it was awkward at times but within normal date levels of awkwardness. She told me she’s demisexual and has no desire for a sexual partner at this time which is fine with me. She mentioned making out with people in the past, but I’m not clear if that’s something she wants or something she’s uncomfortable with, so I haven’t made any moves to kiss her. 

We’ve hung out many times now and for some reason I get the idea she only thinks of me as a friend? Sometimes we are very flirty but never anything physical (I never want to make her uncomfortable by trying to hold her hand or anything!!). We’ll buy each other dinner, share meals, do face masks together and watch netflix in bed... but these are all things straight girl friends do too. 

She’s also an artist and wants us to do a shoot in a few days with a lesbian 1920s erotica theme. Last time we hung out I went back to her house after I sat in my car for a few minutes, determined to confess my feelings right then and there, but she was tired when I left and ended up crashing almost immediately so we didn’t get to talk. 

I’m thinking of inviting her to LA (about an hour and a half from where we live, kinda long for it to be awkward) tomorrow to go to a flea market and maybe get brunch/talk about my feelings/etc. But part of me feels like there’s nothing there and I should stop pursuing a girl who’s obv not interested. 

What should I do?",actuallesbians
Me when I meet another lesbian w/ the same humor as me,,actuallesbians
Where is my all-lesbian Coldplay cover band?,,actuallesbians
Beer companies are learning how to appeal to the lesbians... 😂,,actuallesbians
MRW a cis man says that I'm erasing lesbians,,actuallesbians
What conventionally unattractive feature do you find attractive?,,actuallesbians
Athens GA Pride tomorrow 9/9,"My friends all had to bail for various family/illness reasons. I just really want to go and hang out and see the parade at 2. I live just north of Atlanta near Alpharetta and I’m on antibiotics so I can’t drink mostly, just want to have a platonic good time with some gal pals. 

Not from GA originally, bi dating a guy but I was really looking forward to Pride fun times with girlfriends of mine. Who has space to adopt another queerio in their group? ",actuallesbians
When you realize this song is about lesbian sex,,actuallesbians
Scared as hell but in a good place,"2 years ago, I broke up with my first love after 2.5 years because I wasn't happy with our relationship or how we were as people - let alone a couple. I was in a terrible mental and physical place health wise already and things plummeted afterwards.

I was convinced I was an absolute asshole for breaking her heart and that I was unworthy of love again. I believed that I was responsible for ruining someone's life. In the process, I lost myself and ( due to other factors too) developed severe depression.

After a lot of therapy and support, I decided to focus my life on learning how to love myself and how to treat myself with some good ol' self compassion. Since then, I've built up my community, learned self-care, and come to peace with myself. I feel happy, present and whole.

Then suddenly, a few weeks ago during an overseas work trip, I met an amazing woman that has blown my mind. She's patient, passionate, resilient, and kind. Plus we share similar values and life goals too.

She's also great with kids and animals, treats her family and friends with generosity and respect, can hold up against me in an intellectual debate, is a massive geek, was military ( I love a woman in uniform!), and enjoys cooking.

I'm terrified of being hurt and hurting someone again. We live in different countries right now too. In my fear, my brain keeps conjuring up reasons why this will be doomed too or how it might just be infatuation. But she's patient with me and reassured me that she's there and we'll figure things out - that when I'm ready for a relationship, she's ready for us because she knows I'm ""worth it"".

 I don't know how the hell she hasn't been snatched up already but damn! She's wife material! I'm falling for her hard. Yes, I'm scared as hell but I know if I don't take a risk and try, I will regret this for life.

There's a saying that you'll find love when and where you least expect it. I think it happens when you start to accept and love yourself first. I'm happy. I already was before I met her, but now I have a bonus reason to be grateful and happy.",actuallesbians
What is going on between me and this girl?,"Throwaway as she has seen my reddit username!
So we (25 and 28) met on a dating app and hit it off on our first meeting, and have met up like 10 times since then. I usually drive up to Portland to hers but we’ve also gone on dates in other areas and she’s been down to mine as I live an hour outside the metro area. We’ve slept together on all occasions where one of us has spent the night at the others... and I really like spending time with her, she’s awesome and strong. We’ve also both got depression but mines is more in remission right now but hers is very active.

However last time we were chatting, I asked her about where she sees this going and she says she sees no future between us but does like me and does like spending time with me. She’s off on vacation in a few weeks time so for now we’ve agreed to carry on spending time.

Am I holding out false hope that the reason she can’t see a future between us is because of her depression... or should I call this, whatever this is, quits?",actuallesbians
"I’m so lesbian, even my shoes are plaid",,actuallesbians
How did you and your S/O meet?,"Let's hear the sappy, the surprising, the sexy stories! How did you and your s/o meet? I love hearing about how couples got together, and I think there's definitely a few of us that could use some inspiration 😂",actuallesbians
Gay crushes represent in a new Dutch train commercial! This made me so happy,,actuallesbians
HAIL THOR (and date Valkyrie),,actuallesbians
"Me too, please.",,actuallesbians
How do you meet LGBT people?,"I'm in the Vegas area and I have zero clue how to go around meeting new people. I'm 19 so unless an ID isn't checked I can't go to clubs, I don't go to college either so my options feel very limited :/ any advice on how to meet people &amp; friends? Lgbt or not? ",actuallesbians
Not feeling great,When you feel you have reached a new low when you need to talk to someone but all you have is internet strangers,actuallesbians
I'm fine.,After more than one year of heartbreak and all kinds of effed up shit.. I just saw my ex with her new girlfriend and I can honestly say I'm fine. I just wanted to write this cuz i didn't think I'll ever get there but I'm finally over her. Thank god x,actuallesbians
Who else thinks Brigette Lundy-Paine is one of the best things about Atypical?,,actuallesbians
My very favourite girl made me the best pin,,actuallesbians
This reddit keeps proving why I like lesbians over everyone elsr,"So after weighing in on a bunch of posts here, a really wonderful experience tonight absolutely solidified how great you all are. 

There've been more than one occasion where I disagreed with people on here about something or other. This being reddit... On the *internet* no less, the concept of actual civil disagreement, not to mention occasionally getting someone to see my point of view and (gasp) *agree* would seem out of reach. 

Yet here, and pretty much here alone, people just seem mostly civil and kind. After the exchange tonight, I turn to my partner and say, ""like I needed proof that lesbians are just better than everyone else."" And she responded, ""well, duh.""

:-)

So yeah... General human decency: the reason lesbians rock. 

Well.... Boobs aside. ",actuallesbians
India court legalises gay sex in landmark ruling! I'm not a criminal in my country any more.,,actuallesbians
*Her,,actuallesbians
so I just asked my crush out,"I got rejected. But gently. She's another bi who currently, it turns out, just started exclusively dating someone a few weeks ago. which is fucking frustrating because I dragged my feet for so long on this. 

She essentially told me that she did/does like me, and thinks I'm an awesome lady, but now's not the right time. Also that she really values our friendship (which is good, because she's actually a great friend), and doesn't want it to change or be awkward. So, like, that's the second most-preferable outcome.  


And also, I learned at the age of 24 that I, despite being a long-closeted Hoosier Queer^(TM ,) have decent gaydar and can indeed also ask women out without melting into a sludgy pool of anxiety.   


Thanks for listening- now excuse me as I go and mope for a few hours! ",actuallesbians
[rant] Go make more friends.,"When I asked you out, you told me you wanted things to end well, you didn't want to lose your best friend.

When I asked you 2 years later, why you wouldn't talk to me about these important things that you avoided, you said the same thing. ""Remember? When you asked me, I said it..."" I didn't remember.

I didn't think of breakups that way. I shouldn't have to. But you were so selfish. You knew these questions were coming, but you'd tell me ""think about something else"" you'd tell me ""thinking about this makes me anxious"". But you're not this whole discussion. You're one half of this relationship. Why is it all about you? I asked why you wouldn't talk. ""I don't want to lose my best friend.""

And your friends... Why was it all about your friends? Really? You stood up for 3 days and then you skipped a nap to help your friend do her nails? But I know you couldn't put aside any more than an hour for me - and taking the subway would give me panic attacks all the time. It costs money to travel and you never visited me more than once.

You told me you didn't want to come back home, because there was nothing waiting for you back here. Who was over there that made you so enamored? Is it wrong of me to think that? You were never the same. Why did you drag it on so long?

I think you did exactly what you were trying not to.

Who was your best friend?

The only person you confide in?

The person you would talk to because you were feeling bad?

The person you'd only go to because you had bad news?

The person you'd didn't even remember was your girlfriend?

Who was your girlfriend?

The person you fucked sometimes?

The only trophy in your cabinet?

The puppy waiting at home?

Did she mean anything to you after that first year?

I really want to know.

I want to know if it was worth it.

Why did you tell me you were alone again? Why did I think it could lead to anything good? You were never adventurous, why would I even think you'd let that happen? I'm glad you didn't, but I'm also glad you decided to bring it back up a few hours later, so I could decide not to talk to you.

You're messing with my brain. You didn't deserve all the effort I put into things.

I know you're looking for me, but I'm tired of it. You need new friends. You need to fucking learn how to confide in people. How can that be so hard? You did things for them that you would never do for me. They might as well be your girlfriends. What do you mean you can't talk to them? That's what you spent all your time doing. Maybe you should be fucking them too.

I'm done letting you confide in me - go find someone else. I'm done trying to be friends after a breakup. We are not best friends. I forgot how nice it was to flirt. To have it reciprocated, rather than followed by an ""eww"" or a change of subject. I can't wait to have a partner that is mature, excited to see me, and goes out of their way to do that, like I wasted years doing for you. I have so much fun sexting girls now. It's weird how good it feels to have someone into me. There are random chicks that wanna fuck me, although it's not always easy to get in touch with them, but I'm getting more experience, and it's actually fun.

I daydreamed about driving a special ""her"" around. I don't know who, but she's out there. And she's going to listen to me sing along to my shitty music, and talk about how cute my new car is, but also about how I've been waiting all my life to drive her around town, and how she can visit my future condo whenever she wants, and that she can borrow my future kitten and take him home whenever she wants... And she can borrow me whenever she wants...

There's someone in my online friend group that seems to have a crush on me. And I guess I do too. We're both kind of ""useless"" but I could see myself falling for her, although she's very far. But who knows. It's nice to remember I'm likable, at least sometimes.

I guess after that, I'd still date a new bff, because I don't care about that word anymore. I have SO many best friends. So many people that I confide in. Not just the girl I wanna fuck. I don't use her for that, because I know it can become stressful if she's the only one bearing it, or if that's the only thing she hears from me.

...I muted your message thread, I guess I'm too scared to delete it. But I also pinned more than 10 other threads so I'd never see yours without making an effort to. I know you've wanted to get in touch, but I only have one update anyways.

I'm sorry that you lost your best friend.",actuallesbians
girl in my class has a cute butt,that is all. thanks for listening to my ted talk.,actuallesbians
That finger under the chin 👭😍,,actuallesbians
All tiddies are good tiddies Mica.,,actuallesbians
Queer women stereotypes SURVEY you should take! It’s from Autostraddle. Seems super interesting.,,actuallesbians
I have so many feelings about this!!,,actuallesbians
I told my crush I fancied her!!!,"I've literally NEVER had the courage to tell someone when I like them.

&amp;#x200B;

She said ""thanks &lt;3""

&amp;#x200B;

oh well, I'm still super pleased with myself for saying something! Yay!",actuallesbians
Televisions first ever Gay kiss was on star trek DS9,,actuallesbians
But actually,,actuallesbians
I wanted to share the poem I wrote that time I stayed up til dawn reading Sappho &lt;3,,actuallesbians
Who loves Ruby and Saphire?,,actuallesbians
Good sapphic book/movie/tv recommendations?,I’m hoping for something where characters are explicitly queer but I’ll take anything really. Rare finds appreciated!,actuallesbians
hi friends soothe me with your stories thank you,"Hi, I'm 24 and for the majority of my life I've presented myself as ace and never really went after anyone and kinda just went along with when boys would kiss me or whatever. I do remember very distinct times when I really did want to kiss my girl best friends growing up but I didn't want to fuck up our friendships.  


Anyways, I'm thinking I'm not ace and just closeted.   
I guess I've always been afraid of any kind of relationship growing up and I just don't know how to do them at all?  
SO how do you date a gal as an adult when you're just a scared baby?   
Like hey I like you btw I've never kissed a girl lol hey wanna SMOOCH?   


gosh this sounds so SILLY. Thank u for ur patience. ",actuallesbians
"No sir, I'm lesbian...",...and *monogamous.*,actuallesbians
Coming out...,I came out to my best friend and she is the first person I have told. I have never so loved and accepted in my whole life. All my worries and fears went out the door the moment I told her and I saw how happy she got. She told me she has known for years and was waiting for me to come out. My best friend is the best! ,actuallesbians
@the.wing alllll the feels,,actuallesbians
UPDATE I asked her out,"She’s not interested in me and she’s dating someone else. She wants to still be friends though. Which is fine with me, I guess.

It hurts because I’ve never had someone like me. I thought this was finally going to be it. Turns out I mistook her extroversion for interest in me. I was really upset, but I think emotional trauma is pushing all my feelings down. I’m pretty numb. Empty. Lonely. 😔",actuallesbians
"The more femslash fanfics I read, the gayer my expectations become.😂 Anyone else experiencing the same symtoms?",,actuallesbians
Do you experience attraction to women differently than you imagine straight men do?,"It's impossible to generalize what ALL straight men find attractive. Different people have different preferences, obviously. Plus, all of our beauty standards are rooted in our culture. 

Even so, wlw as a group tend to look and dress ""differently"" from straight women. We've got our own ways to try and clock other wlw in public (flannel shirts, short hair, beanies, you know the stereotypes). I wonder if a lot of what I find attractive in other women is based in what I *know* signifies queerness, or if wlw fashion evolved based around things women find attractive? 

In any case, I've always found broad shoulders and soft hips very attractive. Girls who look like they could thrive in the wilderness for months. The line from the chin to the ear to the neck to the shoulder. Dark hair and sly side-smiles.

I don't know much about what straight men like, and I reckon y'all don't either. But are there ways you're attracted to women that you think are more unique to wlw experiences?",actuallesbians
You know she is girlfriend material when...,"What makes you see her as girlfriend material, not only a hookup? ",actuallesbians
It is confirmed...,"Squirting is a real thing. I am ashamed to admit I was a non believer. 

My girlfriend has proved me wrong twice now.
Super hot. 

What are y'alls thoughts on it? I'm sure this has been discussed before but it's never happened to me before and I'm in awe.",actuallesbians
How have you dealt with internalized homophobia?,,actuallesbians
"My sister's birthday is coming up and she recently came out to me. However, she's still not comfortable acknowledging or talking about it since then. I'm looking for some gift guidance!","My younger sister is a sophomore in college and is currently at school far from home. She and I are very close. About a month ago she came out to me as gay. While I was happy for her and wanted to celebrate her coming out, she was very distraught and conflicted. I'm the only person in our family who knows. It killed me to see how much pain she has been in for most of her life having to hold in this part of who she is from everyone. I love her very much and want to be there for her to talk to but when I gently brought it up again to ask how she was feeling, she was clearly uncomfortable and said she did not want to talk about it. 

I respect that my sister will be ready to talk and be open in her own time and I'm not trying to push her. But I also feel strange just ignoring it and pretending nothing happened. I don't want to push my feelings on her or make it about me. It's just that I am heartbroken for her and I want her to feel accepted and loved. 

That's a very long intro to my real question about her birthday gift. Were there any books or pieces of pop culture that helped you in coming to terms and being proud of who you are? Anything that might subtly say I acknowledge and love this part of you?",actuallesbians
Too much!,,actuallesbians
"Just a couple of gals being pals, painting the house that they live in together.",,actuallesbians
Yesterday I married my best friend and the love of my life in the most beautiful place on Earth. Photo credit: Alpine Image Company,,actuallesbians
Plenty of Fail (a more recent adventure),"I clicked with an age appropriate, shorter, pretty type butch who is a  &gt;30 minute drive from me... We make the jump from POF to text, she is an iPhone user (thank the Lords Of Kobol), and though she struggled with my humor and had to do some Googling to get some of my references - it seemed to be going well enough.

We made plans to go for a casual dinner near her and she randomly mentioned ""if we're going to fuck afterwards it'll have to be in a car in the Kelseys parking lot because I'm housesitting for the night "".  Ummmm, okay? I wasn't planning on that AT ALL... but that's kinda sketchy. Why not in the empty house she's supposed to be sitting? 

Then she asks me to bring along a double ended dildo and is super excited she's on her period and we can have awesome period sex with toys ... IN A CAR. Hey cute strange chick? I'm into all that (minus the car thing kinda though.) But can we just have a burger maybe and then be super awkward and cute afterwards and then deal with the rest?

I bailed on her that evening, with plenty of notice. 

We keep texting for a week and she invites me out again, this time straight to the backseat. Then casually informs me she has a cracked kneecap and a large open wound on her knee that definitely should have been stitched and now may or may not be infected badly. BACKSEAT SEX IS JUST WHAT YOU NEED! NOTHING LIKE KNEELING ON SEAT BELT BUCKLE THINGYS WITH A BROKEN AND GANGRENOUS KNEE. 

I make excuses and suggest her place, but she's housesitting again. Maybe when she's not housesitting??? She doesn't know how long it'll be... It has to be the car, and for some reason the Kelseys parking lot specifically. And now, much to my chagrin, the burgers aren't even part of the offer. 

So yeah. This broad is toooooootally housesitting... For her wife / husband / parents... that are not away at all. For heavens sake just tell me you live with whoever and can't bring people home. 

And now I'm supposed to just waltz over there into her car and have toy sex right off the bat in a car without even an appetizer or beverage beforehand to steel me for the festering knee problems in the car that MUST be parked in the Kelseys parking lot. 

Online dating is awesome. 

",actuallesbians
Best place to buy flannels?,help a gay out,actuallesbians
I got a sign for my desk. It’s not gay yet but it’s definitely a mood™️,,actuallesbians
When you think about your Gf too much,,actuallesbians
How do you approach and ask a stranger out in public places?,Please help a unexperienced useless lesbian out. How do you even do it knowing 9 out of 10 times the girl is properly straight? What techniques do you use? speaking from actual experience only please,actuallesbians
Keira Knightley’s New Film has a Passionate Lesbian Affair.,,actuallesbians
Dua Lipa officially has my attention 🔥🔥🔥,,actuallesbians
My girlfriend and I got engaged while on vacation (and now she’s slipped into depression),"My girlfriend and I have been together for three years, and have known each other for about 15.  Last week, while on a beach vacation, we proposed to one another.

It was exciting and scary and fun to talk about wedding dates and plans.

However, she told her mother a few days ago and the response wasn’t positive.  My fiancé has now slipped into a pretty severe depression and I’m sad and angry.  Sad for the love of my life and angry that her parents and their bigotry have ruined what’s suppose to be a celebratory occasion.

I wish her family would wake the fuck up, they have an amazing kid and there so hyper focused on her “sins.”

She loves her parents but I can’t help but think how much happier she’d be if they were no longer in her life.",actuallesbians
Just a daily reminder that you’re beautiful,"I’m in a great mood and hope to spread that good mood to all you lovely and beautiful ladies. Have a great weekend, I love you all",actuallesbians
"She said yes! 2.5 years ago I was a good church girl intending to stay single all my life, and now here we are.",,actuallesbians
"I'm going to visit my girl and she's feeling a bit down, any suggestions on what to add to a lil care package for her","So, pretty much what the title says.. my girlfriend has been down for the past few days and I'm going to see her for the weekend I wanted to put together a little care package surprise thing, anyone have any suggestions on what to add to it? (Without completely destroying my bank account)

I know y'all are probs gonna be like ""oh we don't know what she likes"" but I just wanted some general suggestions of you have any, thankssss!

Update: 
I got her a tea pot, mug, tea (duh), some fuzzy socks, chocolate, some other little snacks and drinks. Thanks y'all she ended up crying cause she was happy :) ",actuallesbians
“Friend” on fb feed always posting things like this. We arent close and dont really talk but she acts like she is so “woke” for even pretending she would be interested in a lesbian relationship and im about to lose it! What should i do!!,,actuallesbians
This is bad...,"I’ve been reading posts on here for a while, but now I “finally” have something to talk to you about, and I need an advIce and I need someone to tell me ill be fine... Warning: I’m useless... and I feel like shit.

So I have this friend (known each other since middle school) and I always wanted to be around her and I really, really wanted her to like me. Took me just unter 7 years to realise that it was not friendship I was looking for... I came out rather late (was 20), friends and family were ok with it (lucky me 🙌🏻) and she was the one that made me realise I was gay. Just for context: I’ve never been in a relationship, never kissed someone apart from dares at parties so: no experience...

Fast forward 5 years and we have last weekend. She came to visit me (we live about 5 hours apart) and on the last evening we were watching a movie on the couch, one of my favourites in fact. As always she is leaned up against me. I’ve never quite lost the fascination with her although she has a boyfriend and identifies as straight.

When the movie is over we stay up and talk, then I tell her I’ll go to bed next door. So I do exactly that and fall asleep. Must be about half an hour later that she knocks on my door and asks if she could come in. She said she wanted to keep talking. I said ok and she came in and slipped under the covers. I mean we’ve always need close but this was new to me... she cuddles up, we talk and just before I fall asleep, she kisses me cheek. And suddenly I am wide awake and she kisses me on the lips. No tongue, nothing, but the closest thing to a romantic encounter I’ve ever had.

We cuddled and kissed all night and the next day, I took her to the train station. I am nervous, thinking what happe ed the nicht before but teying to play it cool (yeah, kike that was go ne work...) We talk just like we always do and shortly before I can drop her off and she gets out of my car, she looks at me and tells me how much she enjoyed the previous evening and that she liked kissing me. She leans over, kisses me again and then leaves my car.

Now I’m sitting at home feeling like an idiot, because now she’s back with her boyfriend in their apartment and I’m sitting here all stupid and crushing on her worse than ever before...

Do any of you have similar experiences? How do so stop feeling like a complete moron? This needs to stop ASAP! 😭🤦🏻‍♀️",actuallesbians
My gf was wondering how my dad caught onto what was happening,,actuallesbians
"HERE ARE SOME SULTRY ROLLERSKATE BABES YOU'RE WELCOME, GAYS",,actuallesbians
But the box is so cute tho!,,actuallesbians
💕gay transgirls💕,,actuallesbians
Thought y'all might appreciate the gay dice I just got in the mail!,,actuallesbians
"if you dont think you can love your child for who they are, then dont have children",,actuallesbians
On top of the world!,"I spent the whole day text-flirting with my crush!!!  Seriously, from about 9am until 9pm we were just texting constantly (with a few gaps when one of us had to be away from the phone for a while).  And it was such a good mix of serious conversation with joking and teasing and memes.

I was just grinning like an idiot all day.  I like this girl so much!  And I have nobody who I can tell because she’s one of only three people that know I’m gay (yes, she’s gay too).  So you all get to hear it 😄",actuallesbians
Looking gay,"Hello previously closeted bi lady here. 
Since browsing this thread I've realised why I'm constantly mistaken as a lesbian. 
My last car was a Subaru Outback, I now drive a Prius. I'm currently growing out a buzz cut. 
I wear birkenstocks, tevas, keens and converse. The list goes on but my god is closeted me wasnt trying to say something subconsciously. ",actuallesbians
Girls... do you find girls who dress in all boy clothes not attractive?,"When I say all boy clothes I mean actual guy clothes not just a flannel and sneakers. From top down boy clothes. Sneakers, guy jeans, t-shirt or hoodie and a cap. But no crazy graphic shirts, just guy clothes.",actuallesbians
Ancient Lesbians?,,actuallesbians
Girls with glasses and a messy bun.,"that’s it, thanks for coming to my ted talk. ",actuallesbians
What is the queerest femme-y haircut you can think of that would still be ok in an office?,"I'm struggling with this.

I so desperately want to be more out, more visible. I love queer looking hair, but my job is kind of stuffy. I'm also extremely femme presenting at work - I never wear pants, just dresses and skirts. 
I'm thinking some kind of cut straight across at the shoulders with a super light hombre and maybe a purple undercut? My hair is curly so I'd wear it curly.

Other than that I am literally at a loss.

I could go super short but would feel lile the femmey piece of my would be taken away... or maybe my brain is not understanding that there can be very femme short haircuts.

Help?!?!?",actuallesbians
Update For Online Dating and Sexting,"Okay, I thought everything was normal between me and that girl I told you about in my previous post, but it turns out it wasn't. 
I told her I wanted to get to know her more, so I asked her some get to know you questions and she basically mocked me for it. It took her a long time to tell me her name, and a while to tell me what college she attended. I did a check on her mobile phone number and it said 'Russian Federation...' or something like that. After a while she got sick of my innocent questions and told me she was going. 

Even if she was real (which I highly doubt), I don't want to be with someone like that.
 
Thank you to everyone for giving me advice previously :)",actuallesbians
How Early is too early to give a girl your number?,"We have been chatting on and off on a dating app for a couple days, the app is stupid and glitches sometimes I feel. I want to give her my number, but I don't want it to be ""too soon"", cause we all know that can scare some girls off. ",actuallesbians
My new girlfriends father just died... how can I show her I care?,"My girlfriend of two month's father just died last night. She's been up with him and her family (about 2 hours away) for the past couple of days and will stay there about a week. 


I have sent flowers to the house she will be staying at and am supporting her with what words I can from afar. I do have a key to her apartment and have been taking care of her cat while she's up there. I plan on deep cleaning her place (she's a clean person though) and getting a picture of her and her father framed. 


Looking for ideas of what else I could do to support her and show her how much I care? It's hard being a new relationship and her being away. I want to respect her space but let her know I am here for her.",actuallesbians
I can't stop thinking about the bartender won served me on the bank holiday Monday,"At my local pub, I was there with my mother.   She (the bartender) was skinny with a black undercut and tattoos. She said she liked my t shirt. It was a band t shirt so I'm not sure if she recognised the singer on it or just liked the design.
 

I've been back there twice since then, once for a meal with my mother and last night for a quick drink because we were going to see a film but got there too early (the cinema is next door). My mum has got a hard life caring for my ill father so I like taking her to the movies or the pub. 


*sigh*  I gotta get this chick out my head. ",actuallesbians
"Today, the Supreme Court of India has decriminalised homosexuality. I am officially no longer a criminal! 🌈🏳️‍🌈💃",,actuallesbians
Phrasing when asking to be her girl,"I want to ask a girl to be my girlfriend. I feel ready to ask her and feel ready to be hers too.

Only we aren't really ""girls"". She is 40 and I am 36. So we are grown women.

Does anyone have some phrasing ideas for proposing such a thing?

The best I could come up with so far is something like ""I'm ready to deepen my commitment to you and chart a course for a life together"".

I'm also interested in hearing other people's ideas and stories though. ",actuallesbians
"The more things change, the more they stay the same.",,actuallesbians
Last names,"This is purely out of curiosity, but for those of you who are married to other women or want to be: what did you do about your last names? Did one of you take the other's, did you both keep your own, did you hyphenate?",actuallesbians
"We got our wedding bands and our wedding is only 6 weeks away! Been planning it for a year now and I’m starting to freak out a bit! So excited, though!",,actuallesbians
I wanna do everything with her,"Like, legitimately. 

I want to bowl and eat ice cream, hold hands on the bus, watch tv, bitch about work, go see the newest Marvel flick (even though I hate those things, but she loves em), get high together, get drunk together, get sad together, get so happy we cry together, go see the stars, look at fossils, take pictures on disposable cameras, swoon over Ruth Bader Ginsburg, hold back her hair when she is sick on her knees at the toilet, dress up as Idgie and Ruth from Fried Green Tomatoes for Halloween, laugh bout nonsensical shit, argue about who’s paying for dinner, go sailing, go to Iceland, go to Europe, go to the goddamn moon, fight bigots, propose to her, plant vegetables, buy a farm, live off the soil, have two kids, make a family. Celebrate our 90th birthdays together.

Fuck. Just... I want her. I want to be hers as long as she’ll have me.

TLDR: I’m drunk and I love my girlfriend. 

",actuallesbians
Pretty please?,,actuallesbians
There are so many things😉,My wife is the best. Cooking right now. Does not need my help. ,actuallesbians
~~new queer music alert~~,"Take a listen to my international bisexual pop sensation girlfriend's new EP &lt;3 Psychedelic pop vibes for ANY occasion. Can we tell I'm a momager?????

Album link [here](https://open.spotify.com/album/2x3lDCC37WtmRVceWMDZzJ?si=HmsGawquTH6miQDT6eq9nQ) 

Her instagram [here](https://www.instagram.com/whoistanners/)

https://i.redd.it/w603shpwmuk11.png",actuallesbians
I am a pussy.,"I can't approach/ask out the girl I like, I want to be comfortable but I just can't.

I thought I could do it but it's literally impossible, I want to change something so badly but fuck it's hard...",actuallesbians
Friday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
Joys of living in a small conservative town 😒,,actuallesbians
Do you ever feel incredibly guilty and ashamed of the way you internally objectify women?,"I don't know if this is just a me thing.

I can't help internally objectifying women every now and then. I am very, very physically attracted to women and so my brain does what brains do and I can't help but subtly stare or imagine what she'd look like doing x or y or play into the way television shows that have a male gaze view women's bodies a bit. 

And I feel really gross about it. Because I know that it's shitty and I very much see women as people (I mean, I am one) and I am privy to conversations women have about how it makes them feel and their fears etc. 

I don't know, sometimes I just feel so bad about the way I think. At least I can say I don't manifest those thoughts through any words or actions. But yeah...",actuallesbians
Gay as hell or nah?,,actuallesbians
😂 I laugh way to hard at things sometimes,,actuallesbians
I just officially came out yesterday!!!!,"Now I have come out to my family already, and told one or two friends, but yesterday I came out to like half my softball team. Several of which are not exactly the quiet type. I was driving four other girls to our game yesterday and the subject of dating came up and I said I had never been on a date, but that was ok because I was also pretty gay. The rest of the car ride there we just talked about me being gay and it was great! I am just in such a great mood right now!",actuallesbians
dating the most perfect girl in the world but ive developed a crush¿,"(ive posted this in other subreddit but i figured i could use all the help i could get)


my girlfriend is beautiful and loving and everything you could ask for, we’ve been dating for around 1 1/2 years and she’s been my best friend for 2.

but recently this new girl’s got me fuckedd up. she’s in some of my classes and my girl’s in none so recently there has been some distance between the two of us but nothing too much, ive been calling and facetiming her almost everyday.

this new girl ive known for a few days and at first i just wanted to be friends but recently one of my friends told me she was bi and that’s what really got me fucked. i don’t think i would be this interested in the girl if i didn’t know she was gay. ive caught myself staring at her a bunch and she’s noticed too, i would say we r ok friends but we don’t really know each other too well.

so, what the fuck do i do? obviously i don’t wanna cheat on my girl or break it up. do i just wait for this crush/infatuation to pass? am i an asshole or disloyal for feeling this way? i don’t wanna just distance myself completely from this girl until my feelings disappear because she really is chill and i wanna be her friend but if that’s really what it takes i will. should i tell my girlfriend about this?? i don’t feel like it would help anyone but is that the ‘correct’ thing to do?

just looking for any advice cuz this got me fucked up. sorry if this post is ranty i just needed to fully tell someone and get this shit off my chest",actuallesbians
"Anyone else remember the 1996 movie ""Wish Upon a Star""?",,actuallesbians
This is the best tweet I read after homosexuality was decriminalized in India today,,actuallesbians
I’d do anything for a girl to look @ me with a female gayze like that...,,actuallesbians
Ghosted...and then found?,"Back in early July I matched with a woman on Tinder. We talked like every day for a straight week. We shared so much and there was so much mutual interest in what the other was saying that I was kind of blown away. We talked about meeting up, but then her last message was shorter than the rest, and that was the last I heard from her. 

I stopped using tinder a bit after that. Before I turned my profile off, I sent her another message with my number. 

Then a few minutes ago I got a Tinder notification that I had messages. I was kind of confused because i only had one active mutual match, with the aforementioned woman. 

So I click her picture and there are two messages from her. Apparently she sent them Sunday but I was only notified today. I've thought about her a lot since we last spoke. I'd never connected with someone like I seemed to with her. 

Here's what she wrote:

""Dear Lorna, I have been trying to find a way to write this in a sensitive way. I adored speaking with you and I apologize for my disappearing act. I will say it was a mixture of fear and uncertainty. I'm genuinely a tentative person but I shared more than I thought with you or anyone in a long time. You seemed to like me so much it was scary. Not that I'm low in self esteem or image but like it be too good to be true. It had nothing to do with you being trans hence trying to write this in a way that I was being a coward. I did get the postal service and it's hard I still have little time to myself but it's daylight hours and I'm happy. I used up my savings to make the transition between jobs so a meeting wouldn't happen too soon if it was still on the table. Which it might not be because I said nothing for so long. Break of trust and all. I hope you got the Nutrosystem job or something that will make you happy. If you get this since you gave me your cell here's mine (xxx)xxx-xxxx.

If you want to chat again or eventually like to meet. But I understand if not because silence seemed easier than continuing and that's on me not anyone else. A stranger's apology must not seem like much but it's all I have. Today seems as if August is lashing it's fury out at it's end that though September has begun the chill of autumn may not come.""

I guess sometimes we give in to instinct to protect ourselves, but the fact that she reached out two months later like this...I still can't really believe it. ",actuallesbians
Response to a bigot,,actuallesbians
I'm in loooove. Just wanna share. Please be happy for me lol,"Sorry. I just wanna express how happy and in love I am. lol English is not my first language. Please bear with me. Thanks.... And so it goes.

Two months ago I met the most amazing woman on Tinder. I don't usually stay up all night just to talk to strangers, and yet I felt special when I talked to her until the wee hours of the morning. I felt sooooo comfortable with her. After two weeks, we met at a local cafe. She's so beautiful, intelligent, and funny. I was smitten because of they way she talks and expresses things. She's has a sentimental ass like me. She smokes and drinks alcohol toooo! I'm fond of the the stuff she likes. We have so much in common and we're both femmes. WE HIT IT OFF! We've seen each other for a couple times. She slept at my apartment. Nothing happened tho. Just kissed and cuddled. Goood, you know how I respect her so bad as much as I wanted to fuck the brains out of her. Ahhhhh. 
Days went by and things did go very well. I went out with her friends. She went out with mine and so on. Happy times.

Aaaaaand, just a week ago, she became my girlfriend. Fun Fact: This is my first legit and official relationship with a woman! I couldn't be more happy! Please be happy for me hahahah i sound pathetic. Forgive me.

Yayyyy. I'm not a useless lesbian anymore. I've had flings and hook-ups with other women before whom I haven't seen any future with. But, I've never been so sure of her in just a short period of time. I felt that I was ready for her. I've never been so open, so expressive with my feelings towards a person. I'm tired of games that I used to play before. I'm now 23 and I don't want to fool around. I want to spend more of my time with my girlfriend. I love her so much and I'm so attached. Godddamit. I don't want to lose her. You feel me, guys? I miss her tho. She lives 5 hours away. We only see each other during days off from work. Yea I wanna be with her every single day.  Goooood, I'm fucking in love and I want to spend the rest of my life with her.

I think she visits reddit, but idk if she reads this sub. Yassssss I LOVE HER SO MUCH I WANNA DIE. ",actuallesbians
Fun little tinder story,"First time I open my tinder in a while and I match with this super cute chick. She looked pretty familiar but couldn’t put my finger on it. After some chatting it donned on me, Hours later. 
Like 7 or 8 years prior I had had a semi relationship (ie we talked for a short while and had maybe two dates) with her SISTER. 
Her IDENTICAL TWIN sister. 
Sooooo haven’t heard back from her after that discovery. 
Damnit tinder. ",actuallesbians
wtf is wrong with me???,"I'm so crazy about a Dutch woman, we call every day, we're going to the third date and the sex was so fucking amazing I think I'm very much in love ..

&amp;#x200B;

It happens that I bought 3 times a wrong ticket and spent more than 100 euros that will not return ..

&amp;#x200B;

I can not think straight, I'm very impulsive and doing everything wrong ..

&amp;#x200B;

When will this stop? will i become normal and rational again?",actuallesbians
"I started creating some shirts, let me know what you think reddit :)",,actuallesbians
#ProudToBe,,actuallesbians
She plays the guitar,"I’m fucking dead. 

",actuallesbians
Dating rant..sorry for the length. Any advice would be great,"So I met this lesbian on Tinder..I know maybe not the best place. It was pretty nuts the connection we had. We liked almost all the same things, such as poetry and weird crime stories. Really, we could talk about anything and she said alot of shit to me, such as I told my mom about you, I care, etc. I told her a lot of stuff too. I opened up about my past and mistakes I made and she did the same. Things got really intense and we started even sending naked photos to each other and sending long sexual explicit messages. We had a really intense sexual attraction to. She made a plan to meet me, put an exact date and everything. But one day she randomly ghosted me after I was talking about how I like to cook Spanish food. It was so random. 

&amp;#x200B;

I am wondering if it has something to do with her past. She hasn't dated in seven years and she revealed she was cheated on before. She mentioned I was kinda the first person she was dating in that time frame. She was sort of a player and besides that had a fucked past (adopted, abused by adopted mother, etc.). I also am wondering if maybe it has something to do with the fact I am bisexual, broke as fuck and live with my ex gf due to it. She had a bisexual ex who cheated on her with a man as well and maybe I remind her of that ex? I just don't completely understand why she ghosted me because she said I won't leave you and she was talking about how she is looking for a life partner. She left this poem on her fb talking about a broken heart, never feeling like this before, how it was too fast and how only time can tell. I messaged her that I care and if she needs to talk she can when she is ready. It's been a week since then. I have no idea if she will reach out again. Any thoughts?",actuallesbians
severe useless lesbian moment please help,"i’m going to get dinner with this girl, i know she’s gay, she knows i’m gay, but 8 months ago she had a girlfriend but so did i. and she referred to us going to dinner as a date but we joke around a lot so like maybe she was being funny or something. God i’m a stereotype but i genuinely don’t know is this a date or not 

UPDATE: we went and got poutine and she was so sweet and lovely and we have plans to go to the dog park next weekend !!",actuallesbians
Turns out my girlfriend and I are kind of useless lesbians.,"I posted previously [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/actuallesbians/comments/9abueb/relationshipsex_advice_appreciated/?st=JLQOQ41A&amp;sh=dc717c91) about my lack of sex life with my girlfriend, seeking advice on how best to talk to her. 

Well I finally got around to having a conversation with her about why we weren’t having sex. It turns out both of us were kind of waiting for the other to initiate and we’re actually on the same page as far as wanting more. I suppose some of it is that both of us are used to someone else taking charge (in previous relationships). 

It was just funny to me that her response was echoing how I felt. We’re going to try to be more open about when we want to have sex and hopefully things have improved! I feel much better and more secure. Thanks to those who gave advice. ❤️",actuallesbians
So I do this weird thing where...,"I can give super great advice to my straight guy friend on how to to flirt and get girls and talk to him about attractive girls yet, I can’t apply my own damn advice to my own damn life. Like I could tell straight guys how to get girls but I can’t tell myself how to get girls. Wat?",actuallesbians
Study buddy 😻😻😻,,actuallesbians
What does everyone do for a living?,"Personally, I have my own company that specializes in digital marketing and software development. It's frustrating at times being the HBIC, but I can choose my own clients, take time off whenever I want, and can even travel to North America/Europe once in a while on a clients dime. 

Turning the tables over to you, what do you do for a living? Do you like your job? Why or why not?

",actuallesbians
Kind of in a predicament right now,"Long story short, my friend really likes this girl at her university who’s made it pretty obvious that she’s looking for a girlfriend. They were talking a lot online, but now that the semester has started she’s been super depressed and my friend hasn’t seen much of her since orientation. We’re both following her on Instagram and she keeps posting stuff about being lonely and just not being in the best mental state because of it. 

My friend refuses to make the first move and honestly I don’t blame her cuz I know telling someone you like them can be super scary. At this point I’m just tempted to just message this girl and tell her how she feels about her but idk if that would make things worse. I’m not good with relationship stuff since I’m ace/aro but it’s just so frustrating to see her post stuff about no one liking her in that way when I know someone who’d be more than happy to date her.

So yeah I guess what I’m asking is should I try to be the ace wingman or should I just leave them alone? I don’t want to be too intrusive but at the same time I just want them to be happy and rOMANCE IS JUST TOO CONFUSING UGH",actuallesbians
What do you think of this Vice article on the paradoxical phenomenon of transmen experiencing a sudden attraction to men after injecting testosterone?,,actuallesbians
There aren’t enough WLW love stories,So fuck it. I’m going to write one. ,actuallesbians
One at a time ladies,"Throwaway account because I’m nervous 😬 Is this a good idea? Will it lead to something good or will I be disappointed or will I disappoint someone? Let’s find out...

Me:
•21
•5’1
•Hispanic 
•Texan
•Willing to lie about how we met 
•College senior (Graduating in December! 😁)

You:
•18-25?  
•&lt;5’3 
•Human
•USA (Are virtual cuddle sessions a thing? Idk, but I would like to have cuddle sessions in person...eventually)

Us:
•Power couple 
•Adorable
•An amazing actuallesbians love story

Interest: 
•All types of music (I’m the type to make you a mixtape, throw some Spanish songs in the mix to spice it up 😉)
•Shows (comedy, dramas &amp; crime)
•Food (I’ll try anything once)
•Pets (I have the cutest dog, seriously)
•You





",actuallesbians
Recommendations for other subreddits to subscribe to,I’m looking for recommendations for other subs to subscribe to! What are your favorite subs (besides this one). Thanks! ,actuallesbians
How do I ask out my trainer?,"There’s this girl that I’ve been quietly into for about 4 months. She’s a running coach at the gym I go to. Figured out the other day that she’s definitely a lesbian. We definitely know each other in passing, but I’ve always rushed off after her classes or training sessions because of work or other social obligations. 
I followed her on Instagram a while ago, and after finding out she was into women I finally messaged her today complimenting an outfit she posted about. She responded super positively and said that she was glad we connected on Instagram and followed me back. 
Now- there’s absolutely no way of knowing that I’m into girls based on my instagram/our very very limited interactions with each other. Is is off base to ask her out upfront and just suggest we go out? I’ve truly never been the one to ask out a woman- I can be painfully shy. I really admire her on so many levels. I am stuck on the fear of ultimately being weird around her or having to dodge corners out of embarrassment- but I guess that’s just part of it. 
I don’t want to make it weird as I absolutely love the gym that she works at, and her being a trainer definitely puts her at a “higher status.” 
Is there any subtle way to ask her out that is low stakes, but also let’s her know that I don’t mean as just friends?",actuallesbians
How did you know you were a lesbian?,In what moment was your sexual orientation confirmed? Just a young lady questioning my sexuality. Would love to hear your experiences,actuallesbians
They're really cute. That is all.,,actuallesbians
I feel like gay men don't like me?,"So I recently came to the realization that gay men probably don't like me and I don't know why? I'm a queer/ gay woman and in the past I've had gay men ""friends"" but I could always sense a tension between us and I always felt that our friendship wasn't genuine or one that would not last.  Even now, whenever I interact with a gay man, I feel like I am constantly being judged. This has happened so many times. 

Today for example,  I was looking at my fb and noticed that 2 gay men that I thought I was ""friends""  with( one of them I met studying abroad and we hung out  A LOT in the past, and the other was a co-worker that I used to also hang out with a lot too  we took a class together and also have a bunch of mutual friends)  unfriended me.   


So I am wondering, has anyone else felt this way?  Is it all in my head  and correlation doesn't equal causation? or is it that, to some extent, the stereotype that gay men and lesbians don't get a long is true? ",actuallesbians
fucking fuck me wow i love her,,actuallesbians
Is it bad that I want her to look at me like that?,,actuallesbians
Someone put my dream into words.,,actuallesbians
I'm going to ask her out tomorrow.,"It's been stressing me out since school started last week. I'd kinda known her for a few months and I felt like as soon as she saw me, she liked me. I have a tendency to be attracted to people who I think like me, but when I find out they don't like me, I'm not attracted to them anymore. I went on this whole mental journey all summer trying to figure out if I like this person. The more I interacted with them, the more I felt they liked me. It's body language, the way she laughs at my (trash) jokes, etc. I've seen pictures of people she's attracted to on Twitter and almost all of them look EXACTLY like me.

My main problem is figuring out if I do actually like them, which I think I solidified that I do a few days ago. I get the same physical reactions when I see her as I do with someone I'm attracted to, so I'm pretty sure I like her. She does a lot of things that aren't attractive to me, but that's not their fault. Most of the time, I can't tell if they're being themselves or if they're performing, like they're acting how they think they should act.

Another thing is I'm a very reserved person and I don't think she is and that worries me. I'm worried that I won't be able to handle how openly sexual she is, or if she won't like how reserved I am. Like I don't want to hold her back or anything. I'm reserved because of trauma that happened to me that she knows about, so I'm sure she's understanding, but I still worry.

I have no idea if I'm demisexual or just traumatized. I'm trying to get therapy but it's a little complicated because of financial dependency and all that. I posted here last year about a girl and someone said, ""Make sure you're physically attracted to her, because if not, don't date her."" The problem is, I'm not sure if I've ever been physically attracted to anyone. Maybe, I'm not sure. Again, I don't know if I'm demisexual or too afraid to feel my emotions because of trauma.

Another thing is that I don't know how to flirt, or at least my way of flirting doesn't seem like flirting to other people unless they've known me for a long time. Like I said, I'm very reserved. I try my best to flirt back and I'm proud when I do because it's really hard for me, but I realized, from someone else I dated for a week, that it isn't clear that I'm flirting. It just seems like I'm acting normal.

Idk this whole situation is stressing me out. A friend recommended to just tell her what's going on so that she's in the loop and doesn't hopefully feel like she's being lead on. So that's what I'm going to do tomorrow. I set out a whole plan about how I was going to ask her out in about a week or two from now, but this is stressing me so much that I'm not eating nearly as much as I should.

I WANT to date her, even though I'm a little worried that we don't ""click."" I don't know how it's supposed to go because the one person I dated for a week was the first person I dated and that was last year. I'm 21 now, so I feel like I'm really late to this whole dating thing, but I know a lot of people don't date for a while. I have no idea what I'm supposed to do other than be a friend but more intimate. They don't teach you what you're ""supposed"" to do when you're dating someone!

asdfghjkl I'm trying, yall. I'm trying not to be useless. I'll update yall when I tell her what's going on with me. Idk if I'm technically asking her out, but I'm just gonna tell her how I'm feeling. I hope it goes well.",actuallesbians
For any Dua Lipa fangirls who have not seen this yet...,,actuallesbians
Useless,"Ever since I accepted for myself that I’m into girls in the gay way, i’ve been developing crushes everywhere i go. It’s out of control. The gym, at work, at parties, the forking grocery store. 

My gym and my work crush are intense. I can’t stop thinking about them. 😭

Lezzielife has ruined my life.

Thanks for coming to my TED talk. ",actuallesbians
"Request: Favourite Artwork, artists or just your own stuff your proud of","Hallllo favourite community 💖

My request: to see some beautiful artwork, or find some new artists - especially if those artists are one of you!

Real reason I want this: I'm in school now (college), and the grind is on! I'm super stoked to learn things, but also need to let my thinky-brain turn off, by distracting it with my relaxy-creative brain. 
What better way to do that then to call on some other creaty-brains and gush about eachother and how amazing we all are! 

If... If that's allowed... If it's allowed, maybe we can do a random share day every now and again in the future too. Like writers- gathering and bobby-builders-handy-works and fashionable-foxes day.. and.. and... And. Stuff? 

Anyone on board? (Please halp me escape my thinky-brain.)",actuallesbians
Best friend crush,"So... I recently let a few of my closest friends in on my little gay secret about liking one of my friends (stupid I know; I'd been hiding in the closet for months and I needed to get it off my chest) something led to something else and my crush found out I liked  her (and I wasn't  straight) so I know our friendly relationship will never be the same, I aknowledge that we'll never be in a relationship but it's been a few weeks since the incident and I'm still not over her. I need someone to knock some damn sense into my gay-ass mind. Thx- a hormonal teen asking for help",actuallesbians
This is adorable,,actuallesbians
Is having the same amount of experience as your partner important?,I’m a virgin and I have no experience whatsoever.  I’m worried that the girl I meet someday will either think it’s weird or the sex isn’t going to work because a lot of people nowadays want someone with experience.  I feel so intimidated by people who have had lots of sexual partners because it feels like I can’t measure up to them sexually speaking 😓,actuallesbians
I'm not a creep I swear.,,actuallesbians
Prepping to be in a relationship,"Aw hey,

Ill be real- I’ve got a lot of baggage
Growing up a lesbian does come with a lot of emotional scarring. (I was sent to Jesus camp, family members frequently used slurs, conservative/religious disapproval of gay rights)

I’m tryna let go of all this internalized homophobia but I don’t know where I’m at. What are hints I can look for to see if I’m ready for a relationship?

I had a really awesome connection with a girl in high school but didn’t go far at all because I was cold to her after getting angry at myself 😞
I really don’t want to miss out on more opportunities like that because I didn’t take the time to acquire some self love first.

Any advice is appreciated 
Thanks 

",actuallesbians
How does flirting work with italian girls,"Just moved to Rome last month and tinder seems to not be used much here. I only know another lesbian from my class but where not really friends yet, so I'm kinda lost still... italian girls are very closed and I don't actually know how to recognize a lesbian here. Would like some tips :)",actuallesbians
My new response to everything,,actuallesbians
"Hi fellow raptors, I need some help!","I’ve decided to post this here instead of posting it in a male dominated talk thread, as you all may be able to sympathize with this a lot more (I also just discovered this sub yesterday, yay!) 

I am a 23 year old, recent grad who has never been in a relationship. I’ve never been kissed even and am so greatly inexperienced. I have this huge fear because of that inexperience any potential partner I meet will ***not*** want to deal with that. Which makes me feel like I’ve missed the boat, as I am only getting older. I also live in a rural area, am financially dependent upon my helicopter parents until I find a job (which is so damn painful). 

Now, let me tell you more about my parents. They’re both pretty left leaning but I am not sure if that applies to their daughter too, as I am also still in the closet. My fear about coming out is mostly directed at my mom, she has her own vision of how my life should go, marry a man, a couple kids and probably become a housewife like her. I am too petrified as this point to even think of opening up to her about my sexuality at the fear of blowing up so many preconceived notions she has for me. I personally want to wait until I move out and become financially independent. 

I’m a bit frazzled right now because I feel once I move out and am finally independent of them I’ll be too old in a potential partner’s mind to deal with as I am a hardcore virgin to relationships as well as in the bedroom. Thank you for reading this wall and letting me post this in this thread, hopefully some of you can sympathize with this too and maybe even other some advice and let me know that the sky is not falling!",actuallesbians
"Half of the girls I've dated were trans girls. Is this ""not normal""?","So I've dated 4 women semi-seriously, with my most recent relationship being actually serious. I didn't think about this until my best friend pointed it out. Out of the 4 women I've dated, 2 of them were trans, including my current girlfriend (who I've been with for almost 8 months now). Said friend thought it was weird. Is it weird? I don't think it is? Should I ditch this friend? ",actuallesbians
😂 I laughed way to hard at this.,,actuallesbians
Downvoted and Proud!,,actuallesbians
Looking for a sign she likes me,"So this girl...I’ve thought she was hot since I first saw her. I am pretty sure she is into girls. We got lunch a few days ago. She showed me her nails and I showed her mine. Both short. We were talking about nail polish color though. (Both femme) I don’t know if she was being super slick and that was like “look I’m into girls are you too?” If so, I’m totally stealing that move. Anyways...I feel like she’s kind of out of my league. I’ve put on some weight recently, so while I was in her league a year ago, I think I’m like a division below her now. Anywaysss....she definitely makes an effort to hang out with me. Every time i suggest hanging out she says yes. Am I reading too much into this? I feel like this is the opposite of useless lesbians...but just wanted to get this out because I was scrolling through this sub looking for any post that might be from her. I don’t have any reason to believe that she does or does not use reddit.",actuallesbians
Would you date someone with very-inconvenient-but-usually-not-too-serious illnesses?,"You meet a girl. You go on a few dates, you're attracted to her, and then you discover she's not as healthy as you thought. Let's say she's got PCOS and celiac disease. Both of which require her to keep on a strict diet, and rarely can she eat out at restaurants, your place, or friends' and families' places because of the risk of gluten cross-contamination (unlike the people who go gluten-free as a fad diet, people who have celiac disease can end up hospitalized if they ingest so much as a crumb of regular bread). So basically eating at her place, having a picnic, or bringing her own food to wherever she's going are the only options... And due to the PCOS, she might have trouble getting pregnant (or donating eggs to a partner) in the future, plus she has bouts of acne -- occasionally pretty bad acne.

How much would these issues lower your odds of pursuing a long-term relationship with her? Honesty is appreciated!",actuallesbians
THE COMMENTS ARE MAKING MY DAY,,actuallesbians
A little something from Tipping the Velvet by Sarah Waters,,actuallesbians
India Supreme Court Decriminalises Homosexuality,,actuallesbians
Anyone here part of a GSA?,"Hey, I’m going into a high school that has a GSA. I’m considering joining it; is anyone part of one? If so, what are the meetings and such like? And if you were in one formerly, please tell me what that was like! Thanks, people! 💝",actuallesbians
"The ""Adventure Time"" Finale Confirmed This Queer Relationship and Fans Are So Happy",,actuallesbians
Lesbian Brain/Feminist Brain meme,,actuallesbians
Dreams,"I want to be in a healthy poly relationship that allows me to do all that i want while letting my partners do what they want. 

I want to let my boyfriend continue working his dream job while I satisfy my wanderlust. 

I crave a safe place, deep in the woods, hard to find, and not a map. Somewhere I can go when I want to be alone, where I can have romantic rendezvous with my partners, where I can find myself one with nature once again. 

I want to plant willow trees and lay under their branches. 
  
I want a garden with flowers, fruits, herbs, and everything in between. 

I'd like to find someone as passionate as me and we can go save animals and raise awareness. 

I don't want to go college or reach other people's aspirations. I just want to write stories, watch movies, and listen to the rain. 

I want to get my strength back and put my body back on track. With my chronic illness it's hard to find people that understand and are patient. 

I want to collect anything that makes my heart happy and not worry about the costs. Anything from (smoking) glass to enamel pins. I'm always up for a conversation on that. My collections now seem so measly. 

I'd like to have a partner who wants to travel almost as much as me. Who'd love living in a camper we created for a week or two. Someone who enjoys the solitude of nature and our garden. 

I wish I could make enough money to afford more than one residency. 

I ache for good ole fashion attention; dancing together while the pie bakes, resting on each other while a movie plays, taking naps on a rainy day, playing board games because there's nothing good on tv, taking walks along the river and talking about the universe...I guess I could go on and on. 

Sometimes I wish I could start a cult just so I could see the good in people consistently. I want to have a family I can trust and depend on. I've been taking care of myself since I can remember, I'm tired. 

I want my big, giant, cozy bed to live in an alcove of soft fabric and fairy lights. 

I refuse to leave this world without building a house. It will be created in a way that benefits humans and their furry companions. 

What dreams do you have?",actuallesbians
"Recently realized I might not be straight, not sure what to do?","Background info:

I have been in a long-term relationship with a man for the past four years. He's the only man I've ever found attractive, and I just kind of ignored that fact until recently.

I wasn't very sexual, and somewhat recently I realized that all of fantasies I did have were where I was basically imagining it from the perspective of the man (I am not confused about my gender though) ans was always focusing on imagining the women naked.

Then I started noticing that I often involuntarily check women out, and I find that in order to have an orgasm with my boyfriend, I have to imagine a scenario where I am with a woman. Sometimes when we are kissing, I have gotten so into the fantasy that I have involuntarily gone to feel up my boyfriend's non-existent breasts and had to awkwardly cover for it.

Then I remembered that when I was younger, like toddler to kindergarten age, I would try to kiss all of my friends who were girls and when I was in elementary school I was often trying to get attention from the female teachers and TAs. I have also occasionally been jealous of my best friend getting a boyfriend, though I didn't think twice about why...

I enjoy being with my boyfriend and have enjoyed sexual activites with him in the past, but I have never found a different man attractive and never check them out whereas I feel a sort of weird, almost ashamed feeling when I see a woman. It's like a warmth rushing over me and I feel like I need to look away. I feel like I have a visceral reaction to their body shape whereas men, besides my boyfriend, don't do much for me. I find the male physique generally boring, but also am not generally interested in sex.

I don't consume much porn, but all of the porn I do look at is just naked women, and I generally just find myself very drawn to other women, but it could also just be a desire for a close friendship. I don't know.

Am I gay, or could I be bisexual maybe even straight? How do I know for sure?

(I copy pasted/almagamated some posts from a different sub who pointed me this way just fyi)",actuallesbians
My first experience was horror. She cheated me.,I was in a long distance relationship for last 19 days. In a dating app LGBT+ we talked for the first time. After getting her i uninstalled the app from my phone.    That was my first relation. She used to treat me nice. I was in love for the first time. She used to say i am her whole world. Tomorrow night i was bored so i installed the app again and started reading our first conversations there. Then i visited her profile and found out bio. She mentioned someone else as her wife there. I cried a lot. I asked her about this. She started to give lame logics . I blocked her from everywhere.  But i am missing her. ,actuallesbians
Should I go for it?,"There’s a girl who likes me, we’ve never met in real life, but we video chat all the time. I’ve known her about 7 or 8 months now and we really vibe. I’m just not sure if I’m ready for a relationship especially a long distance one. Plus I often have a hard time deciphering my emotions. Sometimes I find it hard to tell if what I’m feeling is platonic or romantic. She asked if I want to at least try and a part of me does but another part of me isn’t sure... I’m not worried about myself getting hurt I just don’t want to end up hurting her because I really care about her. Please let me know your thoughts? 

TLDR: a girl likes me and I might like her what do ",actuallesbians
"Help, my class is full of pretty girls and I can’t stop looking at their hair",,actuallesbians
Best way to clean toys? Warning: TMI ahead,"My girl and I thought we had pretty good hygiene when it came to our toys (mild soap and water), but we both seem to keep getting bacterial infections, yeast infections, strep, thrush, etc.  It's like we're passing it back and forth (and part of that is because one time we had sex too soon after a yeast infection 😬)

Does anyone have tips on the best way to keep our toys clean?  We have a magic wand and some silicone dildos.

Thanks!",actuallesbians
People who pull stuff like this piss me off,,actuallesbians
When it’s been so long since you last got laid.,,actuallesbians
How to chat up women as a woman and is it really that terrible that I'm bi?,"I'm positive that this has been asked a million times, and I did search for it, but the terms I used didn't pull up much.

I knew I was into women when I was 16. I had a really close female friend that I loved in a different way than I loved my other lady friends. I also knew she wasn't into women at all, and I was growing up in the rural south, so I shoved all that into the shit to deal with later box. 

Well, it's later. And I don't really know what I'm doing. I'm in a poly relationship, and would very much like to learn how to navigate the field as a woman interested in women. 

I feel like a lot of the flirting I do could be easily confused as things women just do. Obviously there's no I'm into women bat signal (of there is please tell me), but after a lifetime of non-participation I'm not really sure where to start. Most of my flirting could easily be interpreted as just things women do, and I don't want to end up with lesbian sheep syndrome. But I also don't want to shoot a good friendship in the foot because I was weird.

Another worry is that my only current long term partner is a man. I've heard a lot about how strictly lesbian women are against dating women in relationships with men. I get it, on dating sites I see so many people looking for someone to ""spice up their relationship."" While I'm not opposed to a unicorn, I'm way more interested in developing my own relationships. 

Tldr: I'm lost and extremely appreciative of any links, anecdotes, or resources anyone has.",actuallesbians
Extremely disappointed with myself after last night and not sure what to do,"So I’ve be single for quite a while and as lonely as it gets it’s what I have come to accept as I’ve only been in one, fairly toxic, relationship and literally never had anyone be attracted to me

So for the last 2 years I haven’t felt any attraction to anyone which is fantastic, until last night that is however. I went to a social event last night and there was a woman there that I got along with well and this morning I realised that I was thinking about her the whole drive home and I’m so annoyed and disappointed in myself because I think I may be attracted to her and I’m worried if I see her more at future events is may become a full-on crush

What can I do to make sure that I never feel that way for her as the only thing I can think of is avoiding her which means avoiding those social events which are half my socialising as it is so I don’t want to loose that

Ugh darn my brain 😕",actuallesbians
Victory for love,,actuallesbians
Wing man grandpa vs useless workaholic Lesbian,"While waiting for my coffee, I decided to make light chit chat with the sweet old man I see in the cafe often.

Old man : Why Hello love! Come sit ! I have a very serious question for you. *cheeky grin* 

So...Do u have a boyfriend?"" 

Me: Shakes head. ""I'm gay.""

Old man : ""Oh a Girlfriend then?"". 

Me: Shakes head. 

Old man : ""Casual date?"" 

Me: Shakes head. 

Old man : ""Good god child! How about a pet? Do u at least have a pet dog or something?"" 

Me: Shakes head. 

Old man: ""Well what do you have? Coz I've got quite a few gorgeous grandkids your age.😉 ""

Me: ""Paper work. Lots and lots of paperwork...""

Old man: *Blank Stare*",actuallesbians
"This is like number 3 on ""ways I want to die""",,actuallesbians
i'm scared,"I'm 18year old girl and im dating a boy, and for a couple of months i've been more or less anxious bc ive started questioning my sexuality. I've identified as bi since i was about 14 even tho i didnt really experience any sexual attraction to girls or boys, i just felt that i could fall in love with both. When i actually started experiencing sexual attraction, it was mostly toward girls but i was still pretty curious about boys and they made me feel pretty strongly unlike girls, who i didnt seem to be interested outside of my fantasies. Later on I started experiencing sexual attraction towards men too, at least i thought i did? Seeing men naked or something doesnt do a lot for me, it looks nice and i feel a little something but actually being with them (or at least with my boyfriend) is great and feels nice.
Everything was p okay until i started reading about compulsory heterosexuality, and now it has become kind of like an obsession of mine. I'm constantly checking if im actually attracted to my boyfriend or if im just faking it, i'm scared i'm faking it and not even noticing it or that i'm in denial about it. This anxiety almost made me broke up with my boyfriend and i dont wanna go thru that ever again bc i truly feel like i love my boyfriend, i just dont know that what kind of love it is anymore. I've gone thru my childhood and if i have been attracted to anyone and are they girls or boys or what. I realised i didnt have a lot of crushes on anyone growing up, but i did have some sexual thoughts about women as a child, which i didnt have of men. 

I'm just really freaking out, I dont want to lose my boyfriend, but i dont know what to do. I'm afraid that if I'm gay I'd have to  break up with him. And I'm sorry if this doesnt belonghere but i just thought if someone who used to be in my situation could tell how they knew their attraction was real or wasnt. ",actuallesbians
How long does it take you to get over a crush?,"I spent a month working on a farm (which was a great experience btw) and met this girl which I ended up intensely crushing on over the few weeks I spent getting to know her. Even though she said she was straight I could swear there was some chemistry going on between us that was not just one sided. Those deep intense stares and light touching I really ended up falling hard. Like the useless lesbian I am, I never did anything about it and there is probably no chance that I will ever see her again. 

That was 2 months ago and I am still thinking about her everyday. Even though I go out with friends and try to chat to new people I am really struggling to get her out of my head. There was this crazy chemical charge between us and its rare for me to find that connection.

Does anyone else have trouble getting over crushes even months later after not seeing them? ",actuallesbians
Hello! Looking for people to chat with,"I just want to meet girls who understand me since I’m only friends with straight girls, I’m 19 btw!",actuallesbians
Actually though 😂,,actuallesbians
Definitely Uplifting News,,actuallesbians
Thought you guys would appreciate this,,actuallesbians
The lesbian dating pool is small as it is. It’s even smaller when you’re not into femmes. 🤦🏻‍♀️,Any other femmes who are not into femmes feel the struggle? ,actuallesbians
Thursday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
My girlfriend &amp; I made this video about finding coordinating outfits for a wedding. She’s the one in the suit 😍,,actuallesbians
What the heck do I do now,"Recently, I found out that the girl I like likes me back over text, and I think that she would be willing to date me. I want to talk to her about what we want in a relationship, but I can’t seem to find the right opportunity to start a conversation with her or bring it up in one. The time never seems right.

I just want to tell her everything about how I feel in person, but I can’t find a way to make it not awkward or confrontational. What would be the best way to say this? I’m a young useless lesbian and I have no idea what to do!",actuallesbians
Online Dating and Sexting,"Hi, I'm just wondering if any of you have ever experienced this...

I started talking to a girl on Okcupid yesterday, and the conversation has already turned sexual. I admit, I probably helped to guide it in that direction, but does it ever really progress into anything serious? I'm looking for a real relationship and not just a hook-up, and she knows this and says she's looking for the same thing. But I can't help but feel a little put off by the sexting. Am I just overthinking things and worrying too much?",actuallesbians
Capitan Marvel is really hot,,actuallesbians
wlw/mlm solidarity in Overwatch.,"So it's becoming a thing for me to spot as many fellow gay/bi/anything people in-game. so far I have spotted two by guessing just this week and also one last week. and before that, many many more. so now i have a new account and I gave it the best name possible for the sole purpose of finding even *more*. it's liberating. I swear this will become my primary way of becoming friends. seeing as my discord is already 90% gay gals anyway.

[https://imgur.com/a/9sPIGfi](https://imgur.com/a/9sPIGfi)",actuallesbians
Finally broke the cycle,,actuallesbians
"istg, women in a suit murder me. 😭",,actuallesbians
Change - Audre Lorde,,actuallesbians
Best Avenger by Far,,actuallesbians
Could anyone recommend me some literary fiction about lesbians?,"Please, include a brief summary, or at least tell me what you liked about it.",actuallesbians
I'm weak.,,actuallesbians
Have any of you ever dated a girl with a foot fetish? What would your reaction be if a girl told you she had a foot fetish?,"I've never heard of another lesbian who actually has one and most girls I know think of them as a creepy straight dude thing, so I'm very eager to hear some lesbian opinions on the matter! 



Thanks :)",actuallesbians
Do you also feel that LGTB women love other women more than men do?,"I have embraced my bisexuality a couple of months ago and I feel like, for the first time in my life, I do not have to worry so much about my growing hair or stretch marks or that pair of panties... And I also do not care at all about those things on any other girl.

Actually, I love all these ""ugly"" things! All these little things that we are bombarded everyday on ads that we have to remove or change. I feel like we have been taught all our lives to love men's hair and suddenly, yeah, I actually love it in women too! I love every single part of them.

I now don't get most of the stigma that patriarchy lays on us and seems to me that LGTB women do love women way more than straight men do.

And yeah I know everyone is different and there are women who actually do not like hair or whatever, but I'm mostly encountering queer women who thinks this too and I feel that it's awesome.",actuallesbians
First Date!,"Tonight is my first (ever) date with a lady who I am physically and intellectually attracted to and I just wanted to share! 

Wish me luck! ",actuallesbians
Did this happen for anyone else?,"When I was 7 my mom got a job working as a bartender, every bartender was a gay woman except my mother. Whenever I had the chance I would ask my dad to take me there to see her and so we could have dinner there as well. 

I loved all of those women because they were all so nice and caring.

Well I came out a year and a half ago and my mother was perfectly fine with it, in fact she had known since I was 4. After I came out she started to tell me all the things that her co-workers would tell her: ""your daughter's gay ya know?"", ""tell me when she comes out."" ect. She always had the nicest responses. One time a customer asked why she was okay with what they were saying, her response was ""that's my little girl, so what if she likes other girls, that doesn't change who she is because she will always be my little girl."" 

Imagine how confused she was when I told her I had a ""boyfriend"", we were ""together"" for a year before I came out. I put those 2 words in quotes because the most ""couple"" like thing we did was hold hands. 

But my question is, did anyone else have a gay/lesbian person in their life that may have helped your parents realize that being gay is just how some people are and that there is nothing wrong with it?

Also I was 14 when I came out.",actuallesbians
It's all about finding common ground.,,actuallesbians
"""BFFs""",,actuallesbians
How do lesbians have one night stands?,So I’m a lesbian (21). How do lesbians have protected sex when it’s a one night stand type of deal? I know that for heterosexuals they can use condoms and I know about dental dams but they are really hard to get and my campus only offers male condoms. I have had 2 sexual female partners (was in a committed relationship with them) and we never used dental dams. I’m single and tbh I think I want to sleep around and experience what that’s like even though I know sex can’t fill the void. I was just wondering how lesbian women typically go about having protected sex because I know sexual health is really important. ,actuallesbians
Brie Larson as Captain Marvel is giving me FEELINGS!,,actuallesbians
How do you meet other lesbians in rural areas?,"How the heck do you find other lgbt people (more specifically other lesbians) when ya live in a farming town in central/NE Kansas? All I can think of are gay bars but there are literally none of those in my area. There's a yearly pride event nearby but going to pride to pick up chicks just seems kinda weird haha.

The worst part is I do occasionally see other gays around, but it's either all dudes or people in relationships. I don't get how they met. I feel so isolated not knowing how to meet other lgbt people, like I'm going to end up growing old and alone surrounded by cows and farmland and possibly 20 cats :/",actuallesbians
At least she’s supportive lol,,actuallesbians
Online dating while in the closet ...,"Does anyone use the app Her? 

I was away last week and considered getting it since I was in a new city, but you have to connect to a fb or Instagram account.... I’m still in the closet so I was too nervous about being outed...

Would like to know if anyone here likes using it, and how private it is :) ",actuallesbians
Article 377:UN welcomes SC decision.,,actuallesbians
i love her,that’s all,actuallesbians
Wishing I could pull off suspenders but it just not meant to be,,actuallesbians
Would you settle down with someone that has a long term minimum wage job?,"I'm curious because I am a hotel receptionist and I imagine that even in my 40's and 50's I will still be a hotel receptionist. 

Although I love reading, educating myself and intelligent conversation- I'm not someone who has mastered lifes practicalities and it is unlikely that I will ever find well paying work or develop the discipline and time management skills to both work and attend college. 

Instead I've learned to carve out a meager independent existence for myself. I take care of myself but I live simply and spend carefully. 

Also- I enjoy being a hotel receptionist in a weird way and have no aspiration to be a manager. 

But I know some people are really judgmental when it comes to lack of college education, career aspiration, or money and I check all 3 so I'm interested in people's opinions.",actuallesbians
[NSFW] I write lesbian erotica and I'm looking for feedback,"*IF THIS POST IS NOT ALLOWED, PLEASE REMOVE, THANKS!*

Hey everyone, so I've been writing all my life but I've been writing an ongoing series for the last 4 or so years (yeah, I know) and I'm looking for feedback of any and all sorts. I've just submitted part 7, which should be up in the next few days.

If anyone is interested or willing to help me out, please check out my literotica story - Nova's Journey.

https://www.literotica.com/s/novas-journey

Aside from my stuff, if you enjoy erotica, that website is magic and I highly recommend it to anyone looking for free reading materials. ",actuallesbians
"“A kiss across the ocean” - allegorical painting from the cover of a 1922 Portuguese magazine, celebrating the closeness of Portugal and Brazil.",,actuallesbians
Dating Application,"Here's my shot at a dating application:

I'm a 21 year old barista in school to get my Bachelors in Social Work

I plan on going to law school after I graduate to get a J.D in Public Interest Law, cause mama loves nothing more then providing a platform for those who need it most

I'm a 5""6 redhead with thick thighs and unruly curly hair

Back in the day I was a punk artist with mohawk a who would sneak out at night and paint street murals in the city.
 
I have a dog who is my child and I love her more then life

I stunned everyone who knew me and joined a sorority in college, and I've met some truly badass visionary women through it. All of my sorority sisters support my gay ass and I love them for it.

I can speak decent Polish, shitty French, and garbled Latin

I will always listen to your problems, validate your emotions, and I've been told I give good back rubs.

My cooking isn't restaurant quality but I make breakfast food with a lot of love

I have four tattoos and many more to come

In summary:
20 something former punk activist with a passion for intersectional feminism, Dana Scully, and other women.",actuallesbians
"TIL Cartoon Network banned an episode of Cow and Chicken called ""Buffalo Gals"" which allegedly implied lesbian stereotypes including the Gals being mistaken for men and the line ""Oh! the Buffalo Gals, a motorcycle riding gang that randomly breaks into people's homes and chews on their carpets.""",,actuallesbians
This picture of Stephanie Beatriz and Natalie Morales is everything,,actuallesbians
Hey since we’re talking about our gay lives ima just leave this here bc I’ve lost count of how many times I’ve watched it,,actuallesbians
To my first love,"You came and moved your seat all the way from across the room to sit next to me in French class. I didn't really think much of it because I'm actually oblivious to everything. Then one day, I saw you were upset about your class and comforted you. I helped you with your French and I talked about my birthday. You asked me for my number and we hung out at a cozy cafe and at the beach. I still remember when I picked you up in my car. You asked me if we could hang out on Valentine's Day. I said ok. I didn't have any other plans so why not? (useless lesbian) You ran to my door with the dorkiest smile on your face and a handful on my favorite flowers, red carnations. I loved carnations because they remind me of my late great-grandmother. We went on a huge adventure downtown, meeting so many people, blasting music down the highway at night and forgetting about all of pain and problems. That Valentine's was probably the best day of my life. You came back to my apartment that night and confessed your feelings for me. Maybe I should have rejected you that night, knowing I was going to lose you. But I confessed my feelings for you too. We spent that night on the floor coloring and listening to Courtney Barnett. Later in the year, we had our first kiss, made love and drove across the state together going on adventures. I realized that true love means loving the parts that aren't the best and forgiving one another and being compassionate. We were too young and both had trauma from our past that caused us pain. It was too short. When you left my apartment for the last time, I felt so empty. When I saw you for the last time at the cafe we previously went on so many dates to, you looked so cold. You told me you were moving that Friday. I think the relationship was too much for us. We rushed it. I'm trying to heal and I love being single, but I can't help and think about you. I'm forever grateful for you and I wish you the best. Je t'aime.",actuallesbians
If I could have chosen...,"Hello.

I love Against Me! and am inspired by LJG's music and visibility as a trans gal myself.

Favourite song of theirs is The Ocean and the following is my version of that really good song: let the music serve you.

If I could have chosen, where god would hide his heaven,


I would wish for it to be in the salt and swell of the ocean
Carried by the currents to all continents' shores


Reaching into depths where the sun’s light has never shown
Mixed with algae and coral,


Breathed in by sharks and dolphins
Sailed by tanker ships, private yachts, swam in by a Taurus
Working its way up through inlets, lakes, and rivers, swamps, and estuaries
Down through limestone into the aquifer
Purified by the county, pumped through pipes and out faucets
Filled into a glass to meet the thirst of our children.


If I could have chosen, I would have been born a woman
My mother once told me she would have named me Laura
I would grow up to be strong and beautiful like her,
One day, I’d find an honest woman to make my wife...

We would have two children, build our home on the mountains of Canada
Our family would spend cold winter days in the snow together...


The snow would get stuck in her hair as we built snowmen and made dreams and
we would know we loved each other without having to say it,

At night, we would sleep roasting by an open fire
Letting the cool Canadian air soothe the distance between us.

There is an ocean in my soul where the waters do not curve.

Thank you.

&lt;3",actuallesbians
Considering slowly coming out,"A few days ago I posted here about how scared I am to come out. ...while that still stands, I'm at least going to try to start the process. I just like this girl too much to let my own closetedness push her away. Last night I mustered up the courage to hold her hand while I was driving and her friend was in the back seat. I figured there's no point in hiding my affection since he's a close friend of hers and already knows that something is going on between us. She bought me a hamburger so I got bold enough to give her a kiss for it. 

She text me later that night saying that I was brave. She knows how hard it is for me to even think about coming out, so that meant a lot. I'm going to try getting comfortable in front of her close friends, then my close friends, and see where it goes from there. It'll take some time. I was stressing a bit just from holding her hand in the car, but I did it and I'm happy I did. ",actuallesbians
LDR girlfriend becoming super close to someone who has a crush on her,"Hello, 

I'm going through rough times in my LDR, &amp; am really hoping for words of advice.

My gf (X) lives in the u.s and I live in the uk. We have been together nearly a year, and are working twds closing the gap in January. 

Since Feb, X has become a lot closer to a friend (Y) - someone she considered dating before she met me. They text and hang out a lot, and a few months ago, X admitted that Y most probably has a crush on her. The issue was skimmed over and they continue to become closer. 

Every time I bring up the crush it ends in an argument, which drives me and X further apart. I really loathe feelings of jealousy but I can't help but wonder if I do have something to feel weird about, given the context. 

Anyone been thru anything similar? All words appreciated. 

tl;dr 
How do you deal with a close friend of your girlfriend's having a crush on her whilst you are in a long distance relationship? ",actuallesbians
Talking to girls is hard,"I just made a flirty comment on a girls picture and I think I’m going to throw up/have a panic attack 🤢

Whyyyy are they so cute and sweet and hot and ughhh 

I don’t think I’m ever going to log in to that account again. Ever. Just to be safe. ",actuallesbians
my queer little heart is so happy to be queer today!,"Got a modcloth catalog in the mail and Hayley kiyoko was on the cover, with a nice little write up inside. Then ten minutes later I found out marceline and princess bubblegum sealed the deal. What a day to be alive!",actuallesbians
So I watched the Adventure Time finale...,"...and now I feel like someone just broke up with me.

I mean. The Marcy-Bonnie thing was perfect, but I'm still bummed and already miss it. Now I just have Steven Universe, I guess. Until that's over, too. I don't even know what I'm going to do when Steven Universe breaks up with me. 

Here's to hoping for more epic, progressive, LGBTQ+ inclusive cartoons in the future.",actuallesbians
First Date Question,"i have a question--some say forget it---but here goes so i'll know how to proceed. i have a first lunch date this weekend that i met online. great so far. it seems she's FB friends with someone i used to talk with and who's now seeing my latest ex (we broke up a couple of months ago). all of these were met online and we all live in different cities not close to each other. i don't really get along with my date's friend/ex's new squeeze. if all goes well on this date and i like the girl, i want to know how she knows this ""friend"" since we don't get along and seeing my ex. depending on the answer, i might not want to pursue this girl. i'll chalk it up as a nice lunch and move on. should i ask? some friends say yes and some say leave it alone and go with how the 2 of us vibe. not to worry about the other 2. BUT, in time if they are truly friends, we're bound to have to deal with each other.  thoughts? ",actuallesbians
crazy tinder date,"It's been a week since I met a girl in Tinder while I was traveling to Holland (I live in Germany).

We woke up everyday for 4 hours talking about everything, a fantastic connection. We finally met on Sunday for 3 hours. (both traveled halfway).

She liked me very much and offered to sleep in my house on Tuesday and stay until Wednesday night.

I am a student and my apartment is very precarious, I had to buy several things and adapt.

She traveled 6 hours to my house by bus.

she brought me some wine.

We talked again about everything, we drank a lot, I prepared a dinner, we smoked a lot, we vaporized, we fucked a lot, a lot, a lot. I lied at work and I just missed it to stay with her.

She told me that she was straight and that 2 years ago she is in the bisexual vibe, and she licked me in a way that seemed like a born talent, besides, she seems very lesbian.

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway

Balance of the night:

Several bottles of wine, we broke my sofa, we broke my bed, I recited a poem about crying vaginas, I laughed so hard that I got to fart.

I had the most intense and funny date of my life with a person I've seen once in a lifetime.

&amp;#x200B;

did u have that feeling where u want a person every minute with you? i am suffering with this distance",actuallesbians
Thank you Tumblr for summing up my every want in Frozen 2.,,actuallesbians
Why do girls offer their numbers and not reply?,"(A bit of a long post, sorry :/) 

TLDR: Met this girl. She indirectly approached me multiple times. Then offers me her number but does not reply. So what's the point? Someone explain this mind game LOL

So I met this girl at an edm festival this weekend. Initially, my friend (male) and I were dancing (very platonically) towards the front of the main stage. Upon the beat dropping, a girl subtly joins me while her friends were dancing near us. I thought she was pretty cute but didn't think much of it and went back to doing my own thing. She stepped back to dance with her friends while, I remained where I was originally with my other friend next to me. I was a bit intoxicated but I noticed she would indirectly try to get my attention by showing up and dancing closer to me while my friend and I were dancing (friend and i were dancing apart from each other so there were no romantic vibes.) So, she does this the first time and then introduces herself. Ok, whatever. Then does this 2 MORE TIMES, then asks where my friends were (maybe to see if the guy I was with was my boyfriend?). Second time, we ended up trading bracelets (it's a rave thing). 

I decided I wanted to try my luck and confirm my suspicions of her because who knows , maybe this girl is being friendly and I'm getting the wrong idea. I stood behind her, leaned closer and eventually had my hands kind of close to her waist (where you would feel that someone's about to touch you but I'm not actually touching her). She leans closer as well and puts her hands on my wrists, to place on her waist but I misinterpreted that as her not being comfortable and trying to take my hands off her. LOL stupid drunk self didn't process it correctly. Anyway, I pulled away from her because I didn't think she was cool with it. 

After more dancing, her friends finally signaled her to leave because they wanted to go. So, she was in a position where she was standing next to me but didn't move for a bit. I decided to break the silence and ask, ""Oh, do you have to go?"" She's like, ""Yeah.."" Then out of no where, she casually offers me her number, ""Oh, here's my number."" I didn't even expect it. I thought she was just going to say goodbye and that was that. LOL my friend decides to swoop in and say, ""I'll take your number."" and I'm like ""No, don't give it to him. He's just being thirsty."" So I continued the conversation by asking if she'll be here at the same venue tomorrow and whatnot when she wrote her number down on my phone. Then, we said our goodbyes. 

The next day, I texted her - ""Hey \_\_\_ , It's \_\_\_\_ . It was nice meeting you yesterday. I'll be at \_\_\_ at X time. Let me know if you wanted to meet up!"" Ya know, plain, simple and the ball is totally in her court, yes or no type of answer. 

Unfortunately, **she didn't reply** but I just left it at that and did not send another text. I also don't believe in coming off too strong or desperate. Maybe, she drunkenly gave me her number but she definitely seemed more sober than I was - gauging on her mannerisms and gestures. Another note is that I called her so she'd have my number too when she wrote down her number on my phone.

&amp;#x200B;

I do not understand why girls would offer their number and not reply. It's so pointless and feels like such a waste of time. Anyway, thoughts on this situation ? Have you done something similar, if so, why? - like actually offering your number and then ignoring the person cause I understand why girls just give out their numbers when asked.

",actuallesbians
I held hands!,"I have been with my spouse (boy) for 20 years.  We just opened our relationship.  Good happy mutual communication and consent stuff.  Anyway I went on a hike yesterday with a girl and we held hands!!  Baby steps, but it made me super happy.  My first crush was a girl and I have suppressed it for so long.  

Thanks for being a safe place for this sapphic poly ace. 💕",actuallesbians
lesbian? bi?? straIGHT??!????,"ok so. basically for a good year now i’ve id’d as a lesbian and that’s been all fine and dandy. there were two years before that where i id’d as bi. i’ve had (limited) experiences w both men &amp; women.

i thought i was a lesbian cause i read up on comp het and it seemed to tick all the boxes (men seem alright in fantasy but irl it’s a bit..... meh). i’ve engaged in the wlw community and honestly it seemed to be going SWELL but now i’m panicking

men don’t catch my eye. ever. and like when i talk to them i get a bit nervous/fluttery i guess but i figured that was just cause they’re new people. any time they would show interest in me i would immediately try and shut it down (this is back when i id as bi). whereas girls i look at a lot and notice their bodies and stuff. except now i’m panicking that it’s only because of aesthetic appeal.

i think i’m p super in love w my best friend but idk. that’s a post for another day. but the reason i bring this up is that i think about her a lot and usually i just kind of want to fall into her and kiss her stupid face blah blah. but also i think that another friend has feelings for ME and whenever i get those vibes i get. super uncomfortable. i thought it was cause i don’t like her like that but now i’m worried it’s because she’s a GIRL

anyway the reason this is all fucking with my head is p tmi so read on only if ur ok with that. basically i was getting myself off as u do after a long day &amp; nothing was really getting me going so out of the blue i conjured up a bit of chris hemsworth and my body just. went nuts. like. niagara falls. and anyway now i’m panicked that i’m actually straight/attracted to men and i just convinced myself i was a lesbian to feel different or be special or because my subconscious thought it was more ‘on brand’ for me. and i don’t NOT want to be a lesbian because then i feel like i’m supporting stereotypes that it’s just a phase and also i already came out to a bunch of ppl &amp; basically i just wanna know if i can test this somehow. like is there an online quiz ?????? or can some bi girls/lesbians tell me how they feel when they’re attracted to someone??? do i just have to go date a bunch of people and see what feels right ??????????

this is a really dumb post and i probably am a lesbian but i would appreciate some advice all the same

ps:
experience w a woman: amazing. fireworks. or in hindsight at least. think i was too shocked to fully process at the time

experiences w men: um ??? much more focused on the mechanics. plus i guess it kind of made me feel sexy to be wanted by them but i don’t remember being v attracted to them. they were just there. this should be more telling to me than it is",actuallesbians
I've seen so many fellow butch lesbians at the Inbound Conference in Boston today.,Are any of you Redditors?,actuallesbians
Interesting article from Vice about a woman who worked as a lesbian escort,,actuallesbians
Straight girls are WILD,"I went to a party at my coworker’s house Saturday night and THREE OF MY STRAIGHT ASS FEMALE COWORKERS TOLD ME THEY WANTED TO HOOK UP WITH ME

It started out with one of them saying how they were glad I was at the party and they were talking about me beforehand. She was like “yeah we were talking about how pretty you are and how we all think you’d be such a good kisser! Girls are so much better to kiss than guys” etc. and I was like oh that’s sweet thank you. Then another of them misheard how much information was revealed and was like “are you talking about how we all want to hook up with you?” 

I was like uhhhh WHAT 

They explained that they were all talking about how much they wanted to hook up with me and I was like “you guys are being the stereotype of drunk straight girls rn” and they were like nooo we were talking about this before we drank! And they kept fuckin talking about it they were like “oh yeah we were telling our Lyft driver on the way over here that there’s this really cute girl there that we all want to hook up with!” 

Then they kept asking whether or not I would hook up with them all and I kept saying that I couldn’t answer the question because they’re my COWORKERS but I was finally like okay yeah I’d hook up with all three of you (bc tbh they’re all hotties) and then they TRIED STARTING A GAME OF SPIN THE BOTTLE!!!!!! 

I didn’t let it happen because 1) they’re my coworkers and 2) I’m very weary of hooking up with straight girls even though that seems kind of fun lol

My ego was definitely boosted to say the least, even though I didn’t let anything happen. Should I fall for the trap? There’s another party at a coworkers’ house next weekend........ 

Also the best part is that one of my male coworkers was trying to swoop on one of the girls but he spent the whole night watching them fawn all over me ",actuallesbians
"My sister hooked me up with her friend i've had a crush on for years last night for my birthday, i'm confused, crushing hard, and I need to vent.","Alrighty so, lets begin.

Me and my sister are real close, talk about all our trouble and all that, we are tight. She grew to be a bit more social than I, I can count my friends on my fingers, if my hands were mangled and I only had 3 fingers.

She has one friend though, Irene and I've crushed on her since we were all freshmen in highschool, she is gorgeous and what not and she fits the ""Big tiddy goth gf "" trope, ect.. which is the type of stuff im attracted to, my sister knows this, and i've said crude things about her like, I wish she'd sit on my face you know dumb stuff, but one conversation I let it slip that I like her feet, and that they are cute, which brings us to the next part.

For my party it was just me, (She brought her friends) Her and Irene, we went swimming, did all the usual for half assed parties, i'm not too into celebrating, and no alcohol at all was consumed.

So now we get to the end of the night, it's just us two at my sisters house, I live with her since we moved out of our parents house, they help with rent ect.

Regardless we are watching it follows, i'm sitting next to my sister and Irene next to her, when my sister blurts out ""take your feet off the counter, your giving her (me) a free show"" 
To my absolute fucking horror, I shot my sister a DEATH glare and she just winks at me. I am so fucking grateful it was dark because I was probably as red as a tomato.

Anyways my sister keeps saying stuff like that all night and Irene would just sarcastically respond to them, until my sister says that i'm really good at foot massages, and that I could give Irene one, to which she agree'd and layed her feet across both of us and onto my lap. 

So at this point I am dying inside, I am not the type of girl who is outgoing, if my sister has friends over I will not leave my room because i'm either shy or have social anxiety, so not only do I have the CRUSH of my life doing something that up until this point I can only fantasize of I can't even bring myself to do it, until she starts begging and I finally do.

So we continue to watch the movie, and at this point i'm just feeling them and not really massaging them with her staring at me the entire time, and I have no clue what to look at so I awkwardly just look around like a moron, and try to hide my embarrassment in the fact that my sister is literally in the room with us.

When my sister left a moment to use the bathroom, she scooted over to my side and asked me if I was okay and I said yeah, and she told me that what I was doing felt really good, and that she hasn't met many girls who are into feet, then asks me if she can touch me, to which I say okay, and at this moment I can feel my heart throbbing in my throat, my ears feel like they are going to explode and there is a clicking in my chest, and then she just started rubbing me down there, my sister came back, and continued watching the movie and told me to be as loud as I want (wtf?) 

Anyways I can barely even feel it i'm so nervous, this is the FIRST time i've touched a girl let alone been this far, and she took pj's off and my panties and at this point i'm basically a blob of jello, when she just starts going down on me, and I must have sounded like an idiot because my sister kept saying ""easy easy its her first time"" because I was REALLY feeling it at this point, and just kept staring, and said in a joking manner that it was fortunate I shaved because I had a really cute vagina.

Anyways, I came she got up and resumed her old position with her feet on my lap, she told me to kiss them and I did for the remainder of the movie.

So yes, i'm still shaking, I cried afterwards when everyone was asleep not because I didn't want it but, because I don't know. My sister just watched me have sex, my crush just had sex with me, but I feel like it was out of pity maybe. I'm not ugly, but I am not in the same league as this girl, i'm nowhere even close. I'm just waiting for her to wake up so I can talk to her about it. but i'm not even sure it's a good idea.. I'm not a virgin anymore but i'm confused about it. Was this bad? also i'm sorry if this sounds like a cheap porno, but it's not. Nothing super glamorous happened I was the only one with clothing gone and I only lasted around 1 minute. ",actuallesbians
Anyone else super excited for boygenius?,,actuallesbians
Is this internalised homophobia?,"Hey. I'm a 14 year old lesbian who's out at school. I kinda denied it until now but I realised today that I've been having a lot of internalised homophobia for a few years now, I think.

So today was my first day back at school and in PE we were told to sit on the floor in a line so that the teachers could sort out the attendance or something (I'm not really sure). I ended up sitting next to my friend which was purely a coincidence, and then she moved so she wasn't next to me anymore. I also didn't talk to her at all today.

I literally have no idea of anything I could have possibly done wrong. In fact, it's probably nothing which is the problem. Every time something like that happens, even if it's completely in my head which it usually is, my first thought is it's because I'm a lesbian. In this case it's completely ridiculous because she's so supportive and amazing. Anyway, I just assume it's because I'm gay even when half the time nothing's even wrong. It's always me who's the one making it about me being gay and being really paranoid which is why I connected it to internalised homophobia.

I'm not 100% sure though, and if it is, what can I do to fix it?",actuallesbians
Me @ Cate Blanchett’s wikipedia page,,actuallesbians
'We need to grow up': Malaysian MPs condemn caning over lesbian sex,,actuallesbians
Update to cute bumble girl: she deleted her profile 😭😭😭😭😭😭😭,,actuallesbians
*coughs* here's my dating application if anyone is interested,"Lol, I've seen people post these and I'm trying to work on my description for my dating profile so here ya'll go

\-I'm from Nashville

\-I'll be 24 in less than a month

\-I have brown hair and brown eyes

\-Only video game I know how to play is The Sims

\-I have a car but am a crazy driver

\-I am goofy sometimes and come up with really bad jokes although I'm also sarcastic

\-I love to read and write, especially when it comes to FanFiction

\-I love shipping television lesbians

\-Blue eyes make me weak at the knees

\-I like people who enjoy having fun, I haven't done great with super serious people in the past

\-My favorite ships (if it matters) are Spashley, Brittana, Faberry, Hollstein, Liley (If you know what this is from them you're cool lol) 

\-I listen to different types of music, the only music I'm not a huge fan of is rap

I feel like I have so much more to say but can't think of it lol

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
Spent the weekend drawing girls,,actuallesbians
Cow and Chicken buffalo gals the carpet munching tho...﻿!,,actuallesbians
Just a broken hearted bitch trying to get her bae back,"Just sharing my feelings. Positive feed back or words of wisdom are encouraged ❤️

Recentlymy Gf and I broke up. It’s been an emotional roller coaster to say the least. As of now we’re on the terms of working things out in hopes to get back together. That being said I feel like things should be great and I should be happy with no heart ache. However that is not the case. It’s incredibly painful everyday. I keep hoping it’ll get better but it never does. I can usually manage to get through the day and distract my self with work and other things but as soon as I get home the depression and anxiety tackles me to the ground. We talk every day and see each other on weekends but it’s not enough for me. We lived together for a long time so it’s even harder when we spend time together and it’s time for me to leave. Sometimes I feel like she’s handling it better than I am which stirs up my anxiety. I constantly feel like a mess while she’s as cool as a cumcimber. I Asked if it hurts her just as much and she told me I have no idea how much she’s hurting as well. I try to be vulnerable with her but she seems to get irritated that she has to reassure me things will be okay, so I try to limit that. I’d literally give anything to be a couple again but she doesn’t seem to be ready. And I’m incredibly impaitent. Which is most likely half my problem. I don’t know what to do. Everyone thinks I’m stupid for putting myself through this pain but I know she’s my soul mate and we are meant to be together. I just don’t know how to cope with the pain. I go to therapy every week for it and it doesn’t work. Any one have any suggestions on how to get by? TIA",actuallesbians
Really confused &amp; feeling alone?,"Hey everyone!  Sorry for incoming wall of text and ramblings.  I'm extremely confused about my sexuality and I really don't know what to do at this point.  It's really causing me to feel depressed and anxious about who I am, and I was hoping this place could help some.

I've always known I like women.  The only real, strong romantic feelings I've had have been on women.  I've only envisioned myself in the future with a woman.  I've never fallen ""in love"" with a man, but I have with women.  If there's anything I'm certain of, it's that I love women.

But I've only felt this strong romantic attraction very, very few times in my life - I don't develop crushes easily or at all, really, until that person gets very close to me.  And I've been aroused by both women and men when I'm placed in sexual situations with them (but more men because I've just been in more sexual situations with men for various reasons).

But if a man tries to pursue anything with me, I just daydream about ways I can get away from that relationship.  If I ever had a ""crush"" on a man in passing, it immediately disappeared and turned into dread the second he reciprocated.  That doesn't happen with women.  The only ""man"" I did pursue sexually and was really aroused by ended up being a trans woman - but if I liked her before she came out, does that still make it pursuing a ""man"", for sexuality purposes?  I know that appearance doesn't make a woman a woman or a man a man, but I don't know what *does*, and how that factors into attraction.

I only get aroused when I'm actively in a sexual situation, or when reading porn that's detached from me entirely.  I can't get turned on by porn with real people regardless of gender, and I've never fantasized and have never wanted to - but that's not normal, right?

I feel like it's like I've pulled three lobsters out a ""people I can have real, deep romantic feelings for, and want to be in a relationship with"" lake and they're all blue.  Wouldn't it be wrong to assume every lobster in this lake is blue from that pathetic sample size?  I just feel like I can't completely rule out that I might like men in a real way because it *might be true*.  I have no idea.

There was a post a couple days ago about someone who felt like they might actually be pan, but only dated women and only felt comfortable with women, and so called herself a lesbian.  The community here hated that  - the consensus seemed to be that if you ever liked, or ever *could* like a man at any time in any capacity, you are not and cannot ever call yourself a lesbian.  I dated a boy when I was 15 and I didn't despise it, but we didn't really do anything either.  i feel like that means I can't be a lesbian?  Although, I did remember being really happy after breaking up.

So now, I feel like I can't call myself a lesbian because I'm not *sure*, and I don't really feel fully comfortable with ""bisexual"" either - because I feel like that implies that I'm attracted to both men and women in the same way (not the same frequency, but the same 'way'), and that's not true.  It's all fucked up.  I'm not sure what to do, or where I stand.  I don't feel like a normal, functional person.  Can anyone shed light on this, or provide insight?  How do you *know* you're gay?  

How do you shake off the feeling that it's *possible* to feel like this for a man, or that since you like men in very specific situations on Tuesday on a blue moon, you are attracted to them in the same way as women and must be bisexual?

**edit**: I'm curious for you lovely lesbian ladies: how is kissing/having sex/being in a relationship with a man different from the same with a woman you don't ""like"" that way?  ",actuallesbians
Them's the facts,,actuallesbians
"seriously, what's up with all the ""here's a drawing of my gf mastrubating"" posts lately?",,actuallesbians
Have you ever dated a woman who was significantly taller/shorter than you are?,"Hi, so my question is just what it says on the tin. I currently have my eye on a girl and have it from a good source that she's bi.

 I'm pretty sure I have a crush on her and I'd actually like to go for it for once: ask her out on a date. Yet, I also have this nagging hang-up cause she looks very tall. (I estimate her at like 6 ft. and I'm usually pretty spot on about this stuff.) Meanwhile I'm only a little over 5 ft. 2, so a midget basically compared to her. The times I've been talking to her, the height difference wasn't that bad, but that's because I wear really high heels. Even then, there was still a difference and she usually wears sneakers, so yeah... once the shoes come off, I'll probably look like a kid to her.

So yeah, I'd just like some experiences. Do these kind of relationships work out or is the difference in height always gonna be an awkward factor?(can't always be in high heels, after all) Sorry if this is a stupid question, but I've legit never crushed on someone waaay taller than me and it's making me feel kinda insecure and inadequate. I'd never reject someone based on height, but I could actually understand a very tall person rejecting a shorty like me.",actuallesbians
"I need some quick help. What’s a good amount of money to give my fiancé for Victoria’s Secret shopping? I figured enough to buy the whole store, buuut I don’t have that kind of money yet 🤣",,actuallesbians
Is what my friend said homophobic?,"Had been feeling down this evening and just worked out why. Was chilling with my flatmates and a couple of friends. One of the friends is gay too (a guy - call him Joe). The conversation was about something to do with coming out to parents.

One of my best friends who is a straight girl said ""I think it's just that parents don't like to think about their children having sex"". Ben challenged her and said ""what cause gay sex is disgusting is It?!"" And she tried to explain but struggled to articulate it. 

I said to her I didn't think it was any different to a parent knowing their straight child had a bf/gf and would be having sex, why was gay sex the problem?

Then I tried to understand where she was coming from and help her out as she is from a small town and a bit sheltered and I could tell Joe was a bit offended. I was asking if she was meaning cause gay sex is different to the status quo. Any way she just said she couldn't explain it.

I just feel sad, ashamed for not being straight and upset that she eluded to my preferences as gross. But I don't know if I'm just extrapolating what she said. What do you think?",actuallesbians
Is femme the same thing as a lipstick lesbian?,I used to think so but I heard someone saying that femme is in between lipstick and butch 🤔,actuallesbians
Wedding Picture Wednesday Mega Thread!,"Welcome to the Wedding Picture Wednesday mega thread! Some pictures have more than one person and don't really fit in a ""self"" picture thread. So, for all your wedding photos, proposal photos, engagement photos, anniversary photos, post them here!

Doesn't even have to be about marriage. You could also share your pictures from prom or just a regular date. ""Wedding Wednesday"" is just a name.

This thread will be posted automatically at 9am EST on Wednesday, and will be taken down at 9am EST on Thursday. 
",actuallesbians
Dealing with feeling used,"Something's been weighing on my mind for a while, so thought it could be useful to post here. It's mostly to vent, but I'd be interested in hearing from others who have experienced similar or have any words of advice/encouragement.

I dated a woman I knew socially through a sports club. We are both in our thirties, both had been single for a while before dating, and had expressed interest in finding a partner. I was attracted to her when we met, but was hesistant to ask her out at first because of our shared club (what if it went wrong?!). Eventually, it seemed likely that the attraction was mutual, so I asked her out. She admitted that she was also a bit nervous about what could happen if things between us went pear-shaped, but that she found me attractive and thought we had quite a bit in common. She also seemed a bit wary that I might only be after a hook-up, but I assured her that I had genuine dating in mind. After this very candid conversation, we became involved. 

We dated for 2-3 months, and it felt very much like the start of a healthy relationship to me. I was briefly concerned the first night we spent together, as she wanted to take things further than I did and put a bit of pressure on me to turn my 'no' into a 'yes.' With hindsight, this is a major red flag. But, at the time, I put it down to her just being a bit over-eager, and once I explained to her that I wanted to slow down and not rush things sexually, she seemed to understand. Apart from that, things were good: dinners out, cutesy text messages, little inside jokes, and gradual sharing of more personal stories. We even spent Christmas and Boxing Day together (circumstances prevented us from travelling home, so it wasn't like the result of a long-standing plan, but it was still a very nice time). 

Only, then she seemed a bit distant, and I got the definite feeling that something was wrong. I told her that if she didn't think our relationship was developing, she should let me know. She then admitted to me that she never intended to be a relationship with me and that she thought it was just a 'casual thing.' This came as a complete surprise to me. I ended things right then.

We tried to stay on friendly terms after this, but I found myself increasingly upset and replaying our entire 'relationship.' There was really nothing that had given me any indication that it was a 'casual thing.' When we talked about us, it always sounded like we were on the same page: we were dating with a view to seeing if we were compatible for a long-term relationship.

I told her this and asked why she hadn't been upfront with me, especially after the conversation we had before we even started dating. She told me that she had decided to 'revert to casual' when she realised there were things about me she didn't like and didn't want to be in a relationship with me. I asked why she did that, instead of just telling me that it wasn't going to work out. She replied, 'Well, no one wants to be alone.'

Things got very messy when I tried to explain to her that I don't think that's an okay way to treat people. We haven't spoken since, and it's highly unlikely that we ever will. I no longer go to the sports club. 

Most days, I am pretty much over things. I have gone on some dates since then, but haven't really felt a connection with anyone. I think I am still very bruised from this experience. It's not so much that things didn't work out or that we weren't on the same page. It's that she admitted the only reason she kept dating me was because she didn't want to be alone. It's really knocked my confidence. Like, she decided that I was not good enough for her to be in a real relationship, but that I was okay to keep around to date/sleep with on occasion. Meanwhile, I was clearly under the impression that we were in the early stages of a new relationship. That, combined with her coercive behaviour on the first night, makes me feel really used and manipulated. 

On one hand, I probably dodged a bullet  here, and I should be thankful that I figured out what was up before I got too emotionally involved. But, it's still hard to deal with the feeling of being used, and the angry way she reacted when I told her that I didn't think staying friends was healthy really shook me. So, here I am. ",actuallesbians
What's your favorite part about being a lesbian/bi/into girls?,"For me, it's the warm feelings that hit me when I start thinking about sharing my life with a girl, and of course the lack of concern for accidentally getting pregnant. I've never been with anyone, so unfortunately I don't have a lot of favorite things to pick from, but I have to imagine that kissing a girl is amazing. ",actuallesbians
Caption contest!,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/t6oqtxt5qgk11.jpg

Found at [Net-a-Porter](https://www.net-a-porter.com/us/en/porter/article-b36c5430c852c9af/cover-stories/cover-stories/robin-wright)",actuallesbians
is it possible?,"I am 27 years and my partner is 30 years. We are together for approximately two years. We have been living together for a year. We had  an argument and something came up and it had me wondering so here it is. 

So as individuals everyone has this imaginary person in their head of the type of person they would like to be with and that person would have certain qualities, be a certain way etc.

My girlfriend told me that she know she is not the partner that i wish i had and that is true.  and She told me that i am not the partner that she had wished she had. We both know that nothing is perfect and we can't always get what we want and this imaginary person we have in our head is just not possible in real life. We settled for each other and are trying to accept one another.  

**My question is , is it possible to be with the type of person we want to be with? Do they exist?**

I want someone who is loving, who helps in the kitchen when i cook, just to be present. Who helps with chores. Who isnt always occupied by their phone, game or internet. Who just randomly hugs and kisses me. Who could get up and make something for themselves to eat. Basically someone who i don't have to do everything for and isn't lazy and who loves to show me affection.

&amp;#x200B;

i had asked my partner to tell me about the person she would like to be with and she refused to say it. She said it doesn't make sense. I said it did because i would have insight on how u would like to b loved. She still didn't say anything.",actuallesbians
World of Warcraft Lesbians-- what's your favorite race/class to play?,"My first main (which I just started playing again, since BofA was released) was an Orc Shaman. Ever since I was a teen I liked seeing myself in-game as a powerful butch-y woman. Even though I was super feminine and gentle in real life. It just felt like a good way to express a part of my personality I was kind of uneasy about-- the gay part-- And also I liked being able to make a ring of exploding lightning.

I think the way people play RPGs says something about them, but different people have different playstyles and different reasons for their choices. What's your favorite race/class combo and why?",actuallesbians
"Written down in History as ""The Day My Parent's Gaydar Officially Activated.",,actuallesbians
34 going on 15,"I'm abroad. In Spain. I'm getting coffee in spain. I am a woman of the world, worldly woman, one might say. I've seen places. I've done things. That's how I feel. You know that feelings you get when travelling and suddenly feeling cool? I'm feeling that. I have experiences. I have made a woman feel good. I have made her loose herself in my fingers. I know what loosing myself feels like and there is nothing like it. I feel gay. Confident. I'm pretty. Not arrogant pretty, but cute. I feel cute. I get looks (but sadly all from men). I see a cool looking butch barista. Must be gay, I think. Much like me. A fellow gay. I feel a connection. We are alike, her and me. I could make a joke about short nails and she'd laugh and look at me meaningfully. Of course I don't. She's too cool. - Well, at least based on what I see by not looking directly at her. She might see me look. So i can't. But I'm a woman of the world. I'm going to look. Any moment now. I'll do it. Whoah, what's that? Another barista. Short hair, with red lipstick? She's arrogant pretty. Ow. They must be gay together. Damnit. Well, i gave it my everything. I did my best. I must disappear quickly before they notice me. Oh, the pain of almost potentially being rejected. I feel like an outsider. It makes me sad.

I'm a goddamn 14 year old boy in a 34 year woman body. How did that happen?",actuallesbians
is this too much lesbian drama?,"Ok so, I need some advice. We all know lesbian drama gets complicated when you have a large number of gay friends. Basically, I (19F) and my ex (19F) dated for over a year, and we ended it on not-great terms in february of this year. We moved on in different ways, I slept around (still do), and she went on a shit ton of dates and kind of drifted out of our mutual friend group. 

In May she got a new girlfriend (who I totally get along with!) and slowly started coming back into our group of friends. The thing is, she went on like two dates with this smoking hot butch (20F) around April. And this girl is HOT. Like, crazy hot in that way only butches can be. 

Anyway, we’ve said hi a couple of times but never really hung out. Her best friend told me that she thinks I’m cute and we recently matched on tinder. Is it super bad if I go on a date with someone my ex used to date? Like, I know this post is just a huge lesbian stereotype but that’s basically my life right now (minus a cat) so whatever. I need moral support, I asked two of my friends and one said yes and the other said no, so no help there. 

TD;LR: Am i morally corrupt for wanting to get together with someone my ex used to date?",actuallesbians
That feeling of potential and spark dying aka dating apps,"idk if it's just me but it happens way too often and I wonder if it's something wrong with me? something that I've done? but it seems lately that whenever I start talking with a girl on a dating apps it seems to go in a good direction, we might even meet up once or twice and like! It seems fine! all on good course!! 

and then one of you doesn't reply and then... maybe you try to reignite the conversation but like it's not the same? and then the empty feeling of disappointment and possibly another missed opportunity? or is it just not being able to care?

I can't tell at this point. But every time this happens I get more disenchanted I guess? with the whole app dating thing and I wonder. god how will I ever get into relationship at this rate????

/end rant",actuallesbians
Favorite love songs?,I’m bored lol. They don’t necessarily have to be about same-sex couples ,actuallesbians
Tell her I want more or end it?,"I've been in a friends-with-benefits/ ""fuck-buddy"" relationship since 2015 with an older woman (34 years older to be exact..). We met when the company I'm associated with did some work with her brand, sparks flew but we didn't do anything about it until the project ended.

Since our jobs require traveling, she flies into Tokyo once every couple of months and I fly to Europe or New York City whenever I get a chance to be in those places for business. We meet, have some romantic nights, then one of us leaves, rinse and repeat. It's an arrangement that has worked for us since we're both workaholics, she has kids, and due to her brand she can't be seen on something like Tinder/Her/PoF to meet women or men. She doesn't want to come out as bisexual to the world because she's very private, but her close friends and family know.

She sent me an email four hours ago telling me that she's in a new relationship with a man, but still wants to keep up our private love affair (she's up front with all of her lovers about being bipoly). It just hit me that I want more from her, I want to be the one she's seen with in public. I need more from her, but in the back of my mind I know I'll never get that from her. She's coming to Tokyo in a few days for business, and we'll be seeing each other, hopefully we can get out from underneath the sheets long enough to talk. 

How do I tell her I want and need more from her when I pretty much already know we can never be together in the way I want us to be? ",actuallesbians
Note to self: stop staring at random girls bc they’re pretty,"I use the bus for school and whenever similarly aged girls get on most take my breath away. I’m also very paranoid of being stolen from so I’m constantly looking around and I probably look like I’m having a bad trip when I’m constantly looking around but getting embarrassed and slightly infatuated then ducking my head down immediately after. 

I don’t even know if I’m asking advice or just ranting. I don’t think I can handle a girlfriend atm, like I said, I’ve got school, but this makes me wanna chat up every girl that walks on. I don’t bc, even if they are gay, they’re probably like most of us and don’t wanna be bothered when commuting, but I wouldn’t mind them bothering me. At all. ",actuallesbians
Needing advise on telling her I like her,"Hi all, I have been texting and talking to a co-worker for over two months now, sometimes daily, sometimes several times a day and sometimes she just stays quiet for a few days. I have started to develop feelings for her,  lately we both make efforts to see each other whenever we are both working but never out of work alone. Because of the intensity of how I'm feeling I have decided to tell her just to know where she stands and what my next step will be. Her life is complicated and she has stated not wanting a relationship (with other people) right now. I need advise on how to break the ice, how to tell her without damaging the friendship. I have never been in this position, althought I trully enjoy what's happening, I have been very anxious since realizing I'm falling for her. I don't necessarily want a relationship either, but would like to know how she feels and that I am not alone in these feelings. ",actuallesbians
How often do you get messaged first?,Just curious what others' experiences are. I feel it's almost never for me!,actuallesbians
Me talking about my new crush to my friend.,,actuallesbians
this was my favourite moment from saving face (2004). as a taiwanese-canadian this hit way too close to home 😭,,actuallesbians
I love old art like this 😍... nsfw,,actuallesbians
Amy Adams and Lauren German is a pairing I never knew I wanted until now,,actuallesbians
"How fast to bring up the ""just friends""","So I've been on several first dates lately (Tinder) and although many of these girls I found nice I don't think there is a romantic or even hooking up kind of interest from my side towards them.

&amp;#x200B;

Few of them have expressed interest in seeing me again, and I wouldn't mind but strictly platonically - and I wonder if it's presumptuous of me to reply with that? Like I thought you're a cool girl and I wouldn't mind hanging out with you again but I think we'd be better as friends or something like that?

&amp;#x200B;

Or should I go out with them again and tell them? But that seems unnecessary if they are not interested in being friends. ",actuallesbians
You kiss like a guy or straight girl,"So I went on two dates with a girl who lives over an hour from me. I decided there wasn't any chemistry between us and broke it off. Expected her to be understanding but received texts saying "" you need to practice kissing, you kiss like a guy or straight girl, im more experienced than you...""
It just caught me off guard because she was nice in person. Ugh, I hate online dating:/ Also my ego is a little bruised but I'm hoping I just dodged a bullet. ",actuallesbians
Long distance relationships,,actuallesbians
Goddammit my fiancée is so fucking cute,"Just had to rant because she’s TOO cute. She hits me with that smile and my insides melt. When she interacts with our dog? My outsides melt too. Double cuteness. Goddamn she is the best thing to ever happen to me and I cannot get her out of my head, even with her sitting just a few feet from me. She is my beloved goofball who always takes care of me and treats me wonderfully. Why can’t everyone have someone like her. 

Ugh. Rant over. ",actuallesbians
"To the girl who comes next,","To the girl who comes next,

I think we need to talk. You've been on my mind a lot lately, you know. I try to get on about my business, try to live my life and make something of myself. But you come to mind pretty often, and I just think you should know that. And I think there are some more things you should know, too.

First, I'm sorry in advance that I'm going to be so difficult. I'm a slow burn kind of person, and I'm not going to know how much I love you right away. I'm going to think that I like the shape of your mouth when you smile, and I'm going to think that I like the choice of your words, but it’s going to take me a while to be okay with feeling more than that, and even longer to be able to admit it out loud to you or anyone else. There will be days when I will leave you wondering how I really feel and I promise it's not on purpose. There will be times that you will try to hint how you feel to me, and I will not reciprocate, because I am useless and oblivious. I'm already sorry for it, but maybe it will make a good story someday. 

I'm also sorry for living in my own head so much. I'm sorry for being just totally horrible at math, and for persistently wearing nothing but a slightly varied flannel-tee shirt-leggings combo. I'm sorry that I'll forget the dates of anniversaries and that your parents are coming to visit this weekend, no matter how many times you remind me. I'm sorry for drawing on every piece of paper that ever comes into the house--I'd like to blame it on the art degree, but still. I'm sorry for making jokes as a way to deflect when I'm uncomfortable. I'm sorry for knowing too many weird facts about serial killers, and for bringing up Ted Bundy the first time I meet your friends. I got nervous, it just happened, I couldn't have stopped it if I'd wanted.

But I hope you'll be patient with me, and that you'll find good in there somewhere. I can do all the art projects, and mow the yard, and YouTube the small house repairs. The spiders are all yours, though, because no creature but the devil himself could ever have that many legs. When I'm too quiet during a conversation it’s because I'm really listening, and trying to find the right combination of words for the situation. Because words are important, and I can promise to never use them haphazardly. I can promise that when we inevitably fight, I will never say something strictly with the intention to hurt you--because word choice is never more important than when you're tempted to throw out the sharpest ones available. 

I can't promise I'll be perfect. I can't promise I'll always be fun. I can't promise that this will last forever. But I can promise that while it does last, I'll do my very best to make you laugh every day. I'll do my best to make you feel heard, and wanted, and loved. 

And, yeah, on my low days, the days when my unearned but considerable self-confidence eventually wavers, it does get hard to believe you're even out there. Because maybe some people were just meant to be alone, y'know? And maybe I'm one of those people. Who's to say? 

But if you are out there, then--

Hey. What’s up?

--Sincerely,
Me",actuallesbians
Does anyone else find it difficult to make friends with other women in the LGBT+ community?,"I don’t know why but it seems that even approaching a woman who also likes women, strictly to initiate friendship, is often seen by the other person as coming onto them. Surely not everyone has such a tremendous ego that they assume all women want to be with them in some capacity, but building a good, open friendship seems nearly impossible. I can understand if you are two fundamentally different people with nothing in common, but to ghost or tell someone who you could get along with that you’re just not into it is absurd to me. Do you need to be friends with everyone who wants to get to know you? No. It seems that if they don’t find you attractive, you’re not worth their time. You can have LGBT+ friends without any expectation of desire. 

Maybe it’s just me. ",actuallesbians
The most embarrassing thing happened to me just now...,"Ah. Technology. I love you, but you failed me tonight.

Okay so I have a new phone, and there's this fancy function that if you're in a message thread of someone, all you have to do is raise your hand up to your ear to start calling them. I guess to minimize button tapping. 

Anyways...so, my ex and I have a long ass history, and are still somewhat friends and catch up from time to time. It's been a few months since the last time I talked to her though. 

So here I was in bed, having a nostalgia moment, and I scroll back and start reading some of our texts. First mistake. 
Then, something on my leg started burning, so I was scrambling under my covers to scratch it. And somehow while doing this, that fine little gesture activated. And I didn't even realize it while wrestling with my covers. And I hear this faint ""hello?.....uh..hellooo?"" 

And then...it hit me. I looked at my phone and cue the heart dropping to the floor feeling. I panicked and didn't know what to say...so I quickly re-routed the conversation and was like hey! Remember that show we used to watch? New season is out! Didn't know if you knew...
Thankfully she seemed to not notice my awkwardness and we talked for a bit. But omfg really phone?! 

Stomach still in knots. Still slapping myself. I mean, better than being like..yeah I was reading our old texts from a few months ago and my new phone accidentally called you. How's it going? Lol

*facepalm* ",actuallesbians
I thought this should go here too... when actual lesbians get screwed by fake ones...,,actuallesbians
Advice about breaking up with girlfriend,"is it wrong to break up with somebody who just doesnt want to have sex? 
I feel ashamed to care so much about sex to want to break up with her 
We've been together a year now, at first we had sex a lot
And then for the last 6 months we've only done it a handful of times
It's really starting to take a toll on our relationship and I've talked to her about it and she says she's just not into it and she doesn't want to have sex, she's not comfortable and she's dysphoric 
our relationship is great besides that but it's a big deal for me to be physically affectionate and I don't want a relationship without sex 
",actuallesbians
I just want to kiss a girl,"I recently came out to my husband (like 5 days ago). Told him I ""strongly favor women"" and I've wanted to do lesbian stuff but never had the chance. He's against an open relationship, I love him and don't want to leave him, but the thought of being with a woman is consuming my thoughts almost full time. I can't stop fantasizing about it. I don't know what to do.",actuallesbians
One year for me and my gf,"She playing video games right now. And I’m sitting back here watching her and god, I am so lucky. This woman wants to be with me. Of all people.

This morning she opened a toothbrush case for me because she wanted I take care of me and it was such a little thing but I loved it. She has done so much for me in the past year. And I can’t thank her enough for it.

Babe, I love you.",actuallesbians
Who's the Man in the Relationship?,"I'm sure we've all gotten this bullshit question before, and I've seen a couple clever responses online:

""That's like asking a pair of chopsticks which one is meant to be the fork""

""That's like asking a vegan which vegetable in their salad is supposed to represent the meat""

Anyone else have any more clever analogies? ",actuallesbians
IS SHE GAY OR JUST LOOKING FOR A GAL PAL??? 😭,,actuallesbians
Working on this new one today:),,actuallesbians
Questions for the socially anxious lesbians:,"How do y’all even go about approaching or talking to a girl you like and making it clear you’re gay? 

Earlier this year, I had what I thought was a hopeless crush on a girl who I had befriended. It wasn’t until a few months later that I learned she was gay, but by then we weren’t that close anymore. I know the confusion and pain could have been avoided if I had just told her. How can I avoid this in the future?

I really struggle with talking to people, but it’s even worse when I’m attracted to them. What can I do to give myself more confidence?",actuallesbians
So i need help figuring out if she was interested,"I went to this starbucks with my sister and there was this really cute barista, we made eye contact and smiled at each other, then when we were waiting for our drinks she called us and gave us coupons. Fast forward the other day and i went there with my mom and she was there again and smile at me, like a big smile, I ordered something that wasn’t available and she said she would make me another thing that was close to that, i had to leave the store but when my mom came to me she said the girl had told her that if I didn’t like my drink I should go talk to her. ",actuallesbians
yes 😊,,actuallesbians
When I was younger I used to think homophobic meant actually being terrified of gay people. 😂,,actuallesbians
butts: the thinking woman's boobs,,actuallesbians
Janelle Monaé,"I know I’m late to the party but I started listening to Janelle Monaé, and just watched the [Make Me Feel](https://youtu.be/tGRzz0oqgUE) video. I need someone to tell me I didn’t dream it all up. Praise all the queer gods.

This is a PSA. Don’t be like me. Don’t wait, listen to Janelle Monaé today.",actuallesbians
I just need to step back a bit and find myself. Am I being crazy?,"I’m the kind of girl who does a tonne of extra curriculars at university, gets great grades, holds a job and a social life and the like. 

Anyway, I’ve sort of been overwhelmed over the last year being really confused about why I felt nothing towards men (thinking there was something seriously wrong with me for that and shutting my confusion away) and then realising I like girls. It’s been a really weird whirlwind of emotion and I didn’t talk to anyone about this until a couple of weeks ago. Which was a really dumb move on my part- but I wasnt ready. 

Now that I’ve spoken to a few friends I feel a lot better and although a big weight has been lifted off me, it’s just made me want to step back from this crazy work load and spend more time focusing on my degree, getting a graduate job as I’m going into my last year of uni and trying to understand myself more. I also really want to spend more time attending LGBTQ+ events.

Does that sound kind of nuts? Stepping back from a number of positions of responsibility  just to figure myself out? Or is it me being stupid... because these things don’t really relate? 

I’ve just felt overwhelmed with university, work, extra curricular activities and society positions for the last two years and I feel like I’m going crazy and the fact that it’s taken me 22 years to figure out I like girls is making me feel like I’m completely nuts.

Anyway rant over sorry for being quite brief, far too many things going through my head right now to get them all out. ",actuallesbians
Lesbian anime with English subs! Any suggestions? Halp!,,actuallesbians
Difference between getting hit on by girls than by guys - what have been your experiences?,,actuallesbians
:'),,actuallesbians
Lesbian Jokes?,"It's no secret that the lgbta+ community love to make jokes about their identities. What's your best joke/comeback? Is there a story behind it?

Mine is when my friend was putting a huge amount of peanut butter on his pb&amp;j and I said ""that is wayyyy too much peanut butter. And that isn't just me being gay, that's just too many nuts!""

I dunno, I thought it was funny. How about you all? What's your best joke?",actuallesbians
"What, ideally, would you want/have wanted from your first time?","So like most stories go, there's this girl. And I like her. A lot. We've been dating for a while now and although it hasn't really been physical yet, I know she feels the same way, and if things go well that will probably happen soon (assuming she wants to of course).

The thing is, I already know she is a virgin and has had very little/no experience with anyone, and she is self-conscious about it. I don't exactly feel like the most experienced person on earth, but I have had my fair share of relationships, flings and hookups. But yet I feel like I'm the one who is super nervous about the prospect of sleeping together.

I have no problem with her lacking experience, and I'm happy she felt like she could trust me enough to tell me. But knowing that it's a big deal for her makes me super anxious that she will find it awkward and not enjoyable at all, I guess because of my own lack of confidence.

So please help me out with some advice. I want to do everything I can to make sure she feels comfortable and enjoys herself. What did you/do you want from your partner the first time? ",actuallesbians
Judy Garland &amp; Barbra Streisand? Any one else? 😏,,actuallesbians
How soon to tell a new guy friend you're gay?,"More than once I've found myself in the very uncomfortable situation of being in a great conversation with a guy I've just met, totally could be friends and hang out regularly. Consistently my expression of interest in the conversation is percieved as flirting. So if relationships or sexuality never comes up in the conversation but you exchange numbers, when/how do you drop the L word on 'em? Because I'd hate to come off like women who immediately say ""I have a boyfriend"" to any guy that talks to them, because it comes off as very arrogant assuming every guy is interested in her.

So I don't want to just blurt it out and them think ""ok well Im not attracted to you any way, not sure why you said that""

My straight male friends have said to literally just say it asap even if it's not relevant. Like hi, nice to meet you, I'm robmosesdidnthwrong, I heard about this event on the radio and Im a total homo.

Help pls.",actuallesbians
Message in a bottle,I’d like to know what to do when the girl you like doesn’t respond to your message. Its been a day since I responded but she won’t even open the message I sent her yet she has time to post stories on her IG account. But every time i’m around her she just won’t stop staring at me. 😑 Weirdest creature ever. What should I do? ,actuallesbians
Ugghh uncomfortable doctor visit rant.,"Looking for some insight on a situation I was in today. My insurance changed had to go to a new doctor, also wanted to change my B.C prescription because it wasn't helping my cramps. Doctor insists on me taking a pregnancy test. Even though we had just discussed my homo status. Anyway we argue about it, I end up feeling very uncomfortable, and she notes in my file ""patient refused pregnancy test."" WTF. Any similar experiences?",actuallesbians
Anybody have any tips for dealing with real heavy feelings for a boss? She’s gay but married and it’s just never going to happen.,,actuallesbians
Calling all aspiring LGBTQ+ techies! 🌈💻,"Out in Tech U, part of an international LGBTQ organization dedicated to promoting diversity and inclusion in tech for LGBTQ people, is now accepting applications for our fall mentorship programs for young adults interested in tech careers!

We have two programs:

**U Mentorship** provides one-on-one mentoring over several months, either remotely or in-person for those in the NYC metro area. Mentees will be paired with mentors with whom they can work to develop both technical and professional skills, and learn more about tech careers. Learn more [here](https://outintech.com/u/mentorship/), and apply to become a mentor or mentee!

Our **Explorer** program in NYC is for those who may not yet have technical skills, but want to learn more about technical careers. Participants meet for two hours, once a week for several months, visiting tech companies and getting an inside view of a wide variety of technical careers. Learn more [here](https://outintech.com/u/explorer/) and apply to participate!

Questions? Comment below and I'll do my best to reply!",actuallesbians
How to figure out my identity? I don't seem to fit into one.,"So for the past 2 years or so I kept experimenting between butch and femme. I'll present femme for like 3-5 months, then butch, and then repeat. The thing is, I don't know which I am, as I have both feminine and masculine characteristics. I sit and walk in a masculine way, and I consider myself chivalrous. With a girlfriend, I won't hesitate to put my coat on her if it's cold and love to hold doors open or pull out her chair. I like masculine clothing.

On the other hand, I really like feminine things. I like cute stuff like purses, those puff ball keychains, and I play around with makeup often. I like cute looking shirts like ones with sequins or sparkles. I'm also sensitive and nurturing. 

And whenever I present a certain way, it doesn't feel ""right."" When I call myself butch, don't wear makeup, wear men's clothing... It doesn't feel like I'm being ""me."" And when I'm feminine presenting and choose to wear cute things, wear makeup, carry around a purse, etc. It doesn't feel like I'm being ""me"" either. And I *do* enjoy presenting both ways. But when I present one way, I tend to sort of miss the other. And then I go back and forth between the two. 

Then I feel awkward when I switch. Right now I'm feminine presenting and I feel weird when I sit like a man, walk in a masculine way, and act chivalrous towards women. But when I dress butch, I feel the desire to carry around a cute purse and wear beautiful makeup. Basically my masculine and feminine traits are about equal (50/50) and I can't figure out a way to comfortably present without ""missing out"" on the other side. If I present masculine, I'm missing out on aspects of femininity that I like. If I present feminine, I feel like I'm missing out on aspects of masculinity that I like. 

Does anyone else have this problem? And how do you figure out how you identify? I don't fit solely as either a butch *or* a femme as my masculinity and femininity is around 50/50.

EDIT: [Here](https://forum.emptyclosets.com/index.php?threads/cant-decide-if-im-butch-or-femme.346557/) is a post I found by someone else who is having the same issue, she describes a lot of the issues I'm having :/",actuallesbians
Fricken Cupid,I fricken hate cupid. Stop shooting me with these damn love arrows for someone who will never like be back. Just once could you like wait until I am looking at a gay girl before shooting? C'mon dude help a girl out!,actuallesbians
Quick question for girls that ghost..,"Why? I don't mind if you're not into me but isn't it common courtesy to just let me know ""thanks but no thanks"" after going on a few dates? ",actuallesbians
I have no idea how to make a move on the girl I have been hanging out with,"I am 20 years old and only now has everything start to click for me, as in I am hella gay. I started hanging out with this girl that I know is also gay, and has also just recently come to the conclusion. She has been with one or two girls while I have not been with any.   


We have hung out four times, twice alone, and one of the times was an all day hiking excursion. We have even talked TOGETHER ABOUT HOW GAY WE ARE. My dumb ass just CAN'T  MAKE A MOVE. We were alone yesterday, sitting together at the river, super close. She kept touching my arm and leg and whatnot, and I just couldn't do it.   


I have this super bad fear that she just thinks we are friends, or that I am reading into everything.  


Please, seasoned lesbians, help me out here.",actuallesbians
Here for the girl firefighters,,actuallesbians
Twenty Gayteen means having the longest shipped cartoon couple finally become cannon.,,actuallesbians
feeling distraught n rly sad,"this morning the girl i’ve been dating called me to tell me that she has to stop seeing me and i really don’t know how to feel. i skipped my university classes because i was too sad, ive been crying all day and now i just keep looking at her social media and our messages hoping she will tell me it’s all a joke and that she still wants to see me. anyone have any suggestions on what to do so i don’t just keep crying and hoping for something that obviously won’t happen ",actuallesbians
Crushed by crushes,"Everytime I have a new crush, I fall hard. I think about things so far into the future and every love song sounds like it is about our future. Problem is that I can't express those feelings in words or actions, I get nervous or anxious about admitting how I actually feel. Does anyone else have this problem? How do I express without freaking out. This is the second post of this type from me...because I don't know how to do life...",actuallesbians
Lesbian books?,Could anyone recommend some books with some hot steaming lesbian scenes in it? Haha. I'm on to May-December love affair thing as of the moment. (sorry not sorry),actuallesbians
I’m Scared of Being in a Relationship Thanks to my Dad.,"24F and my parents are going through a divorce and I was told by my mom that he’s going back to his first wife.. which hurts me plainly even though I told myself that i would be fine with whoever he ends up with but I wasn’t okay if it was his first wife.. 

Anyways.. because of what’s going on with my parents and with my dad I’m actually kind of scared of falling in love with someone because i don’t want to end up like them.. it makes me believe that love doesn’t exist and marriage is a fucking joke. 

I’m writing this because there’s this woman that I like and I’m actually scared into getting involved with her due to what’s happening with my parents and I’m scared that it’s going to happen to me.. 

I don’t know.. I just need some advice on how to not to be scared into getting info a relationship, 

Thanks for reading ",actuallesbians
HELP! Unwanted male attention when out with my girlfriend,"Looking for any advice or personal experiences.  

&amp;#x200B;

I am one of those really feminine girls that just ""looks straight.""  No one in a million years would guess by looking at me that I'm gay as all hell.  However, my girlfriend, who is literally the most beautiful human being i have seen in my life, is easily identifiable as queer.

&amp;#x200B;

Every time we go out at night, inevitably, several dudes will approach us throughout the night (including waiting in line to get into a gay bar! FOR SHAME) to stop and repeatedly tell my girlfriend how hot I am/ask intrusive questions/just generally get excited and obnoxious with sexual comments about me.  

&amp;#x200B;

To me, this is not a compliment.  It beyond pisses me off, for many reasons, and it makes me feel self-conscious and very much on display (not at all my personality).  My girlfriend always takes this in stride and defuses the situation pretty well, but having it happen whenever we go out has got to be a burden on letting her enjoy herself. 

&amp;#x200B;

Anyone have any advice of what to do or say to quickly and safely end these interactions?  ",actuallesbians
Scene in San Diego?,Going to be in San Diego next week for a couple days and was wondering if you ladies had any reccos on lesbian bars in the area? ,actuallesbians
"for the last time, that's not a best friend, that's your goddamn WIFE",,actuallesbians
"Malaysian Women caned for attempting Lesbian Sex, Spark Human Rights Outcry",,actuallesbians
How to not come across as a creep?,"So this girl and I originally met on OkC almost 2 years ago (whoa) and have talked on/off since then. We were hanging out at the beginning of the year and nothing ever happened; she started dating someone around May. I've definitely liked her this whole time so cringey as it is I told her that I needed some space since I had planned to ask her out too and was hurt. She was really nice about it. 

Fast forward to a few weeks ago, she is single and hits me up on social media... We start hanging out again and talking. Just as friends. at this point I'm scared to bring up the subject of ~feelings or ~dating because I'm afraid to scare her away and make her think I'm only her friend for selfish reasons. But I want to at least give it a shot and not wait til she meets someone else. Idk. What would you ladies do?",actuallesbians
The weird ways of flirting,"So I was watching an episode of Doctor Who last night where Madame Vastra said to Clara that the Doctor flirted with her by making himself young (as in, regenerated in to a young body).

Apologies to those who don’t understand the reference, but it got me thinking about the weird ways in which I flirt with people.  For example, if I really like someone, I’ll call them a dork.  Like...the specific word ‘dork’ 😂 
OR when I know I’m going to see someone I like, I’ll take extra care to curl my hair or do something special with my makeup
OR I’ll wear earrings or a brooch specifically related to something they like, in order to get their attention.

So what about you?  What are the weird things you do when flirting?  I know I can’t be the only one.",actuallesbians
Hi yes hello I would like to request some anonymous internet assistance,"Hi, so my heart is beating really fast as I type this. I'm too scared to talk to any of my friends about it in person because I'm afraid that'll make it real. I'm not sure if I have feelings for my best friend or not.


It's a long story, but I'll try to keep it short. 

* We are both bi. We have been friends since we started college and we just graduated in May.

* We had a falling out where we didn't speak for like a year and a half, basically all of junior and senior year. Centered around both of our depression, her lack of support when I came out, and when she thought I was jealous of her boyfriend. It's not as stupid as that, but it sounds stupid that summed up.

* This kid knows *everything* about me. I attempted suicide freshman year, and she saved my life that night. 

* When we had our falling out, I was absolutely inconsolable. I was crying constantly. I was trying to figure out then if i had feelings for her, and I never came to a conclusion. After graduation, I figured I would never see her again.
 
* We ended up moving to the same city. She came out of the woodwork in like July and we made amends.


So now, the question is back if I'm in love with her. We've kissed before (ya know, like the drunken thing that friends in college do), and then a like a month ago when we first talked about and addressed the fact that we hadn't spoken for nearly two years, we were both wasted. I know we made out, but I can barely remember it and I just kept apologizing the next morning and telling her I wasn't in love with her. 

And then like two weeks ago, she broke up with her boyfriend. (I know, I don't need a lecture about how shitty that was. I already know.) 

I don't know. My hands are shaking typing this and I feel like I wanna throw up. I don't know if I have feelings for her and I don't want it to be real. So I can't tell anyone in real life. That makes it real.",actuallesbians
Plaque honouring famous lesbian to be changed so as to refer to the fact she was actually a lesbian...,,actuallesbians
The two extremes of the lesbian fashion scale represented as houses,,actuallesbians
Last night (NSFW),,actuallesbians
7 years old when I realized I was into girls was all because of THIS scene- Salma Hayek in Dusk Til Dawn,,actuallesbians
I was going for queen but ok...,,actuallesbians
She's gone!!!,"I blocked her, this girl, so she tried to call me on private and I ignored it. Then I answered and I said I couldn't be bothered any more, with trying to figure out if she was really into me. She only really shows she cares when she thinks she's losing me. You see I had sent a message at 11pm and she'd stopped responding so I thought she'd gone to bed and would reply in the morning. However at 11pm the following day I realized, of all the things she was choosing to do that day, replying to me was not one of them. I sent her a message about how I was done trying to guess and I blocked her. I realize I must be needy, I get it, but just the thought that she didn't feel like talking to me that day, when I think I am in love with her, made me afraid. I am falling for someone who is nonchalant about me. I unblocked her and explained this to her and said sorry if I sounded mean on the phone. Now she has had enough of my neediness I guess because she blocked me also. This is what I wanted isn't it? For us to go our separate ways. Then why do I feel like I can't breathe and I want to run and never stop. Why can I physically feel the pain inside my chest all the way to my finger tips? Why have I cried and feel like I need to cry again? Why do I feel like I should call her? Should I call? After all, she must have been going off me anyway, because she didn't reply that day.",actuallesbians
Great art makes you Feel Things,,actuallesbians
I'm a little nervous... (Advice please!),"Hey first post here! Needing some advice.

Ok so I've been on two dates with this girl I meet on OKCupid. I really like them and they say that they like spending time with me as well. We're planning to go on a third date this Friday at her dorm to hangout and eat lunch together. (She has a private dorm and we won't be bothered for about an hour and a half.) 

Do you guys think I should make a move or wait it out? O r she might a make a move on me? I haven't been a relationship in a while and I want to take things slow but I don't want my chance to slip by. 

Any advice is appreciated! ",actuallesbians
Ozark on Netflix,"If you're not watching this show I highly recommend it. I binged watched season 1, 6 months ago and have been waiting for season 2 all this time. I wasn't disappointed. 

Sidenote: in S2E2 there's a moment in a strip club that is way sexier than it has any right to be.",actuallesbians
(Adventure Time Finale Spoilers) They finally did it,,actuallesbians
Thought you ladies might enjoy,,actuallesbians
Lesbians! We’ve been called out,,actuallesbians
Advice to your younger self,"Regarding sexuality, the world, anything you want really.",actuallesbians
A little late but Chai is ready for pride. I made bracelets for my wife and I to match too!,,actuallesbians
lesbian wattpad recommendations?,found some amazing lesbian fanfiction on wattpad. any favorites or must reads? [favorite wattpad read ](https://my.w.tt/lf7jTlP7WP),actuallesbians
THAT'S A GIRLFRIEND!,,actuallesbians
Gayby’s....,"Alright. So here’s the thing. Everyone is a gayby at some point. I don’t discriminate against them when I find out they’re gaybys. But. More often than not, they’ll either stand me up or say “oops I forgot I have other plans that night” after we plan a date and then never commit to plans again. This is why I frequently hear from gaybys that their status as such is a deal breaker for more experienced lesbians. And it’s why I always try to give them a shot. But I can’t remember the last time a gayby came through on a date. And I’m talking to this ridiculously cute girl right now and I am watching this exact scenario unfold. And I’m so goddamn frustrated.

Thoughts? Similar experiences? Insights from gaybys? And please don’t say this is how they’re figuring out their sexuality because I’m not a tool to be used.",actuallesbians
Eleanor Shellstrop is biiiiiiii,"who thinks this will become canon at some point (has it already?)

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/l6vv911p35k11.png",actuallesbians
I need a hobby 😂,"Actual conversation on an elevator with a coworker. 

Coworker: How was your weekend?

Me: Pretty good, just tired. 

Her: DUDE, same

Me:

Her: (Panicked look)
Her: I mean, not dude. You’re not a dude.

Me: (Looks down) Sweet. I was worried I was just a late bloomer. 

Her: (Horrified look)


It’s too easy sometimes. 
",actuallesbians
"yeah, i’d say that’s pretty accurate.",,actuallesbians
Engagement ring advice?,"Hey all! Long time lurker here. I've been with my girlfriend for 2.5 years, and am planning on proposing in a little less than a year. My future fiancee and I are both poor students going for higher education, and I've been on the hunt for a modestly priced ring that doesn't look like it came out of a vending machine. Does anyone have any resources/tips for buying a pretty, feminine ring that's still durable...and on a budget? 

&amp;#x200B;

The girl doesn't care about having a diamond, and would prefer something else like cubic zirconia, moonstone, etc. If it helps :) 

&amp;#x200B;

Thank you in advance!  ",actuallesbians
Best lesbian novels?,Looking for new read!,actuallesbians
I built a house 😏 the pretty girl modeling for me.,,actuallesbians
that's called a girlfriend.,,actuallesbians
"This quote is some of the best dating advice I've ever received. The older I get, the more it proves to be true",,actuallesbians
Your favourite lesbian series?,"I need to watch something gay, do you have any suggestions for gay movies/series?
(i've watched blue is the warmest color, the way he looks, and gypsy)",actuallesbians
I painted this today:),,actuallesbians
"I saw this on Facebook and got depressed, this was me before I came out of the closet, I was so ashamed of myself for being gay that I kept my distance from people out of fear for them finding out",,actuallesbians
I need advice from my fellow raptors,"My five year high school reunion is in a couple of weeks and I want to make a statement that I’m gay somehow. I was very deeply in the closet in high school, I dated the captain of the football team and you could say I was popular, I didn’t really have a clique, I just hung out with everyone. Anyway, some of my friends that are going know I’m gay but I want everyone to know. I was thinking of wearing a rainbow dress but that might be a bit much lol. Maybe I should wear a rainbow flag pin in my dress? I don’t know, I guess I just want to do what I couldn’t I’m high school, be my true self",actuallesbians
I had a date today!!,And it went really well - we’ve already made plans to go on another date later this week. I think this means I’m officially no longer a useless lesbian!,actuallesbians
Ever see the 2012 movie Ambrosia? Do yourself a favour. Don’t.,"At first glance it looks like it’s about a woman in an unhappy marriage who decides to leave her husband as she starts falling for her female boss and questioning whether she was ever actually in love with him. The protagonist is from Iran, and is living in Canada. 

As the movie goes on, the boss goes from flirting and kind of testing the waters to see if the protagonist might be interested, to downright predatory. She corners the protagonist in the bathroom, asking why she’s so afraid to admit her attraction. Telling her it must be because she’s from Iran, and her values are behind where they should be. 

She tells her boss to go fuck herself and to leave her alone, which is great, but then the movie ends with her going back to her husband like everything is fine, when we just spent like an hour establishing how unhappy they are together. 

This isn’t a lesbian movie. It’s not an LGBT friendly movie. It feels a lot more like a queer baiting, queer coding mess, made to paint queer women as predatory home wreckers, and Canada’s values in a negative light. 

I’m super disappointed. ",actuallesbians
"The noble lesbian salad, a coy creature caught alas, and thriving in captivity.",,actuallesbians
"""so yesterday i was walking past some guy talking shit about gay people and i took my bestfriend and kissed her right in front of him"" what an icon😭",,actuallesbians
Wondering if I should even bother.,"I'm a 25 year old lady with 2 kids and a husband.
I met him when I was 16 and he is the only man I've ever been attracted too. 
We are (new) poly and I'm wondering if I should even try pursuing any relationships. I dont want a hook up, I want something long term. I feel like lesbians are going to think I'm gross or a waste of there time, especially because I've never been with a woman. I'm honestly heartbroken.  

I am in no way looking for any sort of 3 way or sexual thing involving my husband. 
",actuallesbians
(Spoilers)The last episode of Adventure Time,"In the very last episode, which aired today, there was a scene in which Bubblegum and Marceline kissed. The ship is true. And at the very end, it showed them cuddling in the couch. ",actuallesbians
Women caned in Malaysia for attempting to have lesbian sex | World news,,actuallesbians
Is this “straight” woman messing with me?,"There’s this girl from uni I’ve had a crush on for a few months now. She has never made indication that she is lesbian/bi and has only ever talked about ex boyfriends. I tried to push her out of my mind because we all know how the dreaded “straight girl crushes” end, but the other day when we were at a mutual friends birthday party there was this moment in our conversation when she stared into my eyes for a good 30-40 seconds nonstop (no exagerration) like she wanted to devour me (it was totally mutual though and I could not look away). Usually I avoid her eyes but the drinks were flowing and I was a bit tipsy so I had a little more courage than usual. 

I swear no straight girl even the ones that like to mess around with us to stroke their own egos could look into another girls eyes for that long like that. Hell I don’t think I’ve ever had another queer girl maintain eye contact like that for that long before. It takes a hell of a lot of courage for anyone to do that imo.

What do you guys think?",actuallesbians
Gay lady nerds at DragonCon: my haul!,,actuallesbians
I almost got in a car accident today.,"i was just driving home from work and i saw two women probably in their early twenties walking on the side holding hands. this was the first time i’ve ever seen two girls out and about being gay af in my dumb lame city and it was awesome!!! i was staring so hard and smiling i almost crashed 

i wanted to roll down my window and yell ME GAY TOO! but ya that’s kinda weird 

😊",actuallesbians
Why I don't want Elsa to be the first Lesbian Disney Princess,"Every so often I see this pop up across the internet.  Being that, from what I can gather, a lot of the LGBT+ community resonated with ""Let It Go"", and society's idea that being single is the worst thing ever, it seems that people really want Queen Elsa from Frozen to be Disney's first lesbian princess.

&amp;#x200B;

Now, let me preface this post by saying I am not Disney's number one fan.  I haven't seen every movie, I've only seen Frozen once, and in general I'm a little weirded out by Disney's constant presence.  Seemingly every (Western) fairy tale has a Disney adaptation, a lot of them miss the mark on the source material (I can rant for *hours* on Disney's The Little Mermaid), and with many people, if you speak out against Disney, people react as if you just spoke out against Christianity in the Bible Belt.  It's weird.  Disney movies are good, sure, but animated movies that aren't by Disney or Pixar are amazing too.  I'm personally massive fans of The Little Prince and The Last Unicorn, but I digress.  I'm very weirded out by Disney and by the people who call me a ""DISNEY HATER"" when I point out that these movies, despite their branding, are not perfect.

&amp;#x200B;

So.  Elsa.  She sang a song about living her best life and not hiding who she is anymore (while hiding from the world), and people ate it up.  It was basically Defying Gravity, only not by Stephan Schwartz, but it hit home for a lot of people, and I understand that.  People can take comfort and hope from any piece of music.  Let It Go, mixed with the fact that Elsa is independent and single means she is prime and ready for maybe deciding she isn't into dudes.  

&amp;#x200B;

Only, here's the thing: Elsa becomes the first gay princess, and that's it.  We're done.  We get a Disney Sequel Lesbian.  We get an Afterthought Lesbian.  We get a character who's sexuality is shoehorned in to appease a community and she's it.  We aren't getting another, not counting her Disney Sequel Girlfriend.  If Elsa is to become the first Gay Disney Princess, then her box is checked off the Diversity List, and you can file her between Mulan and Jasmine.  We're done here.  Next, in the sequel to Tangled, Rapunzel loses a leg.  

&amp;#x200B;

All people deserve representation in film, especially when those films are made by a massive corporation that shoves their products down the throats of every child world over.  All people deserve to have characters they relate to, who can help them to understand who they are, why they are good, why they are important.  This transcends race and sexuality.  People of different body types, genders, physical ability and so on and so forth deserve to see themselves represented, not just in a sequel, but as their own unique character who goes beyond that attribute. Having a character come out in the Sequel of a movie isn't ""Coming out of the closet"", it's just sticking a push lamp on the inside of the closet door.  It's the Diet RC Cola of coming out.  Having a character come out in a  Sequel leaves the girlfriend character trapped amoung the ranks of characters like Ariel's Daughter Melody and Simba's daughter... eh... Juliet? The sequel was based on Romeo and Juliet.  I don't actually know Simba's daughter's name, because she's just a Disney Sequel character.  She barely exists.  You won't see her on the cruise or in the parks, because that's what happens to Disney Sequel characters.  

&amp;#x200B;

As much as I want a Gay Disney Princess, I don't want Elsa to be it.  I want the first Lesbian Princess to have her *own* story.    I think we deserve that.  I think we deserve a character with an LGBT+ lead who just *is.* Full stop.  Let Elsa remain single.  I think we deserve that, too.  Disney can break the mold that Disney created by not forcing every main character to end up finding true love.  I find that I am struggling to put my thoughts into words cohesively.  I don't know if anything I have said has made a bit of sense.  I've been thinking about this for a long time.  

&amp;#x200B;

Anyways, Elsa can't be the first Gay Princess anyways, because she isn't a Princess, she's a Queen.",actuallesbians
Tuesday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
Long distance relationship.,"I’m very much in love with a amazing woman who lives far from me. We mostly text and talk on the phone because seeing each other often is not possible.  I tell her every chance I get  that I love her and that she makes me happy. Our family and friends do not know about us. I want to find cute, fun things I can do/say to express my love to her but I can’t make any big public gesture of love.  Any suggestions? Thank you. ",actuallesbians
To 20-Something Lesbians: How Did You Meet Your Girlfriend?,I'm a lonely 21.5 year old lesbian,actuallesbians
Advice please!,"I had been talking to this girl (let's call her Rose) on instagram but then she got into a relationship (it's been about 2.5 weeks now). I started hanging out with her and her gf at uni. They're fun to talk to and we're slowing growing a lil group of non-straight/cis people. Every time I've hung out with Rose, her girlfriend was with us until sunday night. I invited her to do face masks and hang out with my floormates. She came alone and slowly became more flirtatious. People started to leave at around 3am but she claimed she was ""really tired"" and that her res is ""too far"". I offered for her to stay the night and I said I would sleep in my roommates bed (she was out of town). She said she was comfortable sharing my bed with me and that she would be cold so I slept in my bed with her. Nothing sexual happened but she was cuddling up against me all night and it was quite intimate. She spent all of monday (yesterday) texting me and she came to hang out with my group of friends again. I'm confused as to what's happening. I don't want to break up a relationship but I like her and she seems to like me. Her and her gf are exclusive but aren't very serious yet. Am I reading too much into things?What do I do?",actuallesbians
This is just the meaningless vent of a young lesbian,"I'm 16 and about a month ago I went on my first date with a girl and we had fun and we keep trying to go on another one but it's not working out. The weekends are the best for her because she has a job and she's less busy then but every weekend something happens. The week after our date I was at the beach, the week after that I was visiting family, the week after that my mom made plans without telling me, and next week my mom made plans for me AGAIN without asking me first. We don't go to the same school and my school has a strict policy on phones so we never get to talk as much now that school has started. I'm really worried it's gonna fizzle out and I'm just kinda disappointed nothing will come from it. Any advice is appreciated but this was mostly just me venting. ",actuallesbians
Kristen Freakin' Stewart. 😍😍😍😍,,actuallesbians
Gal Gadot with short hair is just...,,actuallesbians
just waiting....,Still waiting for my first experience with another girl!!! ,actuallesbians
How do you know it’s love?,"How do you know when it’s love and not just infatuation? 

What about when it really feels like love but she tells you it might just be infatuation?",actuallesbians
"""Hi, I'm Lesbo!"" The result of finishing Disenchantment","&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/4lg212i2k2k11.png",actuallesbians
Girlfriend came out to her mom and was called “indecisive”,"My girlfriend (19F) and I(24F) have been dating for about a month now, we are both our first experience with women. Both of us dated men prior. She identifies as bisexual and so do I. I think neither of us expected to be dating a woman until we met each other. She’s wanted to tell her mom from the beginning because she doesn’t like going behind her back but never really knew how to bring it up to her so she has been procrastinating I guess you could say. Anyways, she decided to tell her tonight because she was tired of being stressed over it. She said the conversation went like this; 

Her: I have to tell you something 

Mom: oh gosh, it never ends well when you brings things up like this

Her: I promise it’s not that bad. Gabby (fake name for privacy) and I are dating. 

Mom: *silence*

Her: are you mad? 

Mom: I’m not mad, I’m just confused. 

Her: what are you confused about? 

Mom: What team do you swing for? 

Her: Both both men and women. 

Mom: I don’t think that’s the way it works, it’s usually one or the other

Her: I’m bisexual and I have periods where I prefer men and then periods I prefer women. 

Mom: *more silence* 

Apparently her mom just got quiet and really awkward and didn’t ask any more questions. She knows me, so I’m surprised she didn’t ask anything else about our relationship. I just hope she is just feeling awkward and is not actually uncomfortable about it. 

... anyways. My girlfriend is now in a terrible mood about her mom’s reaction. Personally, I don’t think it’s the worst reaction she could have had. Her mom doesn’t understand, but she will eventually (she seems like an understanding women) and I think the most important thing is that my girlfriend is happy with me and the rest will follow... but she’s super stressed about her mom basically calling her “indecisive” and the fact that she will probably have to have this conversation with her again. She has told me in the past that she HATES talking about her dating life with her mom and that when she tells her she wants to make it clear that she is Bi so that she never has to have this conversation with her again if she ever dates a guy in the future. Obviously that didn’t work out for her. 

She’s now in such a bad mood that she said she couldn’t talk anymore tonight and that she needs to sleep or something (I totally understand, I just wish she wasn’t feeling this way at all).

I’m not going to say anything tonight so that she can de-stress on her own, but does anyone have any advice of what steps she should take from here? Should she just leave it alone? I told her that she should say something like, “tell me what you’re thinking, I don’t like this awkward silence that’s happening, I’d rather you just ask me so that we can be on the same page” but she said that’s not the way their relationship works (I guess she is not that comfortable being so forward and open with her?)... 


TL;DR: girlfriend came out as bisexual and in a relationship with me... Mom was awkward and basically called her indecisive. Any advice for how to make things less awkward? 

",actuallesbians
G A L P A L S,,actuallesbians
"1 in 10,000 (Korean Lesbian Short Film)",,actuallesbians
Me and my gfs plans this weekend,,actuallesbians
Am I in the minority thinking both sides to this are wrong?,,actuallesbians
If I made a groupme for lesbians would people be interested in joining?,,actuallesbians
wlw😡irl,,actuallesbians
Looking For Advice,"I have never posted anything like this before so please excuse my awkward &amp; crappy writing.

I’m a 21 year old female &amp; I feel I might be bisexual but I’m not sure. I feel like I’m attracted to both men &amp; women. I’ve felt this way for a long time but I’ve only recently thought/talked about it more. I talk about my sexuality with my friends mostly, my sister knows &amp; is supportive &amp; I told my mom a few months ago but she didn’t take it too seriously. I don’t want to tell my dad because he’s weird about this stuff. 
I’ve been in very short relationships in high school but I’ve never really dated anyone for real, I’ve never kissed either. I guess the main reason for that is I have pretty severe anxiety which affects my ability to get out there &amp; do things most people would. I have recently made a friend that I’m so grateful for, they are so supportive &amp; I am much more outgoing than I used to be, They have really helped raise my confidence.
I’m  hoping to go to an lgbt center in my town with my friends to kind of start to meet people/get support.

This is just a really confusing time for me &amp; I guess the point of me posting this is just that I’m looking for people to relate to. If anyone has any advice for me I would appreciate it.",actuallesbians
I thought you knew,,actuallesbians
Who else here is going through their teens in their 20's?,,actuallesbians
I want be become a better me,"I cannot tell you how many social situations scare the living hell out of me every time I'm in them. I'm sure a lot of you can relate. This kinda is not the greatest because I'm polyamorous. Some of my issues include talking to people I never had before and making any little mistake in any kind of relationship. I'm sure you can connect the dots as to why that kinda sucks. 

So, I want to make me a better self. I want to be able to let go of my fears and finally have confidence in myself. My first step is trying to not try to fix things that aren't a problem when I get panicky about possibly saying the wrong thing.

That's not going to since all my social issues though. I was hoping someone might be able to give me like, some exercises or things I can do to help with that whole meeting new people thing. That's not going to be all, but it should be getting the big ones out of the way",actuallesbians
Is it possible to be a lesbian without really being attracted to women?,"That was probably a dumb title but oh well. Long story short, I’ve been dating men all my life and I’m very unattached to certain aspects of them such as their addiction to pornographic material and their lack of communication.  I’m not saying all men are like that. But I’ve been thinking about dating women instead because I’ve heard that many lesbians sometimes like to talk about their feelings and they seem to be open. I love that. I just want to love and feel loved and have a communicative partner. The only issue is that I don’t think I’m really attracted to women except maybe the more masculine ones. Sooo did any other lesbian or lgtbq person feel that way before? Also, are there any lesbians or lgbtq person who isn’t into looking at naked women so much? And sorry that wasn’t a short story like I thought it would be. Also, I really apologize if I offended anyone. ",actuallesbians
No comment,,actuallesbians
God Bless 🙏🏽 @clubclitoris IG,,actuallesbians
Long nails- are they a concern?,"I need an honest answer from experienced women. I’m new to the bi scene and am probably going to have my first sexual encounter with a women, yay, but I have long as fuck nails. Do I need to cut them? Like seriously, should I be concerned about this or just be mindful of them? I’m sorry if this is a stupid question but it’s a legitimate concern for me lol thanks! 

Edit to add: everyone seems to say the same thing; cut them! Thank you all so much! Cut they shall be! Thank you all for confirmation! ",actuallesbians
Queer YouTube Music Artist,"Okay here’s a YouTube artist I’ve been obsessing over for a while now, and a list of some of my favorite original queer songs she’s made. Hope you ladies like her too!
(Abbey Glover)

I wish you liked girls:
https://youtu.be/K8vgiideC58

She’s out of my league:
https://youtu.be/jr5mCvBZHbg

Her and I:
https://youtu.be/R2IWXkqUCnw

Her:
https://youtu.be/E6biYR-a7m8
",actuallesbians
"""The worst part of lesbian sex is when you're on your 10th orgasm and she won't let you tap out"" 😂😂",,actuallesbians
Happy stories of coming out?,"I’m starting to reach a point where it would be easier to come out. No more hiding and biting my tongue every time the subject of dating is brought up. Actually being able to talk about dates I’ve been on. 

My family (mom, dad, sister) are probably the more liberal family of our extended family, but I know they’ll still have something to say. 

Anyone have any positive inspirations they can drop? ",actuallesbians
The more women I meet,"The more I want to meet.

Y’all incredible. Just amazing. 

What are your goals? Your passions? 

Tell me everything and anything and let’s be on a giant, wholesome, lesbian date in this reddit thread hahahaha 


",actuallesbians
What’s your ideal date?,"Sometimes I just want to go to a restaurant with a nice view, or just go anywhere with a nice view, I can make the dinner back at home lol and talk endlessly all night.",actuallesbians
Trying to come out,"I am happily married.  i thought I was bi.  my husband keeps asking me if i’m gay... i’m scared to tell him the truth.  the truth is that i am happy.  i love our family.  

But i keep fantasizing about a woman i have yet to meet.  She’s tall, so I can look into her eyes.  We spoil each other with flowers, gestures, and orgasms.  She surprises me with romantic getaways to places we have never been.  I take her out for margaritas we can’t stop laughing the entire night.  Her laugh is contagious and adorable.  When she touches me, her touch is soft and demanding.  When me and this woman are together, there’s nothing can stop us.   i know this woman exists... but i’m too scared to find her ",actuallesbians
Is it possible to pull a muscle in your tongue?,Asking for a friend.. 😅,actuallesbians
How long did you talk to your SO before dating ?,,actuallesbians
Straight girl crush got a boyfriend,"Why do I do this to myself?

Anyone else want to commiserate, feel free~",actuallesbians
"In you opinion, what is the best hairstyle for a pussy?",I’m waxed but have a small triangle of super long curls. My girlfriend has let hers grow long and wild all summer and I just love it. Just love it. We may have a third woman join us so she wants to get fully waxed.  I maintain many woman still love hair but she’s obviously going to do what she wants with her body. So I’m curious the consensus. ,actuallesbians
Just watched Ocean's Eight..,"Holy hell Cate Blanchett is hot. 

Rihanna, Sarah Paulson, Sandra Bullock, could this movie get any better?",actuallesbians
Two Women Publicly Canned For Having Lesbian Sex In Malaysia,,actuallesbians
Has anyone met their significant other on Reddit?,Would love to hear your stories! ,actuallesbians
"Considering being a ""unicorn""",&amp;#x200B;,actuallesbians
I'm finally getting out of Russia!,"After moving from Berlin to Moscow a few years ago for work, I'm finally leaving in December/January. I'm not heading to Canada just yet, but I'll be in Spain, Italy, or Portugal. Anyone from these places? Can anyone tell me how the LGBT scene is in these places?

I'm thinking about heading to Turin, Barcelona, or Lisbon if you want to get specific on locations. ",actuallesbians
How to make it more than sex?,"So, I made this account just to ask for advice, since she’s on reddit, I didn’t want to use my main account.

I’ve met this girl on Tinder (yeah, I know), and after a couple bad experiences with lesbian fuckboys, I’m really happy I met her! But I’m not sure on how to make it become a thing.

It’s not as I want us to get married tomorrow, and adopts 3 dogs and 8 cats, I just want some tips to find out what she’s looking for and how to make us closer...

So, we were talking for about a week, then on my day off I got crazy drunk, and she really wanted to see me, so I got her to make the 1hr drive to me, she stayed over and we hooked up. And it was awesome!!

Now we’re still talking to each other all the time, and will probably get together on my next day off. But I’m just wondering what she wants.

Yes, I can ask her, but I don’t want to seem as I’m making some ultimatum... we’re both bi, but I haven’t been with any dudes since my divorce, and I’m not sure about her. How to ask it without sounding creepy?

Honestly, I just want some tips on how to be subtle on finding out what she wants and on how I can really bond with her... 

Since I was a teenager, I’ve always dated guys and girls, but never actually had a serious relationship with a girl. Not bc I didn’t want, but most girls I’d date we’re just too slow and lacking on confidence, so I’d get bored. This chick is amazing though! And we have lots in common! So I don’t want to mess it up! Please helppppp!! ",actuallesbians
Love this so much have to share,,actuallesbians
Dating in the closet,"I’ve started seeing someone recently and I feel like being in the closet will be my downfall. She’s so amazing and I’m really attracted to her. We were at a party this weekend and I wanted to hold her hand so bad. We’ve talked about me being in the closet and she said she’s ok with it and that I just have to go at my own pace. Thing is, I don’t feel like I can ever come out. I get so much anxiety just thinking about it and I’ve had full on break downs with her in bed. She said eventually I’ll get tired of sneaking around and one day just say fuck it. Maybe shes right, but I don’t see it happening anytime soon. I just really don’t want this to push her away. ",actuallesbians
Meme Monday Mega Thread!,"Welcome to the Meme Monday mega thread! 

Post all of your dankest doubleyoo-ell-doubleyoo memes here! The spicier, the better.

Subreddit rules still apply, you memesters.

This thread will be posted automatically at 9am EST on Monday , and will be taken down at 9am EST on Tuesday.
",actuallesbians
What straight people think about lesbians,,actuallesbians
Girlfriend appreciation thread!,"My girlfriend and I had our 4th date today and it was excellent. I’m falling head over heels for this girl and I’m so in love with her I can barely stand it. I blush so hard and lose my voice every time I talk to her so it makes things a little awkward, but she likes that! We spent all night playing Overwatch and watching Castlevania!

Tell me about your girlfriend! I love to hear people gush about their loved ones ❤️",actuallesbians
Does accepting your gayness make you more gay?,"So I’ve known that I’m gay for a couple years (I’m in my mid 30’s), but I always thought of myself as bi with more preference for men, so whilst I acknowledged my sexuality, I never really accepted it.  But recently, due to some personal circumstances, I had a bit of a revelation and properly accepted my sexuality.

Now that I’ve embraced the fact that I’m gay, I find myself incredibly attracted to women.  Did this happen to anyone else?  I mean maybe it’s just because I’d been denying that part of myself or something, but damn, I’m seriously girl crazy!  And I’m suddenly not that interested in men either.  I just kind of find them annoying.  I know that sexuality can be fluid, but this is really unexpected.

Unfortunately I only have one gay friend and have no idea how to start dating women 😂 ",actuallesbians
Can men still direct lesbian movies.,"Hi, I'm a straight white male. Also an aspiring filmmaker. But here me out...

I have an idea for a screenplay involving a closeted women going to her religious family for Christmas. Its inspired by two of my cousins who have since came out as lesbians. 

Given the current climate in Hollywood, can I, a straight white male, still write and direct a lesbian centric movie? I care about this story, as it means alot to my family, but I'm worried it'll spark some outrage. If its ever made of course, all I've written so far barely counts as a spec script.",actuallesbians
Idea for a lesbian Disney Princess film (or at least some form of fairytale),"This was inspired by the previous post about why making Elsa a lesbian would be a bad idea as it would be like an afterthought. Keep in mind that is rough and has little detail. 

A King and Queen incur the wrath of a witch. The witch curses their newborn daughter so that no man will ever want to marry her. But the Princess grows up to be a lesbian and is overjoyed. She loves that her love is for other women only. The witch is angry that her curse has backfired, but then she begins to think the Princess is pretty attractive . . .

It's probably not that great and I probably won't get around to writing it, but I think it's a pretty cute idea.",actuallesbians
Being friends with an ex??,"Hey all,
So a few weeks ago my first relationship with a woman ended. It was short, less than 2 months but intense and amazing. Things ended because of circumstances beyond our control (life is complicated) but she is amazing and a super cool person and we both said we want to be in each others lives. Now my question is, is it possible to be friends with an ex, how the fuck do I navigate this. I never spoke to a guy I dated after things ended so I’ve never had to deal with this. 
My straight friends all tell me it’s impossible....I hope not. 
Help! ",actuallesbians
Should I come out to my mom?,"Hey! I would just like some advice on whether or not I should come out to my mom, because I’m really on the fence here.

I’m a lesbian, I’ve known since I was an incredibly young age. My mom never shows any aggression/hate towards the LGBT community. She likes Ellen, she said before that she thinks Nate and Jeremiah (from a home renovation show) are a cute couple, I told her one of my friends was gay, and she was 100% okay with it.

However, I remember dropping HEAVY hints a year ago that I was gay, and my mom sat me down and said: “Honey, I don’t want you to be gay. People like that lead a very difficult life.” and a different time when I was talking about how girls are really pretty, she said: “You can’t say that. You’re not gay. You’re too young.”

So I have no idea what to do, honestly. She’s religious too, but she doesn’t believe that gay people are sinners, so that isn’t really a concern. I’ve always talked about how attractive I find girls, and just in general my interest in the LGBT community, so I think if I do come out, she won’t be surprised.

So, what do I do? Any opinions? Any tips? Any advice is 100% appreciated, thank you so much for reading!",actuallesbians
Third date,"Went super well. ☺️

We had pizza, played Mario Kart and Wii bowling, ate BBQ, and then rounded off the day with Space Jam. 

We might actually be 12. 🤔",actuallesbians
Weirdest/ most awkward flirting experience by you or to you,"I've got 2. I was at a music festival with my aunt and holding our spot while she got water, this extremely pretty girl came up to me said, ""oh shit, you've got a butterfly on your back', she than gently took the butterfly off my back told me I was beautiful and walked whilst motioning me to follow her which I of course could not (we had some stuff at the spot to and I could carry all of it).   

Another time at a concert with my friend I spent the majority of the night flirting with this very cute girl. I'm a socially awkward person so the fact that this was going so well was a major victory. There was another girl with her who looked kinda similar to her and I figured was her sister. At one point the singer started making out with the bassist than he made an somewhat awkward yet sweet speech about love. The girl I was flirting with than made out with the person that I thought was her sister. I awkwardly still stood by them cause I'm very short and we were right that stage so I was unwilling to lose my spot. And she continued to compliment me throughout the night ",actuallesbians
Pokemon Go add me as a friend?,"2602 9239 5317

Have the research task to add 3 new friends!",actuallesbians
Actual Lesbians Live Stream Saturday Sept 8 @ 4pm cst,"The first two live streams have been a success and we hope you're enjoying discussing topics from AL in real time as much as we are! If you've missed our live streams, the way that it works is me and a few friends get on camera via twitch (www.twitch.tv/rachelseeme) and host discussion from topics on AL. You and other rainbow raptors are able to participate on twitch chat. One of your posts might show up on the stream! Topics for the upcoming stream haven't been chosen yet, so if you'd like to submit your topic idea or a thread in particular that you thought was interesting, just tweet at us: ([https://twitter.com/actualstreaming](https://twitter.com/actualstreaming)). Along with tweeting at us, you can add us on instagram:  ([https://www.instagram.com/actuallystreaming/](https://www.instagram.com/actuallystreaming/)). Follow us and guaranteed we'll follow you back. Keep an eye out for links to artists we feature on the wait screen that appears fifteen minutes before the stream begins.

\- F.W.M.H by Molly: [https://soundcloud.com/mollyoconnor/fwmh](https://soundcloud.com/mollyoconnor/fwmh)

\- 8-bit version remix of Crystal Castles Reckless (made with LSDJ gameboy rom synthesizer tool) by Jane: [https://youtu.be/oCwmp9B62XI](https://youtu.be/oCwmp9B62XI)

Both artists are active members of AL and friends of Actually Streaming. ",actuallesbians
Pokemon go?,"8577 3523 8278

Friend code for you all :) 
(Got a field research to make new friends but yay gifts!)",actuallesbians
Netflix shows,"I need some recommendations on tv shows on netflix or hulu. Ive watched OITNB and Wentworth. I prefer tv shows to movies but if there is a really great movie, ill give it a go. Thanks!",actuallesbians
I'm so glad to be gay,"I never have to use the word ""hubby"" in my regular vocabulary.",actuallesbians
What did you study at college/university?,,actuallesbians
I wanna get Hayley Kiyoko/Rose &amp; Rosie home decor,"Im moving and planning on making my bedroom look a bit like a teenage queer girl (my current bedroom makes me a bit like a teenage boy messy af and emily ratajkowski calendar😍) so gonna get some a few things from their merch shops but wondering if any of yall seen stuff elsewhere, i saw a nice wall tapestrey on redbubble.

Where else can I get some queer/bi girl inspired home decor?

Not OTT like not rainbowy pride but like ""glimpses of gay"" i shall call it or whatev.",actuallesbians
being gnc/figuring out my identity,"hey all!
I added a content warning to be sure, this post is about having trouble with my gender.
First of all, i want to apologise if I'm being ignorant. I'm kind of new to questioning my gender, instead of only my attraction to women, so i'm not aware of all the issues surrounding this.

So i've been comfortable in my lesbian identity for more than a year now (but I've been aware of being a wlw for much longer). Ever since, i have identified as femme, since i believed that i really enjoyed putting on a show of being feminine, or my own take of it at least.
Since a few months I've been in a group chat with other wlw (before that i was pretty isolated from other wlw), and ever since i became more and more aware of how presenting as feminine feels like putting on a show, or like being ""in drag"" so to speak.

Last year was my first year in uni, which gave me more freedom to dress and act however i want, and I started wearing more GNC clothes (like patterned shirts, a tacky jacket, WIDE dungarees, etc) and got a more assertive attitude.
So i talked to my friends in the gc and many of them said they identified with wanting to be a gay man (even though I am not attracted to men) (i think one of them made a post about it in this subreddit or maybe the lgbt one) and i started thinking,,, maybe im NOT ,,,, woman..... but after that i was sorta dysphoric a few times, but I haven't been affected by that as much anymore. And i really don't want to equate butches to men, but i want to use it to illustrate that i feel some sort of disconnect from traditional womanhood.

Fast-forward to a few days ago, when i read a twitter thread (posted on tumblr) that was about how to present more gay, or on how to be more visible as a wlw. And i basically already did/identified with 95% of what OP wrote. At the end it said it was written by a butch lesbian and that really tipped me off (to my current uhmm gender troubles), because i previously hadn't REALLY given it much thought, and right now i'm considering the possibility that i could be. 

(I dont know if it's relevant but i basically dress like Antoni from queer eye, excect more colourful) (And of course it's not only about how you dress, but also body language, attitude etc)
The weird thing is that im kind of curvy, if i say so myself, and i don't really mind it, because I think it looks kind of cute (I do wear kind of baggy pants though), but i do mind it once im in the presence of men, like i don't want them to think of me as attractive in any way. It's cool with me when i'm with women, so that's a whole situation going on.

So i was wondering if there are any people out there who have gone through this or something similar, or maybe someone could point me to some resources so i can check it out myself. I scrolled through the butch tag on tumblr, but I haven't found something that is really relevant to me as of yet.
Thanks in advance :)",actuallesbians
When your multi-tool isn’t gay enough.,,actuallesbians
Trying to flirt,"Me around a smart and attractive woman that I'm interested in:

https://www.facebook.com/animaltalesbywaggle/videos/1941813292546699/  
",actuallesbians
*throws pokeball at girlfriend* 'Ow!',,actuallesbians
I want to taste her.,,actuallesbians
I got a huge crush on Carol from OITNB,,actuallesbians
Slang for Lesbian in different Hispanic countries 💃🏻💃🏻,,actuallesbians
*ahem* my gf application,"Looking for an adorable single lady.

Upsides to dating me:

1. Will forget to lock my car but it's ok because it's programmed to lock on its own anyways. That's kind of cool.

2. constantly turns the keys for anything the wrong way. Adorable right?

3. Has an art degree so I can draw u some cute shit

4. I have a car now. I know I already mentioned this but I'm stretching things thin here okay.

5. I love cats and they love me but the other day I may have excited a very round boi (girl actually) too much and she may have bit me. In the words of my best friend, ""you don't know how to do cats.""

6. Apologizes to cats.

7. Is lightweight. You'll never have to buy anyone a lot of drinks again buddy.

8. You will be supporting an absolute goof all around that is trying so, so hard to put herself out there and not freak out from my own goofiness at the same time.

(Good luck, raptors.)

Edit: holy shit ladies one at a time. I know my tendency to trip over my own ass is cute af but I won't be able to contain my ridiculousness for long enough to impress you all. Thank u.",actuallesbians
Very confused by my new professor. She accidentally sexually harassed me?,"Throwaway because my friends know my account.

So I’m at a loss for what I should do. I’m 23 and recently returned to finish my undergrad. I had previously done 2 years of college but dropped out due to being unhappy and went to work for my dads company. While I really enjoy work I realize that I need a degree so I decided to go back to school for 2 years to finish my degree in Econ at this local small Christian college. So school started a month ago and I’ve been working hard but most importantly I’m taking this Econ class from the department chair that is required to graduate. The first day the teacher assigned us to write a short paper on an economic topic that you’d like to research. Wanting to write about something I’m familiar with I wrote about the wage cap in contracting for LGBT peoples. In the essay I had some anecdotes from my experiences where I guess I basically said I was a lesbian. Flash forward a week later I stayed after class to talk to the teacher, who is a women in her 40s. We had been talking after lots of classes and she seemed to have taken a liking to me, she said; “she liked talking to an adult and not young undergrads.” Usually we just talked about random stuff in a very friend manner but this time she comes out and tells me all this personal information. She says that she got divorced from her high school sweetheart and came out as a lesbian. While I’m happy for her I thought that was a little to personally for teacher to share but I shrugged it off. The next day I stay and chat with her and she immediately goes in telling me about her new girlfriend and asks me all these questions about my SO which made me feel uncomfortable so I left and didn’t stay after the next class, I thought that I could just go to class and ignore her for the rest of the semester but I was wrong. After I stopped talking to her she the asked me to visit her during officer hours to discuss my grade. When I went to her office. We talked about school for maybe 10 minutes before she started talking about a hook up she had and went into somewhat graphic detail, which I of course thought was very unprofessional. I just went with it but what made me walk out of there and write this call for advice was she then pulled her top down exposing one of her breast to me and asked what I thought about her new nipple piercing she had. I just got out there as quickly as I could. I don’t know I what to do. On one hand you have what I think is just a lonely middle aged women who was in a terrible marriage for twenty years and is looking for a connection with a somewhat similar women which makes sense, she is always so shy around me. On the other hand she is making me pretty uncomfortable and I worry about if she doing this to other women. I guess I want her to be professional but I don’t know to who to turn to in my life. I think she’s just lonely so if I tell the school yes it stops but she gonna get fired and lose everything for something I think can be fixed. I don’t know. ",actuallesbians
Any lesbian artists on here? This is a recent drawing I finished. Post your work/instagram in the comments :) Mine is @whitneykittyart,,actuallesbians
Anyone from Madrid to recommend a bar?,"Going there for the weekend for a  working event, we have the Friday free, so the LGBT crew from the company is looking for a place to go have a drink, there shouldn't be too many of us (5 tops). We're staying at the Safestay near the Alonso Martinez station. Anywhere fun for a mixed (girls and guys) group? Thanks!",actuallesbians
Is The 100 worth it to watch just for the lesbian relationships?,,actuallesbians
"Ladies, do you appreciate this?","I met this girl in the club (we both go to the same uni) and we gassed each other up, we were both pretty drunk so I didn't quite remember what she looked like, only remembered her name when it was mentioned to me later.

Summer holidays came and one of her friends started following me on Instagram ( I have no idea who she is). I then remembered this girl and followed her but didn't say anything, we just liked each other's posts.

Couple weeks later, I'm bored so I make a tinder and we match but my tinder gets deleted the next morning ( I just couldn't log back in).

I haven't said anything to her because I just want to approach her in person the proper way. I'm not looking to just fuck. Is this okay for me to do? I followed her 2 months ago and uni starts in a bit. ",actuallesbians
I wish male attention didn't feel gross,"Went out with my friends who are straight last night, had a good time overall but gosh I really hate when men compliment me!! I never really got hit on by people until I started going out to bars and clubs, and it's great when it's from another girl but when its from a man it just feels terrible. Telling them I'm gay doesn't stop them cuz then they just go off about how they think I'm beautiful and wish I was straight. Like man, even if I was straight I probably wouldn't be interested lol god it's just terrible because I do enjoy attention just not from men.",actuallesbians
I'm just starting to come out as bi but I'm already a useless lesbian ¯\_(ツ)_/¯,,actuallesbians
"How did you know you were ready, and how did you start?",Hey everyone! I’m in an infinite loop of downloading Her or Tinder and deleting them and re-downloading. I’m finally ready to put myself out there after starting to come out at 24. I just don’t know where to start. Any advice on how to meet people or just how you started putting the real you out to the world would be so helpful!! TIA,actuallesbians
....tf,,actuallesbians
What I’ve realized watching lesbian and bisexual women on television,I identify with the badass brunette characters and I have crushes on the bubbly blonde characters ,actuallesbians
I looked a lot gayer when I was in the closet then I do now that I'm out,"I was looking through old pictures of myself and I realized I looked a lot more stereotypically gay before I came out. I had a mohawk and only wore boxers and flannels and shit, and everyone in my highschool called me a dyke and I was like ""no I'm not I'm super straight!"" 

Biggest lie ever. 

Now that I'm out 6 years later, but still trying to get an office job I grew my hair out, dyed it a normal color, I hide my tattoos and piercings, I don't dress like a punk lesbian anymore. 

Here's some before and afters for giggles:
https://imgur.com/a/rPBCVms",actuallesbians
Am I a terrible person for wanting to break up with trans boyfriend because I’m still very gay?,"Hi, lesbians...

After nearly 5 months dating my best friend again (after 6 years of breaking up and just being friends; 5 years after they decided to transition), I’m beginning to accept the fact that I’m dating a dude. 

He stopped taking hormones a few years ago after only a few months on T. Had top surgery. I’m realizing now I’ve been clinging to his feminine voice, facial features and female genitalia as like this whole “I’m still sortaaaa dating a girl” belief system. Maybe I can make this working dating someone who goes by he. After all, he says he is trans masculine and more in between a man and a woman than a straight up man. That’s not fair to him.   

Then sometimes his habits throw me for a loop: he’ll paint his nails, wear mascara and eyeliner, wear his sports bra instead of wearing a packer. Yeah it confuses me sometimes but I know he’s all about gender-bending. 

We got into a fight once totally unrelated to gender and he threw this at me: “maybe you shouldn’t be with me if you really want to be with a woman”. That hurt because it’s true. 

The honeymoon phase is over and I realize my current situation. I love him so much and care about him. I’m realizing some of our core values don’t line up; but I’m also realizing... I’m STILL gay and I am not dating a woman. And it feels like something is missing and I’m not being true to myself. 

For months I felt guilt about feeling this and I thought it was superficial. But I thought about “hetero” couples where either the man or the woman comes out as gay and they eventually break up due to this. I empathize with that situation and don’t view the gay person as being superficial and sacrificing love for sex. Sometimes they stay together if they have children together or for other reasons. 

I don’t know what to do now. It doesn’t help we are in a LDR. I want to spend a weekend with him and see how I feel. I don’t think it’s worth it to stay together with him and then have sex with other women. I  want my relationship to be monogamous and all-inclusive. 

However, I can’t help but feel like a terrible person for getting into this relationship with someone I adore; knowing that I am going to be with a trans guy. And now finding out I really wish I were with a woman. ",actuallesbians
Any gays in Ottawa want to be my friend?,"Hey there, long time lurker first time poster. Moved from Halifax last year where there qas a thriving gay community. Not so much here. If you're in the area and your looking for someone to have coffee with, hang out, or just go for walks and have a bitch fest i'm your gal!",actuallesbians
What is your style?,There’s always some interesting posts on here about fashion and style so I’m curious about how everyone dresses. What is your style??,actuallesbians
Am I doing something wrong with dating girls?,"I feel like I must be doing something wrong here. I seem to have trouble finding any girls who are interested. Even like if I go out dancing or something, I think a lot of times girls look uncomfortable around me. I get hit on enough by straight guys to think that's it's not my looks, so I'm thinking I must be doing something off-putting. Does anyone have any tips? Maybe I'm just too straight-looking.",actuallesbians
Annnnd now I'm ugly crying in public. I wish I was there to get one of those hugs.,,actuallesbians
Ayyyy where all my fellow guitar players at??,,actuallesbians
To the girl I met last night &lt;3,"You were selling me ice cream from a candy store at the county fair. I saw you and was immediately smitten (and nervous) but I took my chance to flirt with you. 

I complimented your tattoo and you got a little flustered, but seemed happy about it. I thought maybe you were into girls from that reaction so.... 

If you're on here please let me take you out to dinner!! You're beautiful. ",actuallesbians
smoothitude (long),,actuallesbians
Lisa gets it.,,actuallesbians
"Great movie, great gay meme, great series",,actuallesbians
"New job, new look? Need suggestions for ""business casual"" cute soft butch type clothes to wear!",In the title! Thanks in advance :),actuallesbians
r/ reallesbians made me beyond depressed,"okay please hold the hate ive had enough today.. i just need to say this to someone other than my girlfriend because well.. as much as we love each other its cathartic to just say it to an audience of both literally no one and everyone.

​

r/ reallesbians made me feel like a freak, like i can never be a true lesbian because im trans. i know y'all hear it often, a trans girl questioning her.. everything.. but i cant really help this i know its probably annoying..

​

anyways.. just about everyone on that sub basically said i cant be lesbian because im not biologically female. because i can never experience a period or a genuine vagina (which by the way i lay awake at night crying over..) that i'll never be gay. well im not straight so what the heck am i? im not straight because im a woman but then im not lesbian because apperantly im not a woman??

​

...thank you for bearing with me and alllowing for me to get this off my chest

​

\-kristina

&amp;#x200B;

Edit: thank you everyone, i havent felt this validated probably in my life. the last few months have been hard for me and all of you just made life bearable for me again

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
I'm worried that I'm nobody's type,"I'm 20 years old, and I've been told that I don't look like a lesbian a lot of times. But I'm not particularly feminine either. I wear dresses, but I also wear blazers etc. I don't wear jewelry or make-up, and my hair is completely natural. I'm petite (I'm only 5'2), and quite slim. 

I just don't feel like lesbians like how I look, and I don't really know why because I get compliments whenever I leave the house and that's not even an exaggeration. Just today, I went out and two different people complimented my hair. My hair is blonde and extremely curly, so it's really big and voluptuous haha. I definitely stand out in a crowd and I get looked at a lot. But girls who are around my age don't tend to look at me that much, and I can't remember the last time a girl who I was also attracted to complimented me.

I just feel like because I don't fit into any strict stereotype or label, no girl will ever find me attractive enough to date because I'm not their type :/ And it really upsets me. Whenever I tell people about this, they just think I'm being silly. I consider myself to be about average on the looks scale. And it seems like the girls who I'm attracted to are far more attractive than me. They wear make-up and just look stunning, whereas I'm more natural and 'cute' I suppose. I just don't really know what to do or think. How can I believe all those compliments when I can't even find a girl to go on just one date with me?!?",actuallesbians
What is your type?,"Besides the typical “every woman is beautiful” response, what is your type? I agree that every woman is gorgeous, but what do you like about them? Long hair/short hair? Eyes? Smile? 
Masculine/feminine? Short/tall? Big/small? Piercings? Tattoos? Maybe even a cultural preference? Style? Personality? 

I think you can see what I’m getting at! I’m just curious to see what other woman are into! Be as specific, or non-specific, as you’d like!",actuallesbians
"EXTREMELY gay things I did way, way before I realized I was gay","I was driving today and remembered a couple of things I did when I was younger which were so incredibly, clearly gay that the mental gymnastics it took to convince myself I was straight should qualify me for an olympic award. I was absolutely convinced I was straight until I was 20 even though these things happened. It's a miracle. Here are some very real, very gay things I actually did which should have clued me in much sooner:

* Every year in Elementary school on valentine’s day, I wrote like a page-long anonymous letter to this one girl in my class and stuck it in her box. I’d write stuff like “your eyes are the prettiest shade of brown, you’re the most beautiful girl I have ever seen, and you should believe in yourself more.” I never signed my name. I didn’t question why I was doing this just for her and none of my other classmates.
* I wrote a song?? about how I suspected that one of my friends had a crush on me?? These were the lyrics:

“When the sleepy curtain falls

Like the shadows on your walls

Do the dreams that creep into your sleep

Mean anything at all?

Do my own dreams coincide

With the things you try to hide?

Though my heart can scream, will simple dreams

Keep me satisfied?

Can I crash your dreams tonight, darling?”

&amp;#x200B;

* Made myself in The Sims in a house full of male and female love interests who had to compete for my affections a la *The Bachelor,* “just to see” whether my sim would end up with a man or a woman “for laughs” and intentionally pushing her to marry the hot soft-butch crime queen in a leather jacket.
* Fantasized and wrote stories about myself as the chosen knight of this fantasy queen, played in my mind by a young Alex Kingston, and the very romantic relationship between these two characters. 
* Took the girl I wrote the song for to prom twice. Our senior year she asked me to skip prom with her to go to an anime con. I don’t even like anime but I said yes just so I could spend time with her while she sewed my costume.
* Changed in the bathroom stall in gym because I felt a vague sense of impropriety stripping down in a room full of all my female classmates who were also stripping down, and was also nervously aware that I was the only party following this chivalrous code.
* Cried on the bus to high school when I realized that I’d never actually marry my musical icon, singer-songwriter SJ Tucker, because she already had a long-term partner and was 15 years older than me and lived in Portland and had also never met me. It was a devastating blow
* Campaigned for gay rights as an ""ally,"" arguing that ""I should, hypothetically, be allowed to legally marry a woman. I wouldn't ever want to, but it really bothers me that I can't, on principle.""
* Had frequent, pleasant dreams about this powerful blonde woman dancing with me at a party and then kissing her. I woke up sad that she was gone. What did I think this signified???

There's probably so many more of these I just haven't remembered yet. It's mind-blowing how much gay stuff I did, fully believing I was either completely straight or mostly straight. Post in the comments some of your own baffling ""obviously I was gay how did I not see that"" stories. ",actuallesbians
Is ‘Gay face’ a thing?,"Last week i noticed a girl at work, i’d never seen before. She immediately pinged my gaydar, not by the way she dresses but rather her face. Through some ‘research’ i found out her name and she’s been working w the company for 3 months. Funny thing is, 2 months ago i got into a little accident in the parking lot (no one got hurt), i did a hit and run... i know, i know i’m an idiot. But she saw it. I reported it the next day. The lady who owned the car had filled out the insurance thingy, and there was a witness name and # filled. It was her. I’ve never spoken to her and now I probably never will, out of embarrassment. 

Also a couple of weeks ago i came across a girls Instagram account (Andy Cohen’s assistant) she pinged my gaydar as well and then, i saw that she has a gf. 

These things reminded me of a podcast episode of ‘The L Word Made Me Gay’ where they were talking about how the actress that plays Danna has a gay face. 

Is gay face a thing?? ",actuallesbians
Any DC lesbians here?,"My friend and I are thinking of going to the new lesbian bar A League of Her Own tonight around ten. We've been there before on a Saturday and it was great, but we're not sure how lively it'll be lateish on a Sunday. Any input?",actuallesbians
Had sex with a woman for the first time last night,"I just want to talk about it. I guess I'm still processing things. I've been seeing someone for a little while and she's great. It's like one second we were just cuddling...then the next we were having sex. She knows how nervous I get and was really patient with me. I asked her to show me how to go down on her and wanted her honest feedback afterwards. She orgasmed (which I didn't expect to be able to make her do) so that was a nice ego boost, quite truthfully. I asked her what could've been better and she said I was using too much pressure (suction) on her clit, so I'll keep that in mind next time (hopefully tonight!) I've never felt this strongly about someone before and I'm just really excited to further explore not only the sex, but her as a person. ",actuallesbians
I recently started watching a bunch of videos of Kate McKinnon and she is literally the funniest person on the planet,,actuallesbians
A gay card but it's for girls,,actuallesbians
"Any SoCal wlw here? (LA, San Diego, OC, etc)",Where are y’all at? And do y’all wanna do a meetup?,actuallesbians
WLW Twitter: a story in 4 parts (very short parts),,actuallesbians
Best thing I've seen all week,,actuallesbians
Please note this list is not exhaustive,,actuallesbians
Why am I gay?,"I’m happy that I am. 

But why am I? Scientifically, psychologically, why am I gay? 

I’ve heard the vague “gay gene” explanation, but if anyone has a bit more knowledge on why cis gay women are gay,  I’m all ears. ",actuallesbians
"I experience attraction to fictional men, but relationships with real men make me sick?","Hello ladies! I'm not sure if I'm a lesbian or bisexual? I still do have attraction/crushes to fictional/famous men (although I will admit RARELY) but whenever rl men flirt with me I feel incredibly uncomfortable and the thought of having a relationship with a man makes me feel SICK to my core. I constantly doubt my attraction to men, but wherever I go to ID as lesbian, those crushes always make me doubt myself, and make me uncomfortable with the label - like I'm a fake or a liar?!?! Could use the help of some wise WLW &lt;3 &lt;3 ( I love you all!!!) ",actuallesbians
‘Lesbian Couple Paints House In Rainbow Colors To Troll Anti-Gay Neighbors Who Harassed Them’,,actuallesbians
The worse part about moving is leaving her behind.,"I've been living in Japan off and on since 2008, full time since 2010 (stepdad is Japanese, brought us over when I was 16, and I decided to live here when I graduated high school) Recently, I got a job offer back in my home country of Canada and I've decided to take it. I feel excited, but also guilty as hell because I know I'll have to end my fwb relationship with an amazing woman. She deserves better than a long distance relationship, and with her studying to be a doctor I know she'll not have the time to focus on an LDR or have extra money to come see me, nor will I have the time to come back to Japan more than once a year. It sucks, but I feel like it's for the best. ",actuallesbians
The Gay is killing me.,My crush in school called me adorable and i couldnt help but blush and scream inside because my heart couldnt take it. Im 13 and i've never kissed anyone or had a relationship before and shes also very gay and i dont know what to do and after she called me that she needed someone to love and i was so flustered. Ik it prbly doesnt mean anything but i cant help wanting to be her gf i mean shes so amazing. Anyways kill me i will never be loved.,actuallesbians
big mood 😩 what is your teacher crush(es) story?,,actuallesbians
"just need a listening ear :( (closeted gf, unsure how to deal)","i am dating a wonderful wonderful girl who i have fallen hard and fast for. i adore her, i adore telling people about her, i adore being open (when we feel safe, so in empty bars or in gay bars or at my house). this is my first serious relationship (i'm 21, she's soon to be 22) and i love every moment of it. the only thing thats making me upset and sad is that she is in the closet to her family and to people she's not prepared to tell, like her housemates or anyone who doesn't come off as 100% okay with gay relationships. she's met my family and all my friends and they all adore her and yet i may never meet her family for a long time. i feel so selfish for feeling sad about this, because she absolutely needs to wait until she's certain that coming out is safe and won't affect her family relationship. i understand that totally, yet i'm plagued by a gentle feeling of being pushed into a weird liminal closet. i was over at her new apartment yesterday and out of habit she closeted us by introducing me to her housemate as her friend. i felt so disconnected from myself when she did that, and again i felt sad.

i feel so horrible that i'm finally putting this into words but i feel like i just need to tell someone who will understand. i love her so much and i dont intend on ending things, i just needed to put this into words.  i cant really explain this to anyone because my close LGBT friends are mostly gay single guys in their 20s who wouldnt dream of dating seriously for another decade. so i hope someone on here would understand and assure me that i'm not a monster for feeling sad about this. or if i am i hope someone will be honest and let me know i need to work on this somehow. ty &lt;3",actuallesbians
Sunday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
Today a lady working at the farmer’s market paused serving her line of customers to tell me several times that I was beautiful.,"That’s never happened to me before, so it really made my day. Thanks, San Mateo farmer’s market queen! I hope we can connect someday. :D",actuallesbians
Am I single bc I have TOO much game?...,,actuallesbians
Keira Knightley in Collete (2018),,actuallesbians
I really think I've fucked up,"I've got a ticket to the King Princess gig in London, and I've been really excited to go for weeks now, but I'm really panicking now because I didn't think this through at all.

I'm a trans woman. In fact, I'm a pre-HRT transwoman who barely passes, is shit at makeup, has a voice that might as well be fucking James Earl Jones', and I'm going to a gig in London alone. And I know the LGBTQIA+ community is usually super accepting and welcoming but it's a lesbian artist and the majority of people there are probably gonna be lesbians or bi and I'm scared that I'll make them uncomfortable by being this ugly hulking mess hiding in corner and I've fucked up even more because I've put my proper name of the tickets but my ID only has my deadname and why the fuck did I think this was a good idea. I'm just scared, I really don't know what to do.",actuallesbians
"Been hitting the gym lately, finally hit goal #1 of turning into Prince(ss) Charming.","My GF has a bad hip, that occasionally flares up and makes it difficult for her to walk. Combined with seeing her curled up sick on the bathroom floor too many times where I couldn’t do anything, I wanted to make it my workout goal to one day be able to carry her at a moment’s notice. 

Well, the other day she pulled something in her hip while swimming, and could barely limp her way out of the shower. I was able to scoop her up and carry her to the bed 😭 next comes being able to deadlift her straight up off the floor!! 💪",actuallesbians
I found our beer.,,actuallesbians
I am not my wifes mother.,"Does anyone else get called their partners mother? People tend to assume I am her mother instead of a friend or even significant other. She is older than me which makes it even more frustrating.
Anyone else have the same problem?",actuallesbians
Shout-out to the cutie at Ren Fest today who serenaded me,"I don’t know who you are, you fantastical queer bard, but your song made my day 200x better. I hope you continue to be amazing and keep serenading strange women in line. Highlight of the renaissance faire!
",actuallesbians
advice for a baby gay on taking initial steps to meeting girls,"Context: So I've been into girls since I can remember, my first sort of sexual experimentation was with girls. I've had a few sexual interactions with straight girls in my teens but nothing romantic or passionate, it was more just them drunkenly experimenting or their boyfriends talking them into threesomes. I've lived in a pretty small town for most of my teenage/young adult life &amp; there's never been a gay community here as far as I know. The only gay girls I ever met were from out of town &amp; already in longterm relationships or just not my type. I tried a dating app called HER &amp; I tried Bumble too but had absolutely no luck finding girls in my area &amp; I suck at texting anyway, I prefer face to face.   
I'm moving to the big city soon because I'm starting university ( in a week) &amp; they have a gay village but I'm super nervous about going out alone ( it's probably not the safest thing to do either) &amp; have basically no experience meeting or flirting with women.  I've been with guys but the older I've gotten the more I realised I'm not into them &amp; I just don't enjoy sex with them. I think maybe it was because growing up the norm was just to be with guys &amp; I always felt that it was expected of me to date men.  

This is all so new to me I feel like I'm at a disadvantage. I'm 20 frickin years old &amp; I'm completely oblivious to this sort of thing. So my questions are: 

* What did you guys do when you were young &amp; figuring out your sexuality &amp; trying to meet girls for the first time?   

* Did you go to gay bars?  

* How do you figure out which girls are actually gay?  

* Is flirting the same with gay girls as it is with hetero people or is it an entirely different ball park?   

* Do I actually have to cut my nails short or is that just a stereotype cause like I have sex toys &amp; a tongue, I don't need my hands, do I?  

* What in the ever loving f\*ck are all these categories &amp; labels &amp; slang anyways? 

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
Asking Girls Out,"I've been in the dating game for some time now and I'm starting to get a little tired of the same old song and dance. I want to get some opinions from all kinds of lesbians on my planned approach.

For a little background, I'm a femme who dates femmes but I have never really asked someone else out because I enjoy single life. I don't mind the time in between dating and relationships so I don't really date until someone else asks me out. Most of the girls I've dated thus far have been older or slightly more dominant so they've always made the first move but lately I've also found myself attracted to slightly younger girls who, I guess, are more on the shy or submissive side? I'm not sure. Anyway, this means I probably have to make the first move to get the date and so I've started sending the first message. I've actually gotten responses to most of my first messages but our conversations just kind of taper off and so I just back off because I figure they're not interested and I don't want to come off as too aggressive. But, I also just want to know for a fact that they're not interested because I've been learning about the concept of the 'useless lesbian' and that's just confusing the situation more haha. Besides, I've learned that lack of text chemistry doesn't always equate to lack of in person chemistry so it'd just be nice to be certain that things wouldn't work out before I write off a person in a small pool of options.

How would you feel if someone you kind of knew or someone you didn't know at all just straight up asked you if you were seeing anyone and if you wanted to go on a date? Please be honest and think about how you would actually respond and not the way you wish you would respond. And sorry for the wall of text!",actuallesbians
Relationship Advice.,"Soooo, I post infrequently and I lurk a lot, but I thought it best to actually solicit the advice of strangers regarding this issue.  I'm hoping you all can help me out.  I really debated on where to post this given the topics at hand, but this sub seems like it would give me the best advice.  I kinda love this place. :-)

Also, after typing this out I'm apparently long winded.  Sorry!

Anyway, a bit of background.  I'm a trans bi girl who's been dating a cis lesbian for over a year.  I'm 19, she's 20, and we both attend a fairly prestigious liberal arts college.  We actually just moved into an off campus apartment together, and we're both loving it.  So, what follows is something of a persistent problem, but it's more of something that could become a major issue if we let it.

Now, to it.  It's been a fairly rough year for both of us.  Nothing extremely relevant on my end.  Just some family stuff and a really bad experience on a new HRT drug.  My girlfriend's problems are more relevant.  I'm not sure if this is a fair comparison, but it does come from a longtime friend of hers.  She compared her to a much more toned down Eliot Reid from Scrubs.  Hyper intelligent, a bit self-serious, extremely sweet, but also full of neurotic self-doubt.  Pretty accurate.

Her issues are kind of centered around her weight.  She's by no means heavy, just curvy.  It's not a weight issue, it's just how she's built.  In high school she moved from fad diet to fad diet until her mom put her foot down, and my experience is that beyond a little self-deprecation she had been okay with it until some asshole tried to hit on her earlier this year, got shot down, and called her fat in retaliation.  It's really been bothering her for months, and it kind of crested last night.

Yes, we're both underage, but this does involve alcohol.  We had friends over to just hang out, and by the end of the night it was just the two of us with a classmate and her boyfriend.  Everyone was pretty buzzed, and I don't actually remember how we got on the issue of her appearance, but it devolved into the three of us trying to get her to see how pretty she is.

And then she outed me.  I've run pretty stealth around campus (she knows, obviously, and so do some professors and close friends).  I'm still deciding how open I want to be about my trans status in general so I've shied away from talking about it.  Anyway, she is a couple of inches taller than me, and given I'm pretty thin and an early transitioner there isn't much ""boy"" in my physique.  I'm not going to restate what she said, but she compared the two of us, referenced my trans status, and made note that she's ""bigger"" than me.

It WAS an accident.  I mean, seriously, the ""Oh shit""s and apologies started right away, and the truth is I'm not all that angry.  I think I will be if it happens again.  It is my business who knows, honestly, and it's shitty to remove that choice from me.  Still, accidents happen, and the two friends are cool enough people.  So, that isn't the issue.

The issue is I really think she'd benefit from seeing someone professionally at this point.  She's close with her mom, and she's been pushing her in that direction too.  I don't want to feel like I'm piling on, though.

So, thoughts?

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
Advice?,I have a crush on a girl that works in the local bar. I can't stop thinking about her and she has the coolest hair I've ever seen. So far I've been too awkward to interact with her but lately i've really wanted to go up and tell her she's cute and that I think her hair is cool. Should I do it or is that too forward? How could i start talking to her without being creepy? Many thanks!,actuallesbians
How to flirt with girls (and not embarrass yourself in the process)?,"I want to get more comfortable with conversing with girls in a semi-romantic way. I’m 19 and the few interactions I’ve had so far, over text, have been disastrous due to me not being the most social person ever and it being the first time I’ve ever flirted. I have a tendency to go a bit over the top and come off really cryptic for some reason 😂 so I could really use the help.",actuallesbians
I’m Questioning and this is how it feels.,,actuallesbians
Random quirks/traditions/routines you and your partner have: Go!,"I’ll start... 
my wife and I have been married for a little over two years, and together for 7. Every night for the last 7 years when we are going to sleep, we kiss goodnight and have this conversation.. 
“You spooning me or am I spooning you?” Sometimes it’s “can I lay on you?” Where one of us nuzzles up by the others neck and lays on their shoulder... We decide on a position and then we fall asleep cuddling. ❤️ For 7 years! Give or take a few nights where one of us has had too much to drink or is sick.. 🍷🍺🤷‍♀️
Wonder if it’ll ever fizzle out? Hope not! 
Let’s hear yours! ",actuallesbians
Can I just go a day without male attention please,So much as of late. Every other day some guy has hit on me or asked me out or said shit. Every other freaking day. I feel disgusting right now. I can't even get a girl to at least look at me,actuallesbians
GAY4GIRLS #2 Accepting submissions!,,actuallesbians
I have my first official girlfriend :))),We r both sadly in the closet with our families but I’m so excited I needed to post about it somewhere!!! She’s so nice and smart and funny and cute and I’m just excited for the future for the first time. Thank u for tuning in,actuallesbians
"If there was a lesbian version of queer eye, what sort of things would we make over about straight girls lives to make them better?",,actuallesbians
"Inspired by the latest business cards, I decided to make my own..",,actuallesbians
She accepted to go on a date. h e l p.,"Ok. Throwaway account bc you never knows who lurks and I am nervous enough already and I need to vent for advice guys. Useless shy lesbian panicking here~ 

So this is my first date in a very looong time and I am starting to take all of it in. Like. SHE ACTUALLY SAID YES TO THAT OMG.

We matched on Bumble and we have been talking on and off for 3 days. Happens that I am working on an event that she has never attended before and I have an extra pass - so I took the leap of faith and asked her out, if she was ok with it being kind of out of the blue and everything you know. AND SHE WAS OK WITH IT. 

CAN YOU BELIEVE?

I am so nervous.  We have a lot in common and I really enjoy talking to her and I am thrilled that I will finally put a voice to those text messages but I AM STILL BORDERLINING PANIC

I'm very self conscious that my figure ain't the most attractive - so I am hoping that my personality will show. I was so surprised she accepted my match really. Like WHOA. She seems to be pretty smart and she looks so cute omg. This gay ass is crushing for her looks and by talking to her, falling for her mind ♡ 

It is my first date with an online match: PLEAAASE DROP ME YOUR BEST DATE ADVICE! ",actuallesbians
My roomie accidentally made me feel like super lesbian,"If there's two things I love, it's cute girls, and opening jars for cute girls. My roomie is a cutie (straight before you go there). There was a gentle knock on my door, prompting me to get off my arse and see what she needed. As I opened the door, there stood my roomie holding a jar of pasta sauce and looking sad. I looked down to meet her gaze and see what was up. Without saying a word, she hands it to me and my purpose became clear. 

I shed my flannel, fastened my sports bra, slapped on some Bengay and put my hair up in a bun. I gripped that fearsome jar and twisted with all my might until a very satisfying *pop* echoed throughout our apartment. With a smile on my face, she takes the jar back from me. ""I knew you could do it, pvriss!""

And I will be riding that high for the next week. 

I don't know why I made this post.",actuallesbians
Do you want biological children?,,actuallesbians
Things I need,,actuallesbians
Trying to make new friends,"Hi everyone,

I'm a gender non conforming woman and I haven't found it very easy to make female friends, so obviously the best place to meet new people is reddit. I moved to a new country recently and am having a great adventure, but it's not easy leaving all my friends behind. 

I guess I've been in the closet for a long time also.",actuallesbians
Darling its better down where its wetter,,actuallesbians
Girl gets disgusted I invited her to dance with me and my group....AT A GAY BAR...DURING PRIDE WEEK,"Seriously what the Fuck?

Went to a gay bar in my mostly conservative city. 

Fuck it im going to say it, its Calgary, AB. So obviously this is at Twisted Element.

I don't have a lot of gay friends so i mostly went with my straight friends and one gay guy.

We were dancing in a group and there was another group of girls behind us awkwardly. I make eye contact with the girl and I motion to her like ""come join us"" and she stops and looks at me in disgust. 

I thought maybe she didnt hear me so i said it again louder, and she rolled her eyes in disgust. Like, wtf this is a gay bar. During pride week. 

I tried to shrug it off as a ""ok whatever bitch"" but im still baffled it happened. It pretty much killed my confidence in approaching girls.

Like wtf. Seriously?",actuallesbians
This lesbian couple has painted their house in rainbow colours to troll their anti-gay neighbours,,actuallesbians
I met a girl at uni who's an incredible guitarist,"I play drums....so I invited her over to jam and she sounded excited to come over

&amp;#x200B;

holy fuck",actuallesbians
The gay smirk,,actuallesbians
Brazil and Portugal are beautiful together,,actuallesbians
Tash Sultana's Flow State album?,"So far, I love this album that was just released. While 5 songs have been out in the wild before (Big Smoke having a studio recording's a nice extra), all the new material's been an enjoyable experience for my ears.  There's good variety over the whole album. It's hard to pick out a favorite out of the new songs, I like them all for different reasons. Anyone else digging their teeth into the album? Thoughts?",actuallesbians
How do you typically respond to being asked out?,"We've all seen the posts about useless this or that, or mutual crushes that go without being acted upon due to crippling shyness or awkwardness. 

But what do you do when another woman asks you out? When they actually use the words, ""can I take you out sometime?"" 

Do you say yes? Do you play bashful, giggle, then run away? I'm slowly gaining the sense that some women don't really like being asked out on a date. If that's the case, how else is the whole dating/ wlw thing supposed to work? Is asking someone out, while being explicit that yes, you'd like it to be a date, too forward or offputting?

I also have the same question (which is one many of us have asked) about mutual matching on dating apps. Like, if you swiped right on someone who later matched with you...and then they sent you a first message, do you respond? What kind of message is most likely to get you to respond? And we won't talk about the really lame ones like ""hey, sup?"" We all know that weak game don't got no play. ",actuallesbians
“I thought LGBT people are hornier”,"That was in response to me wanting one of my dates go well.. 

I know I posted only a couple days ago. But gawd was this the most infuriating gaslight filled conversation...

So I’m talking to a guy friend “Matt” about how I have a few dates lined up and I’m hopeful at least one will go well. To me- going well is having a connection, getting a second date, a kiss would be nice. Clearly to him- wanting a good date or the definition of a good date is sex. 

Anyway. I told him- not true. LGBT people are just people. He tells me this is based on something someone from the community says and all girls are different. So I reply about how all LGBT people are different, you can’t sum up an entire community based on a friend. I tell him what he’s saying is offensive. 

He tells me it multiple friends. I say it could be 100, still not enough to speak for an entire community... he tells me 10 is a big enough sample size in statistics. No it isn’t. 

Then he tells me how gay men have more sexual partners and for me to find him a gay man who hasn’t had at least 10 partners.... for one- gay men do not make up the entire LGBT community. Two- virgins are plenty horny, statistics cannot speak to horniness and sexual partners does not equal horniness. Three- I can find plenty of Herero men &amp; women who’ve been with over 10 people- still doesn’t speak for an entire community. 

So I explain to him how not only is that untrue but that isn’t what he said. He didn’t say “gay men on average have more sexual partners” 

And he has continued and continued and continued. Saying I can’t argue statistics, saying numbers and facts are just that, telling me I could offend a mathematician, telling me I’m insecure, telling me I’m jumping to conclusions, that I need to educate myself.. 

Like no. I’m not. He legit said “lgbt people are hornier” and is now trying to gaslight the situation and say he said something different and I’m the sensitive baby for feeling offended. 

I’ve been out as liking girls for over 10 years and I can’t believe that one of the fights that is still being had is that LGBT people are all out for sex and it’s just for sex and we’re just a bunch of horny animals... I just want a girlfriend to cuddle with and grocery shop with and pick pumpkins with... 


Tl;dr
Dude tells me lgbt people are hornier.. when I express that that is offensive, changes his wording to statistics and gaslights the situation- then insulted me (because I clearly don’t know math).. tired of having to remind people that it’s not all about sex..

Statistics are only good if the sample size and group is good.. statistics about sex are known to be problematic because people lie. And beyond that- sexual partners does not fucking equate to horny levels.. ",actuallesbians
Help for a baby gay,"UGHH why is it so hard to be sure of things.

For context: I'm 24 and I've never been able to sit properly. Every time I get to a place in my head where I'm like ""yep ok defffffffinitely gay or at least mostly into girls,"" I second-guess myself. There is no reason to fear coming out to my family, friends, or community, I have the most supportive people in my life. And yet, I have this feeling that if I declare that I'm gay or mostly gay (I know that's not a real thing but I mean it in terms of sexuality as a sliding scale lol), that I'll suddenly realize I'm not and then have to un-come out. I've mentioned this to my sibling and some close friends years ago, and they're all so supportive but obviously can't help me all that much. I've told my mom, very very casually, that I'm open to dating whomever. So casually that she called me back days later to confirm that I said what I said haha. So everyone kinda knows I'm not 100% straight... But I don't like conversations in which someone says ""future husband,"" or asks about my dating life as if I date men. I'd like to be able to officially come out, but I'm just not fully comfortable with any one label yet. I know that you can know without dating experience, but I've never dated or done anything romantic with a girl before - I've never even had a crush on a friend! My crushes were always actors, teachers (lol just saw a sub on this), occassionally bosses. So I worry that maybe I just have really bad intimacy issues and I'm trying to give myself an out and say that I'm gay -- and then when I start dating women, I'll realize I'm not cut out to date anyone! 

&amp;#x200B;

I think the best way to be sure of myself is to actually go on dates with girls. I'm on bumble and have talked to a few girls, but haven't met up with anyone yet. Since I'm still not completely sure, I don't want anyone to think I'm just experimenting on them. I don't want to pretend I have more experience than I do because I want someone to be aware of that in case I'm super nervous, but I worry that most women won't want to date me because they don't want to be used. 

&amp;#x200B;

That was mad confusing so feel free to ask me to clarify anything.

TL;DR I think I'm gay and want to come out but I'm nervous that I'm not actually gay and will have to un-come out.

&amp;#x200B;

Did anyone else go through anything similar? What were some of the ways you coped/helped yourself be more sure of your identity? Anyone else new to the lesbian dating scene in their mid-twenties? ",actuallesbians
I went to a gay bar for the first time last night.,"It was a fucking blast. 

I’d still consider myself a baby gay at 22 so I was a little nervous. I felt zero judgement from anybody. I felt safe to put my arm around/hold hands with my date (who was like the cutest girl on the planet, it turns out). They had trans-friendly bathrooms and a big rainbow flag on the dance floor. 

I felt like I could just relax and be myself for once and it was wonderful. 

Plus I got a kiss at the end of the night so I think I’ve got at least a little game 🌈",actuallesbians
brb getting hurt,,actuallesbians
New coworker,"I started at a new place and one of my coworkers is so pretty! And yesterday she goes “I’m sorry, I’m staring. You just have such beautiful eyes!” 

So I say thanks and look away. 

She goes “look at me, I want to see. Wow your pupils are huge! Doesn’t that mean that you’re like... excited? Or like-“ other coworker goes “it means you’re looking at someone you like.” 

And the cute one goes “awwww you like us!!” Lmao! Like ... girl ... that’s not what she meant. ",actuallesbians
How did you meet your partner?,,actuallesbians
Do you say partner or girlfriend?,,actuallesbians
Rant,"I just feel so alone, different, and weird sometimes, being surrounded by all my straight friends. I wished this sub was my reality ",actuallesbians
Yes,,actuallesbians
Ughhhhh help!,"I just don't know what to do! I really wish to could meet new people and maybe even date them. I'm 17, female, and need help!  I just recently figured out all my questioning, and just don't know how to go all about the persuading. GOD can we just all agree boobs are amazing! Ughhh any tips?",actuallesbians
A gay card,,actuallesbians
This girl bought her first complete pantsuit today!,,actuallesbians
Strange problem: met someone great but she’s a trump supporter?,"What the fuck lol? To clarify, I have plenty of republican friends but I’ve never come across this issue in any of my relationships so I really don’t know if it should be an issue. On one hand to each their own...but on the other it makes no sense to me. I might be too closed minded for this so I’m asking your opinions on whether any of you have come across this/have any input! 

Edit: IT’S CANCELLED!!!",actuallesbians
"As a bisexual Asian, this is my ultimate goal in life and the cutest shit i have ever seen. LOVE this for giving us non-fetishizing lesbian representation in Asia :) wig snatched",,actuallesbians
Rude.,,actuallesbians
What do you think of the Myers–Briggs Type Indicator?,Curious to how people feel about this personality test.,actuallesbians
Literally can’t do makeup,"Aw hey

Wondering if anyone has had a similar experience with makeup.

I can’t do it. Even if I wanted to and gave it a try it always came out like shit. I feel so intimidated by makeup that I usually just choose to go without any. The most I attempt to do is a tinted face lotion and mascara ¯\_(ツ)_/¯

I would ask straight friends for help, but I feel like I couldn’t translate their routines into my own comfort level of femininity. (I would say I’m femme but straight girls say I’m androgynous if that gives a good idea of how I present)

Any advice? What’s your personal makeup routine?

",actuallesbians
"God, Karen.",,actuallesbians
Selfie Saturday Mega Thread!,"Welcome to the Selfie Saturday mega thread! This is for all pictures of you. Bathroom mirror selfie? yes please. Professional glamour shots? post 'em. This is for all pictures of yourself, not just regular selfies.

This thread will be posted automatically at 9am EST on Saturday, and will be taken down at 9am EST on Sunday. 
",actuallesbians
"Sorry, officer",,actuallesbians
Men.,,actuallesbians
I feel attacked,,actuallesbians
Any other ukulele players here?,My best friend gave me his old ukulele on tuesday and I'm obsessed with it already. I'd love to find some fellow gay ladies to share my love of this instrument with.,actuallesbians
Heteronormative Conformity,,actuallesbians
This,,actuallesbians
Found our mascot!,,actuallesbians
Disobedience,"You guys ever SEEN that movie(title)!!!??


Hot damn! And the fucking ending what!?!

Not spoiling but whoever has seen it please comment",actuallesbians
"Hello Ladies, Just wanted to post this if you were inclined to support Billy Jean King: Adidas releases limited-edition Billie Jean King sneakers in support of a good cause",,actuallesbians
Finally put some artwork up in my new bedroom. These ladies make me happy.,,actuallesbians
L.A. women who married women – where did you buy your outfits?,"Hi! My fiancée and I are in L.A. for three more weeks and since we're still looking for our wedding outfits, we had imagined Los Angeles to be a place where it's easy to find shops that specialize in lesbian wedding outfits...... but we can't seem to find anything. 
So: Women who have married women – where in or around L.A. can you find bridal fashion that is not just ""white dress with a veil""? 
We'd be so grateful for any suggestions, tipps or ideas. 
Thank you :)
Ella &amp; Vivi",actuallesbians
Interesting Difference I just Noticed (TW: Unconsensual Kissing),"Boys in clubs to girls: \*runs up grabs girl and kisses her\*

&amp;#x200B;

Girls in club to girls: \*walks up really slowly even though they are dating\* could I have a kiss please?

Girlfriend: Yes

First Girl: a..are you sure? You wouldn't feel weird?

Girlfriend: of course not.

First Girl: o-okay \*kisses and then blushes like a rose bush\*",actuallesbians
I need help/advise asap,my ex broke up with me a week and a half ago because the last two months or so of our relationship we were arguing a lot. we dated for over a year and we both still love each other but she says that we cant be together right now. i want her back more than anything but because i didn't fix my anger months ago shes gone. we have all the same friends and she asked to still be friends with me and i'm hoping if i'm friends with her she will eventually want me back but its just so hard. someone please help i miss her.,actuallesbians
This is who I chose to make out with,,actuallesbians
I'm sad I didn't find this subreddit earlier!,"Just reading all the stories and seeing all the stories and talking to all the wonderful people makes me feel so warm and welcome and it's lovely! Thank you, all you beautiful women for being so wonderfully gay. ❤",actuallesbians
Where should I move with a supportive LGBT community?,Hi I live in a small town &amp; I’m saving up to move so I’m looking for ideas of a supportive LGBT community to live ,actuallesbians
Why do people have to say I’m living/talking about “my lifestyle/agenda” when I’m with a woman &amp; not a man?,,actuallesbians
This sub is kind of all I have right now.,"I just wanted to make an appreciation post. I'm on a last leg of sorts and this sub is what I read myself to sleep with, otherwise I'll cry and stay up all night.

I got let go from my job in a male dominated field for being gay. My friend in HR told me after the fact. I'm miserable, haven't found work for a year, fear of being blacklisted made me never say anything. It's actually gonna be 1 year today that I got let go from this dream job. Entire team was men. 50-60 year old men who still used bigoted words I can't repeat.

But this sub has made me feel so much better. Because you are the invisible people like me I don't see represented around me, where I live, or in my (small, superficial) friend circles. I don't know how much more of life I can take in general, and this is not a cry for sympathy or help, just letting you know this sub is seriously the only happy thing I have tonight.",actuallesbians
Haircuts,I need a haircut. I’m looking for suggestions for LGBT friendly places in the St. Paul/Minneapolis area please.,actuallesbians
Got very excited because I bought a flannel shirt and a v-neck to match. This is the conversation that followed with my best friends....,,actuallesbians
"TIL there is a short story ebook called ""Taylor Swift Stole My Lesbian Virginity"" for sale on Amazon. It was published 3 years ago and has no reviews",,actuallesbians
Homecoming help,"Hi AL,

I posted here about a year ago and got some helpful advice so I’m back for more.  

I’m in high school and our homecoming dance is coming up. I know with almost 100% certainty that a guy I’m friends with is going to ask me to go with him.

I don’t know what to do. I really do want to go with him, I like him a lot as a person and as a friend. I  just can’t see us being anything more than close friends though, and I think he wants to date me. 

My best friend knows I’m gay and is encouraging me to go with him. I guess I’m just looking to see if any of you have been in a similar situation and have advice on how to go about staying friends and only friends. I’m not quite ready to tell him I’m gay, but I guess if worst comes to worst I could. 

Thank you!",actuallesbians
"She literally has rainbows on her lapels, why are we not talking about this queer icon?",,actuallesbians
"Asian Lesbians, I want to hear your stories!","So since I'm the only Asian lesbian I know, I was wondering how other gaysians deal with their conservative Asian family, cultural expectations and what not.  I guess I'm just curious if you guys even exist out there since the representation for us is so low!  Anyways, hm... so some questions! How was coming out for you? (Any tips?)  I know in many asian cultures there's this concept of ""saving face"" and how your actions aren't yours alone-- they're representative of your family. Do you still feel pressure to upkeep those expectations after coming out? (I sure do... the main reason I'm not out to my family.) When did you realize you were gay and how did you feel?

​Edit: Fixed a typo, also want to add: if those questions aren't interesting enough, feel free to share anything! be that stories, notable events, or whatnot that pertains to your identity as an Asian person and a lesbian!",actuallesbians
i’m sad that my crush is in the closet,"okay, i know it’s bad to assume, but for some people, don’t you just KNOW that she’s into girls??? well honestly, i know it’s the case for my crush, but i’m just sad how she’s not out, and possibly, she doesn’t even know that she’s gay. obviously, she can take all the time to figure herself out, but i just wish we could date. also, i will never out her, because that’s just mean. anyways, i don’t even know what this post is about, but i’m just sad that my crush and i can never be a thing.",actuallesbians
100% of me doesn’t give a shit,,actuallesbians
"My kitty Mae, who is not amused with me because I got her that adorable outfit.",,actuallesbians
Other lesbian subs?,What are some other subreddits for cute lesbian content? I can never get enough of that glorious gay shit.,actuallesbians
Olivia Coleman Really Enjoyed Lesbian Sex Scene With Emma Stone,,actuallesbians
This guy has been asking me out over and over for a few weeks now and my friend gave him my number for whatever reason,,actuallesbians
Is it possible to meet a girl without using online dating?,"Help a big gay nerd out: I’ve had pretty much exclusively negative experiences with online dating (though I have learned a lot), and have decided to call it quits on online dating. Am I basically setting myself up to be single or is it perfectly reasonable to assume I’ll find a girl irl? ",actuallesbians
Just added this to my classroom door,,actuallesbians
An Open Letter,"I really want to be friends with you. When I see your posts with your friend group in it I try to imagine myself there too. I don't have a group of friends, but truth be told that's what I want. I'd love to be a part of it, I've tried countless times to infiltrate your group, talking with all the different people. I saw one of them when I was out getting dinner tonight and i froze up and acted like the socially awkward person I am.

You're so smart, so clever and so creative. I love all your drawings, doodles and sketches. I love seeing you so passionate about the latest subject of science you're exploring. I want to learn all about you, maybe take our friendship further. Ok, you're really pretty. One of the prettiest people I've ever met. I want to stick my face to yours and absorb your beauty...

...or maybe I'm just really gay and want to make out with you.",actuallesbians
The shirt I just ordered!,,actuallesbians
Lesbians,"Lesbians are Lesbian, and that’s ok",actuallesbians
Tried my hand at drawing to illustrate a gift for my girlfriend!,,actuallesbians
I want to share my uselessness from today...,"On two separate occasions today, 15 mins apart, with two different people, I was completely useless.

First, as I was packing up at the end of one of my classes, I noticed this girl wearing a ridiculously skimpy button-down shirt.  It had only a single button fastened. And when she turned at all, you could see the entire side of her tit.  I thought she might not realize, almost said something, but looked back at my things.  When I looked back. She was looking at me with a smirking look of acknowledgment.  She noticed me noticing her tits, and she's smiling and smirking at me.

What do I do?  Look away in shame and almost break down crying. (years of repression and shame.)

Then while recovering from that, waiting for the bus to go home, a completely different girl, a real cutie, from across the road seems to have noticed me.  She has her phone out and is pointing it in my direction. ""Oh god really?"" I think, assuming she's marveling at a transwoman in a big red dress on the side of the street.  No, she actually crosses the street super smilely and even hesitant to approach me and talk to me.  I realize she's looking to say something and take off my headphones.  She compliments my dress and has the biggest smile on her face.  I thank her and put my headphones back on and turned away. 

She left.

Neither of those behaviors are overtly ""lesbian signals"".  At least not from what I experienced.  But still... God fucking dammit. ",actuallesbians
Documentary about Japanese-Brazilian trans actress-filmmaker Julia Katharine on in London next week!,,actuallesbians
What were some ways you acted or things you did while closeted?,Ignored attractive friends? Date someone as a beard? This post is targeted more towards people who were less comfortable with their sexuality than others/more reserved rather than open/may have suffered from internalized homophobia ,actuallesbians
TFW you buy a bunch of plaid hoping to look more gay but it just makes you look like a dude,:(,actuallesbians
South African soap shows lesbian kiss for the first time,,actuallesbians
Worst response,What was your guys' worst reaction/response from someone when coming out?,actuallesbians
"I started a 94% queer women MeetUp in NJ/NYC area, would love to have some new people!","I started and co-run an LGBT MeetUp in the North NJ area, and wanted to share it with reddit! After 2.5 months were up to 513 members and we have had hikes, walks, picnics, happy hours, dinner and movies so far. 

Curiously we’re a group of almost entirely women. We average .9 guys per event, so I don’t want to say it’s queer women only. We’ve noticed that LGBT groups on meetup tend to have a particular pattern in membership (mostly men, usually). 

Definitely interested in any advice or ideas you think would be fun to do in a group, especially in larger groups since we’re averaging ~25+ RSVPs now. 

Here’s our link (I’m on mobile at the moment): https://www.meetup.com/Out-Active-in-North-Jersey/",actuallesbians
"As a transbian who doesnt pass and isn't out to the world, this is the one shirt I love but can't wear yet because I don't want to offend someone. (Couldn't get the image on reddit for some reason)",,actuallesbians
Alguém de Portugal?,,actuallesbians
Anyone have experience with older women/or crushed hard on one?,How'd it go? I'm struggling with being in love with an older woman who is completely unattainable.,actuallesbians
27 Lesbian Sex Tips Porn Won't Teach You,,actuallesbians
"How I feel when I posted ""my girlfriend doesn't have a problem with this!"" in a post about guys struggling to find the clit, and I'm pretty sure it was horribly downvoted because people thought I was a dude.",,actuallesbians
Literally in love with her 😍 is she anyone else’s crush??,,actuallesbians
"Ummmm, why is she slowly killing me😫",,actuallesbians
"Feminine and lipstick lesbians, how do you let other lesbians know you're gay?","Preferably, without having to tattoo a rainbow on your forehead.

Also disclaimer: the intent of this post is not to say you have to advertise you're gay, have to look a certain way to be a lesbian, etc...I'm really just asking for help because I am attracted to feminine lesbians but have terrible gaydar. ",actuallesbians
I have given up dating. Is anyone else feeling the same?,"This is so long, sorry!I hate to be the downer, but I think I am just done.I am an out queer lady.

My friends and family are baffled as to why I am single.I turn 43 on Monday. I take care of myself, I am told I have a baby face for my age. I am almost 6'2"" (I think this is part of the issue). My classmates recently thought I was their age in the late 20s (I just exited college after many years).

Dudes hit on me every single place I go (ugh). It is always the same, but so is dating women. Same drama. Drama llama.

I have been in only long term relationships. When I am not,  I have been on more coffee dates than I think a human should go on. I almost never, ever kiss on the first date. I just do not feel kissing a stranger to be my thing. I need someone to make love to my brain before my body.

I was married long ago--longest relationship 8 years. I take time off between serious relationships, and have been in a handful.

I was once marked clinically abstinent in my medical record for two years, and despite going on dates and people wanting to kiss me, I did not kiss them. I just did not feel it, mostly.

On paper, as some like the lists, I sing in a band which produces CDs, but that is on the side. I have a degree in science, upper level, I volunteer, I help children and animals, I love sci fi, I am a nerd, I go trail running, I love Kant, not materialistic or snobby, I tutor the underprivileged for free to bridge the gap between Caucasian privilege and those who are not, love the 80s and arcades, I run my neighbors' dogs, I am thoughtful, considerate, compassionate--which brings me to the issue.

People are not as considerate as I am, and I get seen as a fetish too.Let me explain, and take no offense please, as I speak very matter of fact.

I think every transgender woman on Okcupid in the entire United States, if they have seen my profile,  have asked me out, but there is ONE reason for this and ONE reason only, and it has been admitted to me by almost everyone.. I have been told by more than one transgender woman, that I am ""the holy grail"", because of my height. So , I hear from some of my transgender women friends (I am friends with many people), that they are considered a fetish by some, but I am being considered as a ""prop"" girlfriend because of my height--they can wear heels around me and feel more feminine. WTF,  and it is pissing me off now. How nice to put their arms up on my shoulders and not feel dysphoria. This is VERY bad. It discounts my entire being. It fucking makes me a fetish!

I have dated a couple transgender women, and was engaged briefly. Things were a MESS. I was proposed to first week.

Last woman I went on a date with, we danced, after speaking for a few days prior and she asked if we were girlfriends.I am monogamous, but I will not be shackled on a first date? No sex? Are you serious?

The considerate part is the second. I am a hopeless, old fashioned, romantic. I get little gifts. I was buying truffles, running baths by candelight, serenading with my uke and singing, cooking, sneaking little love notes in glove boxes, and I have fulfilled the needs of those I have been with, who are not reciprocating.

I have yet to meet one person who is sweet.

They can debate with me science, and philosophical things, and they love that I love sci fi or whatever, but that is not a connection. Being a loving, giving, human is.Cisgender women have all stated I am too tall.I am the only cisgender woman I know of in my area who is 6'2"".HEIGHT is the last lesbian cisgender prejudice. Articles are written about it. Do not deny it.

​

Men ask me out all the fecking time and it is getting sooooooo old.

I am told I will find the one, or at least someone, that is good to me, when I least expect it.

I have been volunteering for years, and going to meetups and I google articles ""why am I single?"" and why can I not meet anyone, and I think it is due to my age. Not that I am not willing to date younger (I have, the youngest about 8 months back was 29 when we first met), but I feel my life is mostly in order, and those younger are discovering themselves despite what jobs they have, and that is cool, but I am beyond that point..I like to go out and have fun, but not fall over drunk on a bar stool. That holds no value to me.

I cannot go on another date. It all feels the same. All of it, every time, it feels the same, except for one recently, but it was still structured and contrived.

I have been online dating for ten years, and I have met people who have lied, hid things from me (like excessive things) and while I place none of that on the next person, in the same breath, I am exhausted. I have taken , at most, one year off at a clip, more than once, from going on any dates or entertaining anything romantic.

I have to think I am the common denominator in all of this. I have discussed it in therapy. I was advised maybe to move to the coast, but I heard, and no offense, that many there enjoy the demographic that is 5'1"" dark hair (do I need to say it??!)  I am a tall white ginger. There it is. I was told I would be even more lonely now (moving to California).

I am also not poly, and that seems to be all the rage as of late. I do not judge those who are, and not saying it is a bad thing, it is just not for me.

I just got back from a studio recording session, which was pretty cool.

I was asked out this weekend for my birthday. What, go to another restaurant? Again?I would rather binge watch Netflix (which I am about to do).

​

​",actuallesbians
reading a book and this character sounds like me. lol,,actuallesbians
Got called out at work for not being smart enough - and I can't help but relate it to my identity and my queerness,"So yesterday I found out one of the senior bosses in my work thought that I might have not looked smart enough for a workshop I did for a client (at their site).

This has brought up a lot of things for me and I'm unsure how to approach any resolution to it. And I feel like it's related to my queerness and my personal identity.

Firstly - I don't really ""do"" smart. My style is active wear, baggy hoodies, tshirts and boots. So smart definitely doesn't come naturally! But I know when it's appropriate and when it's not.

I used to be very much the ""typical butch"" when it came to smart-wear. Trousers, shirt and shoes. But I don't really identify as butch and I got tired of people mis-identifying me because of my clothing... So I try not to wear shirts much unless it's a super super oversized fashion situation. Plus I have big boobs and finding a flattering fit is hard!

On the other hand, I do have some dresses! But on this work occasion I was doing some pretty practical hands-on work (even though it was with a client) so I didn't want to flash anyone! 

In this type of conundrum I'm always a blazer girl, but guess what! When it's 30 degrees and you're doing active work, again blazers can be a bit much...

I found myself in this predicament and went with a black fitted t-shirt, trousers and shoes. For me I very much looked smart. But I wasn't smart enough? 

I've spent my whole life being judged at face value. I used to have short hair - so I was butch or even a guy. I used to have pink hair - so I was a ""rebel"" or would ""misbehave"" (even when I was top of my class). And now I have visible tattoos. 

I have never doubted my ability to do my job, my intelligence. And I was told that my senior boss had ""great words to say about how I interacted with the client and the job I did"". But apparently I still wasn't smart enough and that matters? 

It's a very frustrating situation because my personal identity is part of how I dress. My queerness is affected by how I dress. (Though just to note there are lots of out people at work so it isn't trying to hide my identity, but embrace it). The question is, how do I balance this in the workplace?  ...I guess that's what I have to figure out! ",actuallesbians
Fighting back against homophobia,,actuallesbians
This lady is amazing - thought I’d share.,,actuallesbians
Jaw Pain is a real thing. Ha.,"So guys....I had sex with my girlfriend for the first time last night, and let me say it had been a long while since I had been intimate with anyone (I was basically forced into celibacy by my ex wife). I went down on her for a LONG time, which was amazing but today I feel like my jaw might fall off. LOL. I can barely chew my bagel this morning. Definently worth it! But man....the struggle is real. Anyone else experience this? Tell me it gets better? haha. ",actuallesbians
"""That's Mrs. Lesbian to you.""",,actuallesbians
Hopefully it’ll be a good day,"I’m super excited to say that I will be getting to spend the day alone with my crush. She was the one suggesting to hang out all day. I’m a little nervous because I’m a bit awkward but she’s so beautiful and worth my time!

Wish me luck!",actuallesbians
"Found our hotel, everybody!",,actuallesbians
Please save us from the heteros 😂,,actuallesbians
"Is femsexuality a valid sexuality? If I'm attracted to someone who looks like a binary woman but is a trans man, am I no longer a lesbian?","I've been told time and time again that femsexuality ""isnt a thing"". This is very complicated but I see femsexuality as being attracted to all people who appear like a binary female would, to simplify, let's say the binary female gender = femininity. So I'm attracted to people who look feminine and ""pass"" as women, regardless of their gender identity or sex. 

For example, if I'm attracted to someone as feminine and resembling of the female gender as say, Ariana Grande, and then Ariana comes out as a (obviously non binary) trans man (since trans men can wear makeup and be feminine and still be men), to be a lesbian I'm supposed to just stop being attracted to (him?) because he identifies as a man, so saying I'm a lesbian doesnt work anymore apparently. This is like a paradox I swear.

That's why I think femsexuality fits. A person can say they're whatever gender they want, that doesn't change the fact that they look like a woman and I'm attracted to people who look like women, therefore I'm attracted to them. Since lesbian is apparently (??) attraction STRICTLY to the FEMALE GENDER, I guess I'm not a lesbian anymore.

I'm attracted to people who LOOK like women, regardless of if that's actually how they identify. I think this should be what qualifies as lesbian but to my knowledge it doesn't because everything is about gender identity now regardless of whether someone conforms to binary or not and looks the part. ?

 Saying I'm bi doesn't feel right because I'm not attracted to the binary male. Gender and gender non-conforming has gotten so complicated. I wish I could be attracted to someone who appears to resemble the binary female gender without worrying about what their gender is. But I guess that's not lesbianism anymore, and I don't believe it's bisexuality, nor pansexuality.

It's FEMSEXUALITY. Right?? But apparently that's not a thing?? My head hurts. What do yall think. Can I still identify as lesbian at this point?",actuallesbians
"I mentioned to my wife that I want to go to the gym after work today. Came home lunchtime, and found this. Feeling ALL the love today!",,actuallesbians
Be still my heart 😍,,actuallesbians
Lesbian Wins First Round of Legal Fight Against Abusive Retirement Home.,,actuallesbians
RIP,,actuallesbians
"Sex scene with Emma Stone was ‘awfully fun,’ says Olivia Colman",,actuallesbians
To future me and future you.,"You'll read this in a different place, at a different time, with different people and a different mindset.

I'm you from the past.

Insecure, unsure, swamped by transphobia, trying to fit in to a puzzle that's more like a maze with no way out.

Trapped in a town that feels outdated, archaic and out of place.

Hopefully you'll be on your way to changing your life for the better.

Maybe a nice little house somewhere with a cat, music, tv shows, movies, fresh garden and a neighbour not in sight.

Alone just like you planned, trying to grow on your own, growing up, shedding former mistakes, maybe you're bitter about the one that got away, a friend that said it just would be better if seperate ways were taken.

Maybe you still long for companionship, a nice young lady to compliment your quaint little cozy home.

What is it you really want?

You surround yourself with what you love but I could see plain as day that it wasn't enough, no matter how often you watched Steven Universe, if you didn't have someone else to share in the gems adventures, it just wasn't the same.

Nothing was enough and you couldn't escape your thoughts, they seeped in to your dreams and rendered your only sanctuary useless.

You were developing in to this independent woman who had to fight for her freedom and basic respect.

Nobody was along for the ride.

Why were you afraid to let someone else in?

Were you holding on to abandonment issues you couldn't control?

Nobody knew that was going to happen.

You have abandonment issues, I get it, people leaving sucks.

But at some point, you need to rise above and overcome, move on and accept that that person who did a very bad thing is not coming back.

You know deep down that you are better off without him, you became more than he could've dreamed of.

She is out there with love to give, care to provide, smiles to shine, heart to beat, intuition in spades, butt to oogle, she's got everything you ever wanted to once be and now be with.

Don't run from someone and something you never wanted so bad.

Take a chance.

Your heart might get broken, but just like every time before, you will survive.

Read this in the future, missy.

You'll be glad you did.

LJ.",actuallesbians
"Ha, who said math would never be useful in the real world",,actuallesbians
Venting,"I have to leave my job and I’m really going to miss working with this one girl who I’ve been low key crushing on ever since I started. She has a boyfriend and I’m the most awkward person ever so it’s not like I even entertained the idea that anything would happen, I just thought she was really pretty with a nice laugh and the kind of personality and sense of humor that’s easy to vibe with.  Ahhhh part of me just wants to just be like fuck it and tell her i like her on my last day because what would I have to lose but I’d never have the guts to do something like that. Maybe if she was single... ",actuallesbians
why did I try talking to men again?,"serious question.

i tried talking to a guy. okc matched us because he is trans. (I don't really get OKC's algorithm lol. i get he's part of the lgbt+ community but it doesn't mean that I'd like to talk to men.)  But I was like, you know, for a guy, he still seems nice. So I went ahead and chatted with him for a while. We actually vibed quite well??? Within a day we were off the app. I was like, I actually think a guy is cute? I usually find fictional characters and celebs more attractive and interesting than any man I could meet in real life. I was thinking of having a first date soon as we had been talking and even flirting all day for a while now.

Among other things though, he just seems to have weird communication problems where he goes from sounding like a dick to an absolute saint afterwards... Topped off by him saying I was a virgin yesterday, because I'd never taken dick before (the fuck? that's just so ... homophobic and... sigh). He then became almost manipulative because me being upset about that had upset *him*. He told me I ""wasn't helping \[him\] feel better."" Like what? that's my job now? You made me upset and I have to lick your self-inflicted wounds for you?

I've felt so weird and conflicted, and up until this morning, I took it as ""no, he just must be very special. for someone who likes one guy every 7+ years, he's the special case!"" No. I'm just thirsty I think. And I'm settling for way too little.

He slowly but surely has tried to enter everything in my life. It's too much for someone who hasn't gone on one date yet. He watches almost all my streams, and has twice now tried to find ways to call me (and it's very boring to call him. I'm the kind of person that likes to talk to many friends at once and not do 1 on 1 calls unless they must be.) Like he made it out to be like the call is about something serious but then spends the entire time doing whatever. idfk dude.

​

Every time I have an interaction with a dude on a closer level, it ends up with them being manipulative towards me and playing the victim. tf? Having this reminder has me hurting for all the straight women out there. i feel like this is why i consider myself a lesbian even though ive considered dudes a couple times in my life. like a couple. but now im starting to think that i just wanna fuck somebody.",actuallesbians
My first real crush on a girl - and lots of confusion.,"Sorry, this is a bit of a novel!

So I’m 34, and I only accepted that I’m bi about 2 years ago (before that I identified as straight).  I’ve always been attracted to guys and girls physically, but I’ve only ever dated guys.

Now there’s this girl.  She’s gay, about 10 years younger than me and we’ve been good friends for around 6 months now.  Recently, we both came out to each other, which was a huge step for us both as neither of us are out.  Since all that happened, I’ve realised that I have a huge crush on her, but because I didn’t know she was gay, I just thought I really wanted to be her friend.

This is the first time I’ve really allowed myself to have a crush on a girl and it’s so confusing and overwhelming.  It feels so different to the time I’ve had crushes on guys, and I find myself comparing her to men and thinking constantly how much I like her more than any guy I’ve ever been with.  And that’s brought up all this confusion about whether or not I’m bi or actually lesbian.

I don’t know if she feels the same way, but she did get super drunk one night and then flirted with me (holding hands, smelling my hair, kissing the top of my head, hugging etc).  But when she’s sober she won’t even touch me.  And she’s young and pretty and really fit, whereas I’m older and overweight and really nothing special to look at.   I keep thinking that if I told her how I felt, she would be really turned off and maybe not want to be my friend anymore.

I just don’t know what to do.  I want to be with her all the time, but I’m so scared of the rejection.

",actuallesbians
I have a huge crush on my professor,"And because of this, I inadvertently became the top student in my class because I want to impress her. Who knew having a crush would be such a great motivator 😊",actuallesbians
Ghosted by a girl I've been seeing almost 2 months,"We met on OKC. She messaged me first and lives about an hour away. I'm new in town so I was fine with the distance.
She (30) and me (28) hit it off and would see each other every week for a couple months. She even would tell people I'm her ""almost girlfriend"". I met some of her friends, we would spend the night, we would chat all the time. She came out of a long term relationship a couple years ago, has her shit together, and I thought this was someone I could be with.
This week? Silence. It's been hitting me hard. I've gotten one reply out of her and it was basically saying ""Sorry been playing wow"". This is obviously a lame excuse and I know better. I know she's into gaming but not enough to ignore me for a week when we would see each other and text regularly before.

I'm going back to my hometown for a month and she hasn't even cared to set a date, even though it was understood we were supposed to. Hasn't responded to messages.
My last one was a couple days ago just to try one last time: ""Friendly reminder I'm out of here in 4 days. Up to you"".

I've backed off and it's up to her now. But dang it hurts, because even if we didn't work out, I could see us being good friends and now there isn't even that. I am disappointed because I thought she was more mature. Its painful to think the last time I saw her was the last time ever.
Unless she resurfaces in which I have more self respect than that..

Need words of encouragement.

EDIT: Thank you so much for the support and kind words. I love you all.",actuallesbians
My girlfriend &amp; I interviewed Chloë Grace Moretz &amp; Desiree Akhavan about The Miseducation of Cameron Post!,,actuallesbians
Do any lesbians wanna add me on line or line play?,Or just wanna make friends in general I’m dying for lesbian friends from all over. Message me for my skype and check out my profile for more info about me,actuallesbians
Anything a hetero couple can learn from lesbian relationships?,"I don't know why this popped in my head but now I'm curious. Is there anything two straight people can learn from lesbian couples? With equality in gender and sex organs is there any dynamic a hetero couple should learn from?

Or is it boring and nothing much different?",actuallesbians
"No matter what I do, dating is such a flop for me.","LGBT dating in my area is literally nonexistent. There’s barely anybody to match with on tinder and okcupid, and the ones that are on those sites that I match with all want either a hookup or they aren’t even real. 
I’ve even tried R4R here on Reddit! I got mostly men even though I asked for females lol. 
I hope I don’t sound super whiny. I promise I’m not trying to sound like one of those people that whines about not having a significant other. I’ve just finally come to terms with my sexuality and I don’t even know where to begin to meet people. Even if they’re just a friend. ",actuallesbians
Our national anthem?,,actuallesbians
"Need advice on approaching a girl, running out of time!","Hey everyone, not sure if this is even the right subreddit to post this on. I have a dilemma. I am 20 and I'm muslim af (wear a headscarf). I have started discovering my attraction to women recently (I guess I have bisexual tendencies, not entirely sure). Anyways, I've been working at a nonprofit this summer and we have a booth at this huge annual ""fair"" for the past 2 weeks. Our booth neighbour is a skydiving business and there's a rlly cute girl who works there most days that I work. We keep making eye contact and she gives off bisexual/lesbian vibes (not trying to stereotype!!). My last day at the booth is this upcoming Monday and I can't stop thinking about her and if/how I could even approach her (we're both working and surrounded by colleagues haha). I have zero experience in approaching anyone, so any sage advice would be much appreciated!!",actuallesbians
Friday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
"Will she ever change, come out, or feel comfortable being with me?","My girlfriend and I have been dating for about 6 months now. We love each other!! FYI: I am not her first girlfriend!!

Some of her friends know about us and that she is bisexual. With that group, we’ve all hung out, show PDA, etc. The other half, or about 70%, of her other friends do not know about us or her sexuality. Also her very conservative and religious parents don’t know her sexuality or about me. 

We recently had a convo about how she feels like she can never tell them about me or her sexuality. Both her parents and friends are extremely conservative and will not take the news well, she thinks. This has created some tension because I’d love to be invited when she goes out with her conservative friends, just to charm their pants off and keep my hands to myself, but I never am and I don’t think my gf will ever be comfortable inviting me. She even changes my name in her phone to a guy’s name when she goes out with them :/. After our convo, she says she knows she needs to make some important decisions. 

Is this a lost cause? Are we going to end up dating  for years and nothing will change? I’d hate to have her choose or anything but I’m feeling kind of nervous that things will always be like this. 

Tldr: most of gf friends don’t know about us, she doesn’t want to tell them, makes me nervous she never will 

",actuallesbians
[Not OC],,actuallesbians
Am I lesbian or just scared of men?,"For context, I'm a young adult who grew up evangelical. While my parents were fairly liberal as far as evangelicals go, encouraging me to educate myself and be independent, I still wasn't fully protected from some of the more radical ideas on womanhood. I'm still fighting with the idea that my body is my own, and doesn't belong to anybody else. I'm trying to untangle myself from the idea that my life isn't my own to live, but is ultimately destined to be part of a man's. I've never dated men, because I'm scared of them. I've had this premonition numerous times that I'm going to marry a man I'm not attracted to, and regret it bitterly.
However, I have had feelings for girls that I haven't really had for men. Stupid gushy feelings. I see a pretty girl and stop and stare. I've practically hyperventilated over a female friend holding my hand. I look at all my female friends, and they're all so cute in different ways, while men all just seem rather ugly. While I like male fictional characters, the few feelings I've had in real life seem to be directed towards girls. And a part of me wonders if I'm conveniently manufacturing these feelings to avoid what I've always felt is going to be my fate, but for some reason, the idea of being a lesbian has a strange sort of pull? Like it's where I belong? I don't know. I don't like these questions, because they make me have to rethink everything I thought I've known, but better figure it all out before I do something rash and potentially wreck my life.",actuallesbians
new to this,haha hi i’m actually new to reddit &amp; the first thing i searched up was this bc i just wanted to belong to groooup haha hi what a noob lol,actuallesbians
I need an editor for my erotic lesbian stories,"Hey, ladies,

my name is Svenja. I am a 28y-old lesbian from Germany.

One of my hobbies is writing erotic lesbian stories - mainly on [literotica.com](https://literotica.com), but recently I also published my first e-book.

So far I have published all my stories only in German, because it is my mother tongue.

But I was often told that I should translate my stories into English to reach a larger audience.

I have already started translating one of my stories, but I think that my ""school English"" is not good enough to be published without further editing by a ""native speaker"".

&amp;#x200B;

So, to cut a long story short:

I am looking for someone who speaks ""native"" English and is willing to edit my translated stories (no need to speak German!).

She should not only pay attention to spelling mistakes, but above all make it sound as if it were written in fluent, good English.

Unfortunately I don't earn much money with my erotic stories - so there's not much budget for an editor.

But maybe I can find someone here who likes to read and edit erotic lesbian stories and help me?

So, if you are (seriously) interested, please contact me!",actuallesbians
When the girl you like tells you she only likes femmes,,actuallesbians
"Spotify knows I'm gay... But thank God because this was on my discover weekly! Ugh, her voice!",,actuallesbians
A twist we all saw coming,,actuallesbians
Gillian Anderson ate your boyfriend,"[From Gillian Anderson's new clothing line](https://www.intomore.com/culture/gillian-andersons-new-fashion-line-is-for-power-bitches-only) ""Finally, a piece of “boyfriend” clothing that queer women can relate to. This midnight jumper isn’t called the Boyfriend Jumper because it looks like something a man would wear — it’s called the Boyfriend Jumper because Gillian Anderson ate your boyfriend. The black trim on the shoulder is steam pressed with the ashes of the guy you dated before Gillian Anderson stole you. ""

 She can steal me anytime....

My budget is sobbing because all of this is ridiculously expensive, but we can all enjoy the pictures together, right? ",actuallesbians
Weird question lol,"So, I’m pretty bad at flirting and texting. I was just wondering if anybody knew how to get better at both? ",actuallesbians
I have a crush on my co-worker,"To give a brief synopsis of what's going on. She flirts a lot and the other day when we were alone I felt a weird sexual vibe. She told me that she misses me a lot because we rarely work together now. She's told me that she misses me on multiple ocassions with huge smile on her face. She's perfect but she has a boyfriend. Today, I noticed that she was kind of distant. I probably should take note and distance myself also. I really like her but she has a boyfriend and that's a no-go. 
",actuallesbians
How do i get the rainbow flag emoji,"No, seriously, this is really important, I don't have it

Edit: i downloaded a new keyboard and now i have it 🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈🏳️‍🌈",actuallesbians
"Does anyone here consider themselves kind of a ""non traditional lesbian""? someone that kind of doesn't fit the traditional lgbt crowd norm? someone who is kind of a loner? how do you cope with it?",Sometimes I feel kind of alone as a lesbian.  I feel like sometimes I don't fit in with the lgbt groups at my local pride center.  I'm not a very political person or very prolific when it comes to social issues.  I am into my art work and many other things i'm just a creative person who does her own thing.  Sometimes I feel kind of alone because I just cant seem to get into topics of gender issues or feminist issues.  it's just not me.  and sometimes I freak out that i'm not ever going to find the love of my life because I can't seem to fit when it comes to these interests. can anyone else relate?,actuallesbians
#lesbians,,actuallesbians
I feel attacked,,actuallesbians
What does your average day look like?,,actuallesbians
😭,"The girl I’m talking to is seriously so awesome. Cute. Freakishly smart. Mellow. Kind. 

Gah I just needed to throw this out there. I have no clue why she is interested in me or how long it will last...but she is very cool. 

Okay bye ",actuallesbians
Happy Friday!,"You know, almost none of my posts are about my sexuality and I wonder if that is alright in this sub. Anyway, now seems like a good time to talk about it. What do you like about women and what kind of person would you want to date? What are some reasons why they should date you?

I'll respond throughout the day with (hopefully) witty comments. Have to go to work for now.

Edit: Second thought, I'll answer after work, because I'm going to be busy :3",actuallesbians
"""The boyfriend we all want""",,actuallesbians
Advice Please,"Hey. There is a new cute girl at work and tonight we worked together for the first time. She's cute we laughed alot, seemed to have similar sense of humor. She mentioned she's gay and mentioned her um sexual skills a bit, in joking. I've added her on Fb, which doesn't list a girlfriend or even show pictures of her with anyone else. She's about 6yrs younger than me. I was hoping to talk to her after work but she left pretty quickly. Tricky situation since we work together. Suggestions? Should I ask it she wants to hang out this weekend?",actuallesbians
What's that M icon in the HER dating app?,"It shows up on some people's profiles on their picture.
",actuallesbians
"guuuuys, people are shipping d.va and d.mon and yas!",,actuallesbians
Ms. Fizzle FTW,,actuallesbians
Heartbroken,"My GF of 8 years just broke up with me,we were best friends for 5 years before we got together. I'm finding it hard because I've lost my gf &amp; bff all in same day. ",actuallesbians
So happy to have found YOU!,"Hiiiiiiii!! 

One of my guy friends has been trying to get me on Reddit for a while now, and I kept just brushing it off because how many social media platforms do I need?!? Also I feel old for this group but I’m not really old (31) Anyway, I am sooooo happy I am here! 

I made an account last night, and got caught down the rabbit hole of Reddit. It was amazing.. I feel like I sort of have the hang of it. Minus the Reddit lingo... ?!
This group is where I will spend most of my time - IF you’ll have me!! 

My wife and I were technically both straight when we met, we were each other’s firsts.. and it happened when I was 24 and she was 29 so we both already have great solid established friend groups. Only negative is that they are all straight and I need to gay up my life a little more! I have been desperately craving friendships with other gay women or other lesbian couples. We live in a decent sized town that is somewhere in the middle on the political spectrum, but I don’t see a lot of lesbians, or couples. 
This sub is where it’s at and as I read it for hours last night I felt so normal! 

So thank you for existing! I’m so sad I’m so late to the reddit game, but excited at the same time that I’ve discovered it!

I will be commenting and contributing a lot, and was wondering if there are other subs you all think I should join. I’ve found my fair share of lgbt subs so far, but this one is by far my favourite.  

Thanks in advance! Please feel free to say hi!

-New excited friend 🤗

Ps. Sorry this is so long, and all over the map!",actuallesbians
But why?!,"I need to vent. 

I’m tired of straight men and their attitudes. I’m tired of my sexuality being less I guess “valuable” then theirs. I’m tired of my sexuality being seen as “less than” 

I recently came out more. I’ve been out as open/pan sexual for about 11/12 years. For a long time it was- “just have sex with a women- see if it’s in your head” because people made me feel like liking both had to be for attention.. but then I did. And I loved it. It was a totally different experience than being with a man. With men- it’s all about me. But with women- it’s about her. With men, I just let them do what they want. If they want to stop at making out fine, if they want more- I let it happen. But with women, I initiate. I want it. 

Anyway. After being with a women it became “date a women for 6+ months- see if it’s just sex you want”. And I haven’t actually dated a women that long still. But I realized recently- I don’t need to. I don’t like men. I can find them beautiful. I can enjoy sex with them because let’s be real- pleasure feels good. I can love hanging out with them. But there is always something missing (beside two men)- which is why I can’t say fully 100% that I’m gay. But I can say I am way way more gay than anything else. 


Anyway- now the thing that pissed me off today. I recently told my friend “James”. I’ve known James for over 7 years and he’s always known that I like girls. But today- he tried to define my sexuality. And I am NOT okay with it. 

First he told me he deserves women more than I do because he’s straight. Like women are something you can earn? Like it’s a prize that you deserve to get? 

Then he told me “if you like women, you would not like dick if I’m not mistaken” followed by “you don’t have to like men emotionally” - for one, you can like both. Two, if I’m not emotionally interested in men- I don’t like men. 

And then he had the balls to say “you ain’t gay if you like dick as much as you do. Bi yes” 
He does NOT get to tell me I’m not gay. Whether I am or not- this is my fucking journey and only I can define it. He doesn’t know how I feel about dick, he isn’t in my mind. I explained to him multiple times that yes, I’ve slept with men and yes it feels good but no, I don’t like them. There is almost always something missing. End of story. Who the fuck does he think he is?! 

End of rant. 

Tl:dr
Straight man told me he deserves women more because he’s straight. After coming out to him, tells me I’m not gay because I like dick too much. Sick and tired of having my sexuality defined by others. Sick and tired of men viewing my sexuality as less than. ",actuallesbians
To anyone who has fallen in love with their best friend but did not end up with them...,"what was the aftermath after you told them or after you've decided to make the effort to get over them?

Were you able to remain good friends?
Did you end up having to break things off even though things went well initially?

I hear this cliche happen all the time, but what happens in the end?",actuallesbians
"Crush likes me back, now what? Also other worries.","Looking for advice and a place to vent I think.

We are in high school and haven’t been in relationships before. We aren’t extremely close friends because we haven’t known each other for very long. We’ve been asking each other a lot of questions and getting to know each other. How will I know if we have a connection? Do I even want a connection? Is this how people start relationships? I want to hold her hand and be near her but I don’t know if she wants that of if she would be uncomfortable. I’m not even 100% sure if she wants a relationship. I’m so nervous about talking about this kind of stuff to her.

I’m scared that we caught feelings for each other too quickly and that it’s just a stupid temporary emotion that will go away in a week. I’m really scared about telling friends if we get more serious, because they know that me and her have crushes, but not on each other. I’m afraid of people looking at me weird or girls in my class avoiding me because they think I like them. I’m afraid of guys thinking weird and gross things with me and my crush. I know a lot of people aren’t like this but I just don’t know that. I’m just afraid of people judging me and her and it makes me wanna cry. 

I’m kinda freaking out because I really don’t wanna mess this up. She is my closest friend because I’m new at the school and I just want to make her happy and comfortable. I don’t wanna go about this whole thing the wrong way. Sorry for the long read. Thanks. Support and/or advice is appreciated ",actuallesbians
"She's hot and cold with the flirting, should I ask why?","I met a woman last year, she was pretty flaky and bailed on plans a lot, but we texted every day and things were very flirtatious. But there's almost a two hour drive between her town and mine, so we only saw each other a few times, and nothing physical happened. She ended up ghosting and I was heartbroken, but then she got back in touch a couple of months later.

Since then we have been more open with each other. We slowly worked our way back up to texting each other every day, and things became flirtatious again. I finally saw her again and we kissed briefly, but it was kind of a spur-of-the moment thing and we both ended up casually kissing multiple women that night. Not too long after, we both confessed to having feelings for each other, and the flirtation seriously escalated. I've sent her naughty pictures, she's sent me explicit texts. We've both expressed hesitance to actually date each other because of various personal issues and because of the distance, but we generally text a fair amount each day, like we're girlfriends. 

Lately she hasn't been flirting though? And has either been oblivious to, or has deliberately ignored a couple of attempts at flirting on my part. She recently had some anonymous person try to mess up her reputation by contacting people she's close to and telling them about her sexual activities, so she said she hasn't felt very sexual lately. So I get that, but at the same time, she hasn't even flirted in a non-sexual way (like saying I'm cute or that she wished I were there so we could cuddle, things like that). Would it be weird to ask her why? I don't want to make her uncomfortable or put pressure on her, but I'd like to know where I stand with her. It's probably not a good idea for us to try to date, but if she wanted to, I'd still like to have a casual physical relationship with her. I just don't really know where to go from here?",actuallesbians
Obgyn experience.,"A few months ago i went for a routine check up and the doctor (a woman) asked me if i was sexually active with more than one partner. I said yes, then she went on to tell me how hpv was really common among men in my area so i told her i dont sleep with men anymore. And she kinda seemed confused then mumbled about women having it too then ended the lecture. 

Anyway, once the exam part starts she had a nurse come be in the room. I don’t think I’ve ever had to have another person present for the exam, since I’ve only ever gone to female gynecologists. It felt kind of strange. Was it bc i told her i was gay? Did she think i’d get turned on by her inserting some medical equipment into my vagina? 

Has anyone ever had that happen? Am i missing something? ",actuallesbians
"Planning a short holiday, ideas welcome.","Hey, fellow raptors. My lady and I are planning a small getaway for November. We live in Brussels and want to go somewhere relatively close (a short flight is ok), nice, with good food and where we can have some relaxing time but also have the option of doing something fun in the evening, like clubbing or bar hopping. We thought of the Spanish islands, but we’ve already been a few times and would like to try something new. A friend suggested Morocco, but not sure it is lesbian friendly? Don’t mean to sound awful, but both of us have had bad experiences being harassed by North African men in other places, so not keen on going to that region. Ideas mote than welcome. 

So, in a nutshell: we’re looking for nice places in Europe that are safe/pleasant for LBGTQ people, quiet but with good night life options close by, good food, and not horrible weather (sunny and warm would be awesome, but not against going somewhere colder - it’ll November after all!)",actuallesbians
How do you feel?,"About yourself, life...or anything? I had a couple of drinks alone and I realized (don't we always realize things while inebriated) that I don't feel much.

I mean yes. I feel pain, sadness, and happiness like anyone else but a lot of times I just don't feel anything at all and I wonder if that's normal. Like emotionally. Right now, I feel tipsy though. How do you ladies feel? Talk to me please. I am a little lonely.",actuallesbians
She finally asked to go on a hike!,"Yeah, yeah, yeah, it may not seem like such a big deal, but I’ve been working on hanging out with her for months, literally since May. 
So, back in May, I was seeing someone (A) non-exclusively. We ended up at a concert where I actually met this other girl (B).
Things actually ended with A pretty soon after the concert, so when Pride came around, I decided to hit up B to see what she was up to. Turns out she had a girlfriend. 

Fast forward two months and I get a text from B inviting me to a concert that she has extra tickets to. The night was great. We went clubbing after with a few of my friends... but I didn’t make a move? Because how could I!? 
That was about a month ago. We’ve been texting back and forth, but are both traveling.

Yesterday, she finally asked me if I wanted to go for a hike when we’re both back in the area. Of course I do! 

Anyway, I just wanted to post to show that it can sometimes pay off to take your time and be patient! Even develop a friendship first. 

Now I’m off to plan a great sunset hike and then drool over the possibilities of making the move I should’ve made a month ago. 

[EDIT] Forgot to mention that B did say that she was dumped recently when we were at the concert, but also said that she dates a lot of people. Because of that, I’ve been waiting it out a little bit. I don’t want to be her rebound or another notch in her bedpost! ",actuallesbians
Revenge of the Fans reports “a couple of very reliable sources” have confirmed Elsa will enjoy a female love interest in Frozen 2.,,actuallesbians
ARGH!! Why are you looking for a cis-dude on a lesbian dating app?!,"I'm so frustrated right now. ""I'm just looking for a man that'll treat me right,"" is a line I've seen on 3 dating profiles today. wtf is going on here? Like HER is for anyone but cis guys. another app i'm on is exclusively for female identifying wlw. i... uh... wh-... I don't understand what's going on here.",actuallesbians
What Should I Say,"When people say something like “it makes sense that women like sex with other women because women know what they like”.  When actually, when it comes to sex, my girlfriend and I like completely different things in bed.  ",actuallesbians
Life goals 🏳️‍🌈,,actuallesbians
"How did you confirmed that you are on the ""other side""?","Well we all lesbos had a girl crush for the first time and I can definately tell cause I had a huuuuge crush. Despite that I notice that I have a slight attraction to males but I still confirm that I am a lesbian. Why? I'm sexually attracted to them and I want to gain experience through ""the straight intercourse"" but thinking about women It's freaking different. WOMEN are pretty different for me:

1) Sexually/Romantically attracted to them 

2) Everytime I fall in love with a female I feel butterflies in my stomach (for real :( ) and It's like a red rose opens up (idk) 

3)I feel different ""down there"" &amp; mentally vulnerable 

Tell me about yours now :\* ",actuallesbians
One of my middle school students (13) asked me to help her make this note to ask out the girl (12) she likes today. She said yes! 😍,,actuallesbians
Is it weird?,"Lately I've been talking to a lot more girls on Facebook through a ladies video game group and injured derby girl group... and if someone says something funny or likes something I said, I often go look at their profile to see if they are gay... like not to hit on them, I'm just curious? And I'm always disappointed when they are straight or happy when I see they are gay (even if they are married, monogamous, and live 1500 miles away - it's not even about me having a shot, I just like queer people?). Is that weird?",actuallesbians
I was the straight girl who dated the not-straight girl but still insisted we were best friends and it turns out I'm gay and now I'm sad and regretful,"I recently figured out I'm gay after very heavily repressing it my whole life and now I have SO much regret for how I treated my ex-best-friend-who-was-literally-my-girlfriend last year. Looking back I was totally in love with her but I just couldn't fathom the idea of me falling in love with another girl. And I was so dense and useless.

*Here's the list of signs my stupid ass missed:* she always held my hand, hugged me, kissed me (not on the lips though), hung out or talked with me 24/7, always wanted to physically pick me up, wanted me to lay on her, she would lick me(? Okay this might just be kinda weird lol),tell me I'm perfect and beautiful, we said I love you all the time, and whenever I slept over at her house she would talk about being lonely and wanting to cuddle someone. I assumed she wasn't talking about me and got offended because ""apparently I wasn't enough for her"" And I would tell her to get a boyfriend. (I was the type of closeted gay to talk about platonically marrying my best friend instead of a man) I also would get embarrassed and tell her I don't want to look gay when she tried to hold my hand in public. 

Yikes, I know. And I knew she was bisexual this whole time too. I feel awful for how I treated her, and also that I missed my chance and I could've dated her and been so happy if I wasn't in such denial about my sexuality. 

She stopped talking to me like a year ago (i was totally heartbroken) and I think I now understand why. She has reached out to me a few times and I tried to keep talking to her but she eventually just ghosts me again. Half of me wants to be the one to reach out and see if it'll work, but the other half of me feels I should just move on and run from my embarrassment (I did a lot of other embarrassing things while sad and confused about how I felt) Besides, as far as she knows I'm still aggressively straight. It'd be weird for me to just pop back in her life even gayer than she is. Also I'm pretty sure she's online dating this other girl right now? Idek I'm a terrible person ",actuallesbians
Anna Kendrick is fluid 😍,,actuallesbians
🌝,,actuallesbians
Oh my,,actuallesbians
What's your favourite joke?,"The dumber the better!

Bonus points if it's a lesbian joke, considering we're in this sub.",actuallesbians
"I have a massive crush on Zendaya, anyone with a good gay-o-meter knows if she might be bi?","It might be a weird question lol. I don't mean to intrude her privacy or idk, sorry if I do. I'm usually able to tell when people aren't straight, but man, i just can't read Zendaya. It's like she's Bella and I'm Edward.

I kinda just want to know so I know whether or not to 'forget' about her.

I'm mainly attracted to guys, she's the only girl I have a crush on, even though I'm not even a huge fan of her.

:)",actuallesbians
"Read this and was like ""wait... what?"" This is from a text for my study, about the Peloponesian War in ancient greece😂",,actuallesbians
My 90’s crush 😍,,actuallesbians
Looking for body positive lesbian art.,"I'm in the beginning of a long distance relationship with this girl. One of the ways I found to connect with her is to send her very cheesy art of lesbians kissing and cuddling. The problem is that most of what I find is with girls of the conventionally attractive skinnier body type. I think my girlfriend is beautiful but she gets very self conscious about her weight. I'm wondering if some of you know artists who draw queer women in a more body positive way.

 Thank you,
A useless queer girl who managed to get a girlfriend. ",actuallesbians
Update: Pernille Harder wins UEFA Player of the year,"Last week I posted that a lesbian football player was nominated for player of the year. Now she has won the award.

[https://www.uefa.com/womenschampionsleague/news/newsid=2567665.html](https://www.uefa.com/womenschampionsleague/news/newsid=2567665.html)

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/z2kkw075u9j11.jpg",actuallesbians
I never know quite what to say,"When people say “it makes sense that women would enjoy sex with other women because they know what women like” because, when it comes to sex,  my girlfriend and I like completely different things in bed. ",actuallesbians
Judge rules Utah woman legally married to deceased partner.,,actuallesbians
I think girls who wear boxers are very sexy,My straight friends gave me the hardest time when I told them I find girls who wear boxers very attractive. I just wanted to see if any of you guys feel the same way as me. ,actuallesbians
Is there a group chat on reddit or anything for this sub?,I was just wondering if there was some group chat or anything we could all chat in?,actuallesbians
Can’t stop thinking about a girl,"So I know I’m gay and I have been ok with it for a few years now but I can’t stop thinking of this girl I have been talking to, I want to message her so much but I know she is much more busy then I am.  I’m worried I’m to obsessed and I’m going to ruin the relationship before it even fully begins. 

I want to tell her I have been thinking of hugging her all day but that’s probably way to much, I just don’t know. (I’m also autistic so I find relationships to be very confusing) there is nothing else I’m so clueless in like relationships, even with studying so much it seems impossible. 

I thought if I wrote this I might get some tips or something else, but I guess I just also wanted to get this off my chest. 

Thanks for reading ",actuallesbians
The lesbian struggle,,actuallesbians
When to put a ring on it,,actuallesbians
Looking for business shoes that are also sneakers? Probably best if they don’t have laces. Ideas?,Help! ,actuallesbians
So I just read this post about tall girls holding your chin up for a kiss. And I present to you this gush of feelings!!!,,actuallesbians
"When my straight sister complains about her husband. Meanwhile, I have an amazing gf",,actuallesbians
Amy Adams is so gorgeous &lt;3,,actuallesbians
Thursday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
Please help me,I have this cute friend who's a lesbian and I think they're cute and the think I'm cute and I wanna ask them out cause I like them but I don't know if they'll want to go out with me because I'm trans and I don't know what to do. And I'm going earring shopping with them in two weeks and it will be just us and I kinda wanna make it a date but I don't know and I don't know if they find me attractive cause I'm trans and it's giving me anxiety.,actuallesbians
UPDATE,"I posted a few days ago that I wanted to wear a suit to my brother’s wedding and my mom made a big deal. (No clue how to link the post!) 

Well today I got a brand new blazer and I look fine as hell in it so I am pumped for this wedding. 

Even got the lip-bite of approval from the fiancée 😏",actuallesbians
what the fuhhh,"27 year old alcoholic degenerate here with a useless degree.

&amp;#x200B;

I just can't handle the fucking heartbreak anymore. It's like the third time in a row this shit is happening and I'm going ballistic from it. Why am i never good enough for a girl I like? ? I never fit in with most lesbians either it seems. Where the FUCK did I go wrong. I've been having anxiety and insomnia for a month over this shit. help

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
The Next Stage in Lesbian Evolution,,actuallesbians
My math teacher,"Holy shit, my math teacher is *soooo* hot. I overheard a table of boys saying things like “Damn she looks good” and “Wow, she hot as hell” and all I wanted was to go over there and be like “Gad damn I know!” But I’m not out yet, also that seems a little inappropriate. She was waiting for someone to answer a question and she bit her lip, I think I fucking died. Sorry this was long, I just had to share!",actuallesbians
How do I let her know I’m interested?,How do I let a girl know that I’m interested in her subtly? I want her to know that I like her but I don’t want to tell her directly (just yet). I’m afraid that my flirting may be read as just being friendly/friendly teasing. I don’t know..... How do you let someone know you like them? ,actuallesbians
alexa play god is a woman,,actuallesbians
Suddenly I feel in desperate danger of drowning,,actuallesbians
Me not projecting my sexuality onto others...,,actuallesbians
Mouth piercings and split tongues...bedroom issues/benefits?,"Semi-racy question but genuinely need some feedback on this as it may influence my choices (a little) and not sure how to put it subtlety so gonna be a blunt gal! 

So... any ladies with the following piercings (my last set have finally healed so getting more!). Do any of them cause issues when going down on a gal? I could see the medusa/cyber bites perhaps getting caught or nicking somewhere if my um.. face is deep (I do not know how to say this subtlety). Not sure if the others would cause issues due to the placement. 

* -Medusa on it's own 
* -Cyber bites (medusa and labret in a pair)
* -Dahila bites (edges of each side of mouth)
* -Angel bites (both sides top of mouth)
* -Snake bites (both sides of bottom of mouth)
* -If you have any other face piercing that caused problems though id be pretty curious (looking at collecting a lot of them!). 

Also I am considering getting a split tongue. Anyone with a split tongue or having been intimate with someone who has one (or shared stories about with a friend with one?!), does it make things better or worse pleasure wise? Any other notes on how that changes the game? 

Also a question for everyone reading even if you have no experience of it, would you be freaked out or interested (or neutral) by the idea of a girl with a split tongue, both in general and bedroom wise? 

Sorry for the racy q but I need this rainbow knowledge!!! 
",actuallesbians
Saw this and thought it belonged here. Oh Kentucky.,,actuallesbians
I’m tired of not having anyone to hold: the closet is killing me.,"Bear with me. 

So I’m in high school, and I’ve accepted my identity. I see no problem with me loving girls. 

But the people around me do. If I come out it’s inconceivable what could happen. I’m not as unlucky as some LGBT+ folk, I live in America, but my location in the States is what screws me over. Small town USA. Yee Haw. 

All I do is fantasize about girls. I’ve had so many crushes I can’t keep count. Im very playful, my personality in general is, so a lot of times girls mistake  what I see as clear flirting for just me being me. I’m sure I’m the only teenager alive that hasn’t had anyone have a crush on them before, considering I’m pretty good looking, well groomed, dress nice, and outgoing. (Not bragging;I try take care of myself) 

I just want someone so bad. I don’t care, if it’s short lived and meaningless, or long term and sincere. I want to experience high school romance like the rest of my peers and friends. 

And everyone can sit back and say “well not everyone experiences a relationship in high school that’s straight!”, yeah you are right. But they have the freedom to. Pursuing someone for them doesn’t bring up the possibility of bullying, being cut off from family, and even death threats. It does for me. 9/10, if a straight person isn’t dating in highschool, it’s because they aren’t interested. 

I sit back and watch my girl-friends get treated despicably by guys. Although I don’t have romantic feelings for the most of them (haha), I can’t help but sit back and thing about how thankful I would be just to have them. How I would do everything differently. How I would go over the moon for someone. 

It’s so unfair. It really is. Being gay is such a silly personality trait for a whole country to be divided on it. 

I don’t know what to do. 

",actuallesbians
"It's time for another useless lesbian moment! (Advice, pls)","Alright y'all, look, I've got yet another useless lesbian moment for you.  Buckle up, buttercup, 'cause it's a long one.  I'll just drop it on you, now:

I really like my best friend.

Now, before you roll your eyes and sigh and say, “JUST ASK HER OUT, THEN!”, let me explain why I'm a useless lesbian and need help in this situation.  For starters, Friendo and I have been friends since December.  We met by complete happenstance in public and just rolled with it.  Initially, I'd thought she was cute (of fucking COURSE), but she kept casually mentioning her boyfriend all night, so I immediately stashed her away as a strict friend and that's been that.

Well, kids, over the last few months, our friendship has . . . grown?  Blossomed?? Developed??? Hit me like a ton of bricks????  and I don't know what to do with it.  We spend a lot of time together: we go to a lot of concerts together, we travel a lot to said concerts together, we watch movies a lot together, we get shitfaced a lot together, we get high out of our fucking skulls a lot together . . . and we've been asked how long we've been together a lot.  Most recently, she invited me to her friends' wedding as her plus one and three separate people asked how long we'd been seeing each other.  THREE.  Friendo's latest ex boyfriend even confessed when they broke up that he was jealous of me because we were always together.  Once early in our friendship, she mused about how much money she's going to make when she's completed her certifications and I joked that I was going to marry her for her money; she enthusiastically nodded and said yes.  I've met all of her friends in her hometown and she's met my parents and slept in my childhood bed with me (we were literally just sleeping, I promise!!)  I mean, friends do all that stuff together, right??

There was a specific instance that sparked this flame, for me at least.  One night a couple weeks after Pride (which we also attended together), we got a little drunk as we are wont to do, and I don't recall how, but the conversation turned to weddings--OUR wedding in particular. I'm not joking, we planned out who was invited, what we'd serve to eat, who would play as the band, what kind of venue we'd have, what our rings would look like (“You can have whatever you want!” she says), what our dresses would look like . . . and then we moved on to our future together.  We discussed how many kids we'd have and what their names would be, who gets to carry first, how many pets we would have and what their names would be, too, and even right down to what kind of house we'd buy.  This is all going to happen if I'm single when I turn 30 (three years from now).  My guys, we had it all laid out.  We parted ways smiling like idiots that night.  I think that may have also been the same night in which she coyly tried to invite me over using free parking passes as a bribe (never mind the fact that I'd already been to her place a million and a half times by then) and I flirted back that I was in an open relationship.  But like the useless lesbian I am,  I laughed it off and said I had to work early and we both went home alone, me believing that we were just having a giggle as friends do.

I woke up the next day, unable to get the idea of a future with Friendo out of my mind.  Every damn day since, I've fantasized over what we've talked about and what it would be like to be her wife.  It's been almost three months since that night.  There was a hot minute at the beginning of this month where she thought her work contract wouldn't get renewed and she'd have to move away, so she started looking for apartments, “'Cause you're coming with me, right?  One bedroom or two? ;)”

SO Y'ALL . . . I'm useless because I can't tell if this girl LIKES me or not!  I mean, we made a marriage pact for Jesus Henry Christ's sake!  But does she like me?!  Does a marriage pact mean there's some degree of truthfulness to it??  Am I absolutely daft and missing crucial signs that this chick is into me?!  I don't know!  Friendo claims she's pan and has had a girlfriend before, but she's also had a husband before.  What are the chances that she actually wants to have a relationship with ME of all people! Her work contract did end up getting renewed, so I have her until November.  What should a useless lesbian do?  Is it really that obvious?  How in the world do I go about asking her if there was any meaning behind the marriage pact without obliterating our really enjoyable friendship?

TL;DR:  I'm a useless lesbian because I can't pick up on basic social cues that my friend likes me, even though she's (drunkenly) agreed to marry me (twice).",actuallesbians
Tired of getting catfished-ish,"I like it when girls seem geniunely interested in me on Tinder. I matched with a girl that seemed pretty interested. Naturally, I Facebook stalked her and it looks very much like she has a boyfriend. From my creepy and invasive investigation it is looking like she is one of those girls that goes on tinder looking for a third but is real sneaky about it. Has happened to me before. I don't know how to address it from here. I am just disappointed in this and mostly ever other experience in my love life for the past year especially.",actuallesbians
Are you even gay if you don’t remove your front teeth?,,actuallesbians
The name of this bar in Bangkok made me smile :),,actuallesbians
"Welp, witnessed my first campus preacher today",I found some solace in seeing how many people opposed him,actuallesbians
I've made it!,"I incurred my first tongue injury while going down on a partner!! \\o/

&amp;#x200B;

My poor frenulum.",actuallesbians
I know this is a silly question...,"This is my first post, although I am an avid reader. Just got back into the whole dating thing after a long time. The whole internet dating and talking to people using emojis instead of words perplexes me. 
And here is my silly question: does the rainbow on sky emoji on someone's tinder profile mean they are queer? ",actuallesbians
sick and tired of straight guys treating me like dirt because i won't play their game.,"I'm not obsessed with my appearance, don't want their cock, and due to my status of being utterly unfuckable, am therefore not worth their time and energy.

I've been fired from jobs because customers were trying to sleep with me and I wasn't into it.  This is my choice, I don't deserve that kind of retaliation.  Have been referred to, to my face, as a ""lesbian bitch"" for being analytical and questioning guy's bullshit.  I'm sick and tired of being a target for hateful hetero guys who feel intimidated by (moderately) strong women.  I can't take it all, I'm not invincible.

Fellow lezzes how do you self protect and self care??",actuallesbians
What does love feel like?,I have never been in a real relationship with someone that loves me back before. I’m just curious as to what I’m missing out on.,actuallesbians
Communicating during sex! Help!,"I NEED YOUR ADVICE: I started seeing a new girl a week or so ago and things have been going AMAZING. We tried waiting to have sex (her definition is “anything that makes you cum” but little does she know she already made me cum the first night we met lol) but two nights ago we said “fuck it,” literally I guess, and had sex. 

I knew she is dominant, we made out and fooled around before. Prior touching during monkey business included: typical dry humping, pulling her hips closer to mine while grinding, rubbing her clit over her pants, massaging her breasts. She seemed to enjoy all of those activities, they riled her up in a good way. 

HOWEVER, after we had sex, specifically the day after, she was not happy. I did everything I did before, except this time I initiated the monkey business.  I asked for consent for everything I did and received approval every time. I did all of the things I had done before (she didn’t take off her pants but we dry humped and she fingered me). She had been weird with me since and today I finally got her to communicate what was wrong. She said she’s never been with a girl who also initiates and doesn’t like “being grabbed or reached for.” The sex started by cuddling so there was no real grabbing? 

I am very experienced communicating during sex. I’m getting the impression that she isn’t though. How do I help her become more communicative? I apologized to her profusely about the other day and cutely said I want to have sex in a way that pleases her, so please communicate her needs. She seemed fine with it, but I want to make sure this doesn’t happen again

TLDR;  How do I get her to communicate more while we’re having sex? How do I encourage her to talk about when it’s ok to touch her vs. when it’s not? Does anyone have any insight to these kinds of preferences? She’s very good at dirty talk, but it’s mostly about what she wants to do to me. Any ideas about how I can use that ability to my advantage??

",actuallesbians
Dating in the closet?,"Late last year, I got out of an abusive relationship, and, having no friends I could ask for help (and absolutely no money either, for that matter), I ended up moving back in with my parents. I've since gotten a stable job, and have been seeing a therapist for several months to work on my anxiety and other related issues.

Since I was 12, I've identified as bisexual, because I knew I liked women, but I wanted to believe I could marry a man and just live a ""normal"" life. I've never been able to make it work though, because I'm simply not attracted to men, and I've slowly been coming to grips with the fact that I'm gay, not bi. 

My therapist suggested that dating, even casually, may help me feel more comfortable with that part of my identity. However, I don't have enough of a financial safety net to move out yet, and I'm not out to my parents—nor will I be until I'm independent again. Since I'm more interested in dating than hookups, I would feel really scummy not being upfront about this stuff, but at the same time, I feel like no one in their right mind would want to date a closeted, 23 (almost 24) year old woman still living with her parents. Should I try at all, or should I just wait until I'm living alone?",actuallesbians
"If you need some good lesbo energy in your day to make you laugh as you sit alone with headphones on, look no further than this podcast!",,actuallesbians
What Can I Do For You?,"(Insert Steven Universe Reference)

Ahem.

-Anyway, on the off chance she’ll see this, I’m wondering what I can do to help my younger sister out. (I’m sorry if you stalk me on Reddit bro.) 

We moved into an apartment together about a month ago. So far it’s going really well. She is still job hunting, but I know she’s really close to getting hired for something.

That’s not my worry. I’m worried about my sister’s social/personal growth.

Right now, she is seriously questioning her gender. I’ve known this for awhile. She’s never had sex or a relationship, and she tells me this is because she doesn’t like the way she looks/feels in and about her body. She expresses interest in wearing a suit, dresses mostly comfortably/masculinely, but sometimes enjoys wearing skirts. Never makeup. Doesn’t really express interest in male pronouns.

She isn’t sure if she is trans or not, but has mentioned seeing a therapist in town that specializes in gender . So far, I haven’t seen her put much effort into reaching out for that kind of help. I worry she never will, but she says she may try after she starts working.

My sister is an extrovert, but she has social anxiety and is afraid to put herself out there. I am worried about her staying home and not engaging with others. She says she is happy, but I really just yearn for her to get out there and live her life to its fullest, and learn more about herself and her gender.

Is there anything I can do to encourage her to thrive? I just want her to be happy. I know she has to be ready herself to go out, but I want to do everything I can to help. I’ve even mentioned using dating apps as “practice” for her anxiety around dating, but she doesn’t seem open to that. 

What can I do?",actuallesbians
My straight friend is purposely trying to make me jealous,"I’ve recently came out to this friend 6 months ago and told her about a huge crush I had on her other straight friend (that i’m not really close with) about 2 months ago.

I found out that this group of particular straight friends make out quite a lot when they hang out just for fun.

She was supportive of my crush at first but as of recently I was told by my best friend that she said she would definitely kiss my crush again because it gives her gratification having something I can’t. Now she purposely flirts with her wayyyy more for the sole reason of spiting me.

I don’t know how to feel.",actuallesbians
"Which female celebrity, if they were to come out as bi or gay, would cause this sub to “break”?","Basically, which lovely lady, not already out, would make us rejoice?",actuallesbians
Told my kid sister I have a girlfriend,She’s almost 12. I came out to her when she was 9 but I don’t think it ever fully registered. All she said was “good for you.” In the “you’re interrupting my youtube binge” voice she uses.,actuallesbians
When someone asks me if sex with women is better than sex with men. I mean yea but...,,actuallesbians
My gf is scrolling down this thread,"And wont give me any attention

Can you all tell her to give me attention because im cold

Thanks everyone xoxo",actuallesbians
So I’m a trans girl who is still not out to my dad. We were driving the other day...,"And I could tell something was on his mind. Now, he’s not a bigoted guy or anything and I know he cares about me a lot, but a lot of stuff surrounding sexuality and gender makes him uncomfortable. Kind of crazy because I have an aunt who is gay, along with the fact that my dads best friend is gay so he really should be more informed and at ease with it, but he’s not. 

Anyway, we are driving and out of the blue he says “ You know, you can tell me if you’re gay, I won’t be mad.” Already not the best opening, but he’s trying. I of course respond “No” because I’m not ready to fully come out to him. However what I wanted to say was 

“Oh yeah, I’m hella gay, just not in the way that you’re thinking.” 

It’s super bizarre and oddly frustrating to bond with him over mutually finding a woman attractive but with very, very different end games. ",actuallesbians
Is anyone else DYING for a lesbian Disney princess?,Where she at tho? ,actuallesbians
I'm 35 and married to a man. I'm afraid I've missed my chance to be with women.,"I had a few experiences with women in college and shortly after, but nothing went past 2nd base--I think because I was afraid of what it would ""mean"" if I started dating women. (I still don't know what it would ""mean,"" but it seems to matter much less now than as a 20-year-old.) I am attracted to women and had a few crushes, but otherwise I've only dated men.

I've been with my partner now for 7 years, married for 1. We've talked about having an open relationship, but he is only comfortable with me seeing women. Which is great! (but also gives me a weird feeling, like why is he threatened by men but not women?) 

Anyway, my hesitation is that I feel like I'm too old to start exploring this. Or, more specifically, that the people I'd want to date don't have the patience to guide someone through what she should have been through 15 years ago. I see it on this sub sometimes--that bicurious girls are annoying, that they're just going to go back to their boyfriends. And of course having never had sex with a woman, I am afraid I'd do it badly and out myself as *just a virgin who can't drive*.

I'm sure there are lesbians out there who have particular fetishes for ""turning"" straight girls, and that anybody who rejects me for these reasons just isn't right for ME. But I'm wondering how common my situation is and if I should really be worried at all.

TIA for any thoughts!",actuallesbians
How did you meet your lesbian/queer friends?,"I've been living in a new town for a couple years now with my girlfriend, and since I've had no need for dating in the area I haven't met many queer friends I can relate to. I love my gf but it's time to meet more locals. Bumble bff is full of straight women, which is all well and good, but I'd also like friends from the queer community... any tips? Thanks!",actuallesbians
Oh,,actuallesbians
How old are you and where are you from?,Or if you wanna be old school: asl?,actuallesbians
Butch subs,"Why are they hard to come by 🙃, every butch I meet has been a top 🙃",actuallesbians
As a trans girl visiting this sub for the first time I just have to say...,"You all are the best. Seriously, I love you all in a gal pal kind of way. ❤️",actuallesbians
Have you guys seen the movie Carol?,Me and my girlfriend watched it last night and I thought it was really good! It had some great acting from Cate Blanchette. 9/10.,actuallesbians
I have d ece as e d,,actuallesbians
'Mere mortals',,actuallesbians
Anyone else devastated the new life is strange game isn’t going to be lesbians 😭?,,actuallesbians
Internalized homphobia,I'm dating a woman who's an international student from a country where homosexuality is illegal and there are very rigid generational and class expectations. What are your experiences with dating someone who is working through that kind of thing?,actuallesbians
Rant About My Brother,"My older brother is egotistical and doesn't believe in romantic love. His views and beliefs are really affecting my life and potential relationships. I'm a lesbian, and it's already hard enough to find girls to date, but he says people who seek relationships are just looking for a distraction, and people who use online dating sites/apps are ""insecure morons"" who are too scared to talk to people in real life. I don't think he has ever been in a relationship, and I definitely haven't. I'm 20 years old, and I haven't even had my first kiss.

I just feel like my brother is trying to make me like him, and is trying to project his views and beliefs onto me. And I'm wondering if I should just give in. I have never had a girl show romantic interest in me before, and I can't really leave the house without my brother interrogating me about who I'm meeting etc and ridiculing me if it's a date, so how could I ever meet anyone? I have postponed or even canceled a lot of dates with people because of my brother.

I just don't know what to do. I can either continue to crave intimacy and love, or just give up and devote my entire life to a career/hobby like he does. I just feel like regardless of which one I choose, I won't meet anyone. I barely even leave the house unless it's to run errands etc because I would have to face millions of questions when I came back :(

The thing that really annoys me about him though is that he is a musician and he's currently learning how to play the piano, and he always chooses old love songs to learn. It frustrates me because these are songs that I really identify with because they remind me of the girls I've liked in the past (and I've always been a hopeless romantic), and I just feel like he's tainting them and ruining them. He's currently learning ""That Old Feeling"", by Chet Baker, which is one of my favourite songs. I know how it feels to see someone after a while and have all of those feelings come flooding back. But to him, it's just a song :/",actuallesbians
When anyone asks me why I don't have a boyfriend,,actuallesbians
I really want someone to cup my chin in her hand as she kisses me slowly,,actuallesbians
Need shoe suggestions,"Sorry to post twice in one night, but I need shoe suggestions. I’m looking for comfy black dress shoes to go with a suit. So far I like the look of wingtip or suede Oxford shoes, but does anyone know of a cheaper option? Preferably black to go with my outfit",actuallesbians
Have I gone full lesbian?,"So there is this one really cute girl at my school in the grade above mine and I couldn’t stop noticing her since I first saw her. Just a few days ago I complimented her on her appearance once. Now, every time I pass by her, I feel like screaming, I am sooooo embarrassed to look at her. Just now, I passed by her and looked at the ground, after she passed me, I noticed that she waved at me at the last moment. Aaaaaaaa, now I feel so rude and like a bad person. I hope I didn’t make a bad impression, I hope she doesn’t think I am just super rude. Aaaaaaa, help.",actuallesbians
If this isn't the truth!! Very interesting read.,,actuallesbians
What do you wish you knew or did differently when moving in with a partner?,"Moving in with my girlfriend and her four kids this weekend (technically I'll be staying in the garage that was converted into a studio apartment by the previous owners, but I'll still be living on her property). This is my first time ever living with a girlfriend, what tips or advice do you have for me? What did you wish you knew or did differently when you first moved in with your partner?",actuallesbians
My girlfriend has more friends than me and I'm jealous?,"We have been dating since last November and are together since May/June around. I moved to this city last september because university  while she lives here her whole life. It makes totally sense she knows more people and has more friends, but even in my old city I didn't have many friends. I like hanging out with people, but I was kinda outcast my whole life so I was struggling a lot finding the right friends and didn't have a group since 5 years, just people I am friends with individually. Even in uni, I didn't find a group, but I'm changing subject, so I have a new chance. I really don't know what I'm doing wrong, I'm not shy (anymore) and have no problem talking to random people. But most people doesn't seem to be on the same wavelength. I tried to get into the queer scene but almost everyone is so young (I'm 20, the people there are mostly between 15-18), I kinda missed people my age, I don't get where they are. I have three best friends but all of them live abroad right now. 

The problem now is I'm really jealous that my gf always had good friends and doesn't quiet understand me in my loneliness. She had great birthday parties while I struggled to even find people to spend my birthday with. I like spending time by myself but I'm really not an introvert and feeling like missing out. I try my best talking to people and get to know them but nobody is ever interested in staying in contact.

My birthday is coming up in a month and she's not here because family vacation and it's really depressing me that the person I spend the most time with won't be here on my birthday. i spent my last birthday alone bc none of my friends had time and I feel like the biggest loser.
And I'm scared I'm too emotionally dependend but it's so hard not to be her being the only friend I have around here. I'm happy for her that she is in a better place but I'm afraid I will end being angry at her for being more popular than me and being really toxic.
I really don't know what to do, I hope I find good friends in my new study, but I'm also scared a lot because I fucked up so often.

Sorry for the long post, I really needed to get that off my chest. Has anyone any advice?",actuallesbians
I’m all about legs now.,,actuallesbians
Anyone going to Black Pride this weekend in Atlanta?,I’m going to Black Pride this weekend and wondering if anyone here is going! ,actuallesbians
what's the farthest away you've gone from your comfort zone for The Gay™?,"for example, im strictly a gay tv shows/movies/podcasts gal, however me and a friend, THE LEAST WEEBS, have been convinced by a friend to watch sailor moon for those good good lesbians that show up, yknow, in episode 70 or something. so what's yours?",actuallesbians
O L D. but. G O L D.,,actuallesbians
Aubrey Plaza is brilliant.,,actuallesbians
Malaysia Postpones Caning of Lesbian Couple Due to 'Technical Reasons',,actuallesbians
Lady Democracy works out,,actuallesbians
what do I do next?,"Hi raptors! 

I’m crushing hard on this girl I met through work. We clicked instantly and have hung out a few times. We definitely flirt and our mutual friends definitely notice our flirting but I don’t feel like we’re going anywhere. Every time I try to plan something it seems to have to include our mutual friends which makes sense because we all get along so well. I feel like I’m not sure if I should move in the direction of asking her out officially on a date or just let nature run its course. Just feels weird to flirt so much but not go anywhere? Let me know what y’all think! ",actuallesbians
Anyone else find this ad easy on the eyes?,,actuallesbians
Seattle Queers?,Any one here in Seattle? I am going to be visiting in a couple of weeks and would love some advice on what a Midwestern queer should do while there. I do enjoy a good beer and am vegan.,actuallesbians
Wedding Picture Wednesday Mega Thread!,"Welcome to the Wedding Picture Wednesday mega thread! Some pictures have more than one person and don't really fit in a ""self"" picture thread. So, for all your wedding photos, proposal photos, engagement photos, anniversary photos, post them here!

Doesn't even have to be about marriage. You could also share your pictures from prom or just a regular date. ""Wedding Wednesday"" is just a name.

This thread will be posted automatically at 9am EST on Wednesday, and will be taken down at 9am EST on Thursday. 
",actuallesbians
"Join the queendom, everyone.",,actuallesbians
Supportive yelling from the street?,"I'm dating a girl who is VERY publicly affectionate and I've never been with someone like that before! 

&amp; since I live in a really ~""PrOgReSsIvE""~ city we keep getting weird supportive strangers yelling at us? Like we've only been on 3 or 4 dates, and it's happened EVERY. TIME.  People have been yelling out of cars at us??? And it's always like unintelligible or just WOO noises... So like? Is it creepy men? Is it lonely af sapphics living through us vicariously? The girl I'm seeing doesn't give a fuck and it's true that is a pretty minor issue but I have OCD and I'm trying to get over the (irrational) feeling that I'm always being watched and now PEOPLE ARE LETTING ME KNOW THAT THEY'RE ALWAYS WATCHING ME. Yay free exposure therapy:):):):):) !

But I just wanted to rant. So I'm gonna imagine that all future yells are from other supportive sapphics &amp; just be happy they're not throwing rocks. But still!!! Sucks to be reminded we are straight until proven otherwise :(...",actuallesbians
As always... there's this girl...,"I met Allie (not her real name) in April or May when we went on a backpacking trip in a club I'm an  officer for. We didn't hang out the entire trip or anything, and she's very quiet, but I was the only one able to make her laugh or really open up. I also managed to find out she was gay because we both had really similar realization stories at high school dances. We also chatted at a fire alarm at our dorm once and it was so easy to talk to her!

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway it felt like we had chemistry but it was bad timing for me. I was going through a really rough break up and talking about my ex a lot, one of my close friends had recently passed away and I was fighting with really bad depression/suicidal thoughts/self-injury. She knew some of that stuff was going on, I didn't talk to her about it directly, because I liked her, but obviously she heard about it because we were all constantly together and there's no privacy in the woods lol. 

&amp;#x200B;

It's been several months now of me focusing on myself. I'm over my ex (I deserve SO much better, honestly). My mental health is in a stable place, I haven't had thoughts of suicide since May and am clean from self-injury. And I really want to see this girl again! 

  
I'm one to take things slow, so I was thinking about waiting to see if she shows up to any of our club hikes before testing the waters and flirting a little bit, then asking her out. I was also considering texting her a little before school starts to ask her how her summer was and if she'd be coming to any of our hikes, but I thought that might be a little weird. 

&amp;#x200B;

Anyway, my biggest insecurity is that she knows about my mental health struggles. As I said I'm stable now and I have a lot to like about me as a partner--I'm considerate, loving, but also my own person as a college student, part-time worker and several hobbies....So anyway, any advice on how to show her I've got my shit together now, and any advice on making a move? 

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks all! 

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
[NSFW] Had my first time with my first girlfriend today,"It was amazing. She was on her period, but she went down on me anyway, and I was still shaking afterwards. Then she stuck my fingers inside of me, which hurt a lot at first, but with a lot of coconut oil and some persistence we made it happen. Then I sat on her lap, and she made me her girlfriend! Probably the best day of my life.",actuallesbians
Invisible,,actuallesbians
"Wayhaught (Waverly Earp, Nicole Haught)",,actuallesbians
please please someone play with my hair,,actuallesbians
Is Galantis a lesbian thing???,"I looove Galantis, and have since Pharmacy. I know they're two guys, but I have met several gay girls that love them too. 

Thoughts???",actuallesbians
I need serious help with my dating profile,,actuallesbians
Anna Kendrick Just Opened Up About Her Sexuality And Kissing Blake Lively On Set,,actuallesbians
Categories? (Venting+advice request),"I'm having trouble and frustration with the whole androgynous/soft butch/butch thing. 

My issue is that I don't fit into any of these. I'm not femme on the other hand I'm not butch and I don't really fit anywhere in between. 
I'm taller heavy and really curvy, my face is not really femminine  but I would never be considered masculine looking, so I just feel like I don't fit in any catagory. Which bothers me because I'd love to be more masculine or androgynous it's how I dress and I've always had short hair. 

It might have to do with that fact I'm not attractive, my face just kinda looks like an old baby imo and I know it's not just because I'm over wieght because even when I was small I had alot of curves. 

Does anyone else have this issue? 

If someone could offer me advice I'd greatly appreciate it! 🙂
",actuallesbians
Bellingham Washington and surrounding area?,Anyone in that area? I’m relocating in two weeks and would love to make a friend or two. ,actuallesbians
Lesbian mating calls,"I had a glass of wine.

Just for fun, imagine you're in a room of a couple hundred women, some queer, some straight, and you need to yell something (preferably a reference to some queer music/tv/movie) that the other queer women will recognize. Like a rainbow beacon of hope and gay. 

GO! ",actuallesbians
Caning for Alleged Lesbian Acts in Malaysia Postponed,,actuallesbians
"The most wholesome fan edit I’ve ever seen. (anime: Asagao to Kase-san, which I highly recommend btw)",,actuallesbians
"I have a bad habit of going for emotionally unavailable, mysterious brunettes, so my best friend made me a Tinder guide",,actuallesbians
The ex you just can't get over,"Share stories of an ex you were stuck on for so long, you thought you'd never kick it, and how (if) you eventually did. Bonus points if there were multiple instances of getting back together, or sleeping with one another post-breakup, or cheating on a new partner with them, or any other flavor of wildly destructive behavior.",actuallesbians
What are the terms other girls use to compliment your appearance that really make you swoon?,"Like the title says, what are your favorite adjectives to compliment how you look? Examples include beautiful, cute, hot, pretty, sexy, adorable, gorgeous. 

I got into a conversation about it with a straight girl a while back and there were some serious differences in our preferences. I’m curious if there’s any commonality amongst lesbians. ",actuallesbians
"Dear mom,","I've been waiting patiently for you to be comfortable enough to tell our extended family that my 8 year long girlfriend is not just a friend. When you came to me and said you were going to do it i was over the moon. I excitedly told my friends and therapist, i begged my girlfriend to miss a previous commitment because this was so important to me. 

It broke my heart when you didn't do it. I saw the moment you lost the courage and went silent. Even though i understand, it doesn't hurt any less.

You said awful things to me when i came out of the closet at 15 years old. I don't know if you regret it or even remember it but i do. It was the moment i realized you were ashamed of me, not for something i had done but for who i was. Something broke at that moment and i've been trying to put all the pieces together for almost half of my life.

I know it's hard for you not to be perfect and i want you to know, you've been a great mother most of the time, but the harshness you judge other people for their shortcomings whilst not aknoledging your own puts a barrier of resentment between us.

I love you. I was really hoping you would treat my relationship with the same respect you treat everyone else's. You broke my heart and made me feel like an idiot.

Love,

Your daughter.",actuallesbians
same (low key kinda mad tho. why is this happening? 😠),,actuallesbians
I'm 20 with a 43 year old GF- no regrets!,I posted on here ages ago about this and we've been together over a year now! Honestly it's the best thing I ever went for!,actuallesbians
I hate confused girls,"Guys....so long story short I've been in love with my best friend for like a year....(we started hanging out flirtatioulsly at first, though she is...I don't know what she is....straight/bi/repressed gay??) she started intiating sleeping with me last December...then maybe every other month since then, she would initiate things. About a week and a half ago I initiated things (for the first time, ever, I didn't want to be the creepy lesbian) told her I loved her a once or twice in the middle, and now she's not talking to me. UGHHH",actuallesbians
I got my gf a no-occasion gift and I’m so excited but the secret is killing me.,"I mean first off I’m not ashamed to say I’m super proud of myself. She’s never taken the love language test but I’m sure hers would be the gift one. But it’s still shipping and I can’t wait it feels like Christmas or something. 

I’m proud because the idea popped into my head for a sort of important but not-to-expensive gift and I went for it. We’ve been together for a zillion years and I’m hoping she’s stoked and not annoyed I didn’t tell her I spent $60 on something. 

Anyway, I love her and I’m like bursting with no one to tell my secret so I’m telling you guys.

Have a good day or evening!",actuallesbians
Hayley Kiyoko or Kehlani? Or are you like me and thankful that the world gets both?,,actuallesbians
More please,,actuallesbians
Lycanthropic Lesbians,,actuallesbians
If this aint the truth,,actuallesbians
Did you guys hear about that 9 year old kid that killed himself:’( cause he’s gay,,actuallesbians
hayley kiyoko oct 23rd anyone?,"hi gays
last night i drunkenly dropped 108 quid on a ticket to see our lord and saviour in london on 23rd october. i was very surprised this morning haha. anyone wanna buddy up? i really dont want to go alone and none of my friends can afford it atm (i cant either but its too late now). if anyones going (alone or with a group idm) hit me up and we can exchange socials !! ",actuallesbians
Is it wrong that I want a much older woman,Like I'll be honest- my ultimate fantasy is a heavily tattooed- pink haired woman to show me some tricks. I mean in my mind she would be in like her 50's or 60's. I know it's kinda messed up because I'm 20. Honestly it would just be a messing around thing. I'm guessing that an older lesbian/bi woman would be really turned on by a younger girl being into her and that's kinda what does it for me. ,actuallesbians
"So, there's this girl...","I met her about a month ago online, and I think I'm in love with her, and she knows it. She's told me that she loves me too. But, we want different things out of life. We have different things we want to get out of a relationship. We decided that we probably aren't compatible as partners, so we're in a weird friends with benefits type area. At first, I was really into the idea, but the more I think about it, the more I want to be with her. I love her, and she loves me, I don't understand why we can't try. I don't know what to do, or how to tell her that. I just know that I fucking love her and I want to spend my life with her. I know that's stupid, it's way too soon to be thinking like that, but it's so fucking true

I don't know what to do... I need help..",actuallesbians
tfw you meet someone taller than you,,actuallesbians
When she gives me that smoldering look,,actuallesbians
I came out to my psychiatrist today,"I finally said it aloud about who I am. 

I’m gay and genderqueer (AFAB).

I used to feel like a bystander to my own life. It feels like the coach finally put me in the gayme.

You know who you are. ",actuallesbians
Sounds perfect!,,actuallesbians
I really wish guys wouldn’t go on dykesgonewild.,,actuallesbians
"Finally U-Hauled with the gf. As I folded our laundry this morning (something I had been way too excited about being able to do), I found a stash of chocolate in her bra drawer. Yeah. She’s a keeper.",,actuallesbians
My rural beach town needed some colour and this is the only way i know how!,,actuallesbians
I manned up and texted her and she rejected me. What to do now..,"I met a girl on Tender and we seemingly hit it off!  I am new to the area but we work in the same industry. We didn’t text during the week so I hit her up Friday night. I asked if she wanted to come over to my friend’s house for BP. She said she was already out at the bars with her friends. So I gathered my group and Ubered to meet up with her group downtown. I was quite drunk but from what I remember, it was a great experience. I hit her up the next day to see if she  would like to go out with me that night. She said she already had plans and was severely hungover. To which I completely understand! I want to keep trying! Or do I take the date rejection and move on? I hate trying to date in 2018 because I feel like I overthink everything! Help! Advice? ",actuallesbians
So it’s come to this? 😂,,actuallesbians
"I don't know if it's okay to post stuff like this here, but can I tell you all something?","(Throwaway because I know she lurks on Reddit.)

&amp;#x200B;

I've never felt this way about a girl before. We met through an online group, and she lives very far away. We've gotten to know each other over the past few months, and we talk about things that I ordinarily don't talk to people about. She's a really talented artist, and every time she draws something for me, my heart skips a beat. The other night, our online group was doing a voice chat, and I heard her quietly singing along with a Sufjan Stevens song I'd sent her as she sketched, and I thought my heart was going to leap right out of my chest at the sound.

&amp;#x200B;

I don't know if she feels the same way about me or if we're just friends, but man, I feel so silly over this girl. And even if she doesn't like me like that, I'm really glad I met her.

&amp;#x200B;

That's all I wanted to say.",actuallesbians
Leaving this here.,,actuallesbians
Potential STD maybe?,"NSFW, but I was fingering my girlfriend and then fingered myself but used the same hand for a few minutes on accident from getting caught up in the moment last night.

She's 100% clean as of her last test a year ago and had no other partners besides me since then and I was a virgin when we started dating then. Neither of us have had HPV shots and I've heard it's usually highest risk of being cancerous later if you've had more partners (she's had around 5 iirc), because of exposures to more strains, and if you have other STD's present. 

 I went to my OBGYN routine exam a few months ago and they said everything seemed fine besides a yeast infection and a very minor bacterial imbalance that was possibly BV both of which are cleared up now by medication.

Should I be worried at all? I'm making myself worried sick over me being stupid and it's getting to me a lot. 



",actuallesbians
Fiancée was researching how much we'll save in taxes when we're married ...,,actuallesbians
To the girl from the 6th floor,"I only got a glance or two. What i saw was a confident smile and braided hair. I held the elevator for you even as I got on myself. I think you were wearing a dress, but I was too shy to do more than keep your in my peripheral vision. 

After exchanging some comments, I noticed that the side of your head was completely shaved, and I almost died then and there. It was a painfully quick ride to the 6th floor. All I could do was steal one last glance as you walked passed me.

I just wanted to say, your hair looks awesome and I think you're really pretty. I hope you didn't get into too much trouble for being late to wherever you were going.

Signed, a purple-haired weirdo

 

Note to self: Look up what's on the 6th floor.",actuallesbians
"If she could stand next to me and dance like that, that would be wonderful 😍",,actuallesbians
lmao just discovered that im suuuuper into Ann Wilson’s voice,"https://youtu.be/s4nWy8pmIM4

I have no idea why, but this song single handedly gave me a massive little girl crush on Ann Wilson of Heart (well... the one in the video not her atm)

The way she finishes up verses with “barracuda” just gets me going

Like holy shit

Besides, she was hot too as icing on the cake ",actuallesbians
Going to see my girlfriend in a day...,"I'm so nervous! It's an excited nervous. It's been a LONG time since I was with anyone new so I'm worried I'll fuck it up somehow! But I really care for her. I'll be with her for 4 days and I know it's gonna be great no matter what, but my nerves are still acting out! Wish me luck everyone, I'm afraid I'll need it! 

",actuallesbians
My lesbian plans will commence shortly.,,actuallesbians
U-Haul lesbian joke is so true,"Okay guys, my best friends sent me a message last Thursday the 23th wondering if she should accept to be girlfriend of a woman she likes although they haven’t came out to their families and they are 9 years difference. I, of course, encouraged her following her heart and taking it easy. 

And today, the 28th, she said that she and her new girlfriend are gonna BUY A HOUSE AND MOVE IN TOGETHER SOON. 

I’m shock, but I’m happy for her. 
Now it’s only me and my loneliness 😩",actuallesbians
"Was on itunes looking up lesbian jesus, and noticed this on the side.",,actuallesbians
I think I’m falling in love with a straight girl,"So the title is pretty self explanatory. But yea I think I’m falling in love with a straight girl, now I usually know better not to Feel like this about someone who’s straight. Here’s a little back story to it, this girl is my work crush I’ve posted about her once before, well she gave me her number and since than I’ve been hanging out with her more we go to the gym together, I try to hint to hang out, she’s invited me over to her House I’ve spent the night and we were lazy all day which was great  lol I’ve found myself listening to country more, (she likes it).

Problem is she is seeing someone a guy, she doesn’t talk about him and their relationship with me just tells me when she’s seeing him. At first I was like okay she’s straight than which is cool cause I have trouble finding friends lol. But now I find myself caring way to much, I look forward to seeing her name pop up on my phone. I get butterflies when I’m with her like I don’t want to be boring to her, I’ve surprised her with food or candies buy small things like that for her, and I don’t do that for just anybody. 

We have a lot in common it’s scary. I like how she talks shit with me or to me lol I love to make her smile and laugh it’s the cutest thing this girl is perfect and It’ll never be anything more. I’m just digging myself deeper for this because now I don’t want to lose a friendship. If I tell her how I felt it would make it weird and I don’t want to lose her. 

What should I do? what would you do? Please feel free to ask me questions I’m pretty sure I left out a lot I just need some advice ",actuallesbians
I always assumed me and my best friend would end up together. Now I'm helping her with boyfriend problems.,"I've never met my best friend in person but we've communicated online for years and years almost daily. We've shared every intimate detail of our lives, we both came out to each other as bi at the same time (I later realised I'm actually a lesbian). We've always joked about us living so far apart being the only thing stopping us being an old married couple. We used to flirt *constantly.* It was just kind of a joke.

Anyway she started seeing this guy she met irl and started talking to me less and less until now, when she's having relationship problems.

I am her best friend before anything so I'm just trying to be there for her and support her in fixing her relationship and not letting my feelings affect her life decisions. Realistically I know we would never work as we are so long distance and this guy is nice to her and she really likes him.

I'm basically just here to rant because I'm sad and maybe a little heartbroken and the person I would normally talk to when I'm sad is the person I am sad about.

&amp;#x200B;

Sorry this is a long post.

&amp;#x200B;",actuallesbians
how much chasing and clear expression is required of a lesbian before stuff becomes endless small flirting that leads to nowhere??,"Hey there everyone! I cannot for the life of me be concise so sorry

The thing is, my first and last relationship happened two years ago and it was with a friend of mine so I'm pretty rusty in the dating department. I also haven't really been out with anyone during this time. Flirting and noticing cues from other girls is something I've been getting back to recently but does it confuse me

Recently, this girl from college randomly butted into a conversation I was having with a friend about the book I'm writing, gave me some interesting perspective on the material and asked me when I would be on campus again. She later randomly found me in the parking lot with friends, sprang in front of me and gave me some texts from one of my favourite authors and told me to read and give it back later.

I kid you not, this is how you make me wet. Since then we've had a few sparse short encounters in corridors until I said fuck it and told her to come have lunch with me. Things did go on pretty smoothly I guess, definitely no problem keeping up the conversation, which mainly revolved around literature and writing. I do sense flirting vibes coming from her, I mean, I interpret those stares and a bit too long hugging as flirting. She did briefly mention a boy who I believe is a friend with benefits and some red alarm rang in my head but whatever. At some point she did mention ~casually~ that I could visit her apartment downtown one day and I literally choked on my food because you girls I didn't have much of a backbone to respond to that

Cut to now, I've borrowed a book from her and vice-versa, there's been short arranged/radom encounters and man do I wanna have long conversations with this girl and see what happens but I kind of told myself I would waut to see if she would ask my number or ask me to go grab something to drink but she hasn't. So my question is do I make a move again to ask her out or what. Because I do feel interest and reciprocation on her part but the girl's just so random. How much do I get to the be the 'chaser' (kinda hate this word but you get it) without going overboard and looking desperate?? My bff is like ""for fuck's sake she asked you to visit her house, make some strong innundo"" but I'm still somewhat shy even though my confidence has been rising so my bad lol

I guess this is it, how much chasing and clear expression is required of a lesbian before shit becomes endless small flirting that leads to nowhere?? ",actuallesbians
Crushes before you realized they were crushes...,"Always hear about people's first crushes after they realized they were gay or the one crush that pretty much made them realize they were gay right away. But what about the other crushes? The ones that you never realized were crushes (from before you knew you liked women) and maybe the ones that very slowly made you realize you were gay... A long time after you first started liking them. 

I thought I was straight until age 22 so obviously I've had a lot of these unknown crushes, what were you guy's experience with them? Also interested if you've ever been able to tell someone else had a gay crush before they did (totally not trying to find out how obvious I was at all.....)

Whenever I had a crush on someone before I realized I liked women I would obsessively want to be better friends with them than whatever our current friendship level was. I'd go way out of my way to help them or hang out with them and would be super jealous whenever they hung out with someone else or, heaven forbid, got a boyfriend.",actuallesbians
Just gonna leave this here.,,actuallesbians
If you're a fan of athletic girls in tight pants...the Women's Baseball World Cup is happening through Friday,,actuallesbians
Offered without comment,,actuallesbians
Tell us a fun fact about yourself.,"Or don't, I'm a reddit thread, not a cop.",actuallesbians
"For those of you who like post-apocalyptic novels with gay af protagonists ""Charon Docks at Daylight by Zoe Reed"" is for you","I've been following an artist on Instagram, [lesly.o](https://www.instagram.com/lesly.oh/?hl=en) and she has done several illustrations for [Charon Docks at Daylight by Zoe Reed](https://www.fictionpress.com/s/3095130/1/Charon-Docks-At-Daylight) and yesterday I decided to give it a look. It was one of the best books I've read in a very long time. I would highly recommend it to anyone who is interested in reading books that are similar to 28 Days Later and The Walking Dead.

Also Lesly's instagram is full of fantastic illustrations for anyone interested in digital art. ",actuallesbians
Lesbian going to Milwaukee for 2 weeks,"Hello ladies,

&amp;#x200B;

Mexican here. I'm going to Milwaukee for a business trip, I'll have 2 free weekends, what places in Milwaukee would you recommend to meet gal pals?

&amp;#x200B;

Thanks ",actuallesbians
When the trash takes itself out 💀,,actuallesbians
Tips on how to enter gay dating world when you aren't sure about sex?,"Hey, throwaway because people know my main. 

I've got a bit of sexuality problem and I wanted to get your advice on how best to explain it to other people. First off, never dated women before. Never been intimate with a woman before. Total newbie. I'm already self-conscious about this and I'm hoping people will be nice but the big issue is that, while I'm sure that I love women romantically, and want to date one and grow old with one, I really am not sure about my actual attraction to them. I've never felt pulled towards a woman like people describe when they see someone they want to fuck. I recently got a dating app and flicking through these pics I'm thinking about dates, I don't think I feel physical attraction to any of the girls I see. I was actually deciding to swipe based on what society decided was conventionally pretty, not me personally going 'damn girl.' 

In other words, I think I'm a gay asexual person. However I'm not sure because I'm paranoid that this is just repression plus society teaches us so many bad things about female sexuality, so I'm definitely not comfortable with taking sex off the table forever. I don't know what my feelings on sex with a girl actually are, I don't know whether I'm one of those people who will be totally disgusted by it or conversely totally love it, or just be quite neutral about it all.  

The thing is that I know there's a lot of negative sentiment towards asexuals in the lgbt community even if its a gay ace person, and I'm really scared of running afoul of that. And while I don't want to mislead anyone if I am indeed genuinely asexual and/or I decide I'm either not interested in sex or its not a priority for me... I feel stuck because I don't know what I am. I want to meet women. I want to date them. I want to try having sex with them. But I don't know how to explain my worries or my lack of experience with girls. 

(also, and this is a tiny thing but, if you're talking to a girl on a dating app, should you just buckle up and ask if she wants to meet up?)",actuallesbians
Mood,,actuallesbians
First date/meet up with a girl,I just wanted to tell a group of people that would be genuinely happy for me. That I have my first date this Thursday with a woman I met. We’ve been texting everyday for a week and a half now. I’m excited and nervous at the same time. Wish me luck 😊,actuallesbians
"Romance, motherfuckers!",,actuallesbians
Baby New Yorker,"So lovelies I will be moving to NYC (east village) area in about a month or so and it’d be dope to meet and make some friends and network and stuff like that. I have a few friends in NY already but they aren’t LGBT and i need some gay girls in my life! 

A little about me: My name is Sydney but I go by Syd usually. I’m 21, i’m a visual artist (like painting and drawing and all that jazz). here’s my instagram if you care to look @buggsart. I love to dance go out to clubs and love new experiences scary or not. I’m said to have a bubbly personality and i like to think i’m funny. Really just want some peeps to go have bottomless mimosas with and smoke weed with haha. If you’re down for any of those things please shoot me a PM 

XX 💋 ",actuallesbians
You're welcome.,,actuallesbians
when a straight dude asks me out,,actuallesbians
I got a Jeep! And I knew the first thing I wanted to do to it.,,actuallesbians
I think I messed up and I don't know how to fix it,"Well I asked the girl I'm seeing if she wanted to be official after a month of talking. We went on dates, met each others families, spent a couple of nights together, she sent me flowers before classes started, listened to heavy metal together- the usual romantic things. 

We spent the weekend together and I told her I really enjoyed spending time with her and I wanted to date her, but if it was moving too fast I understood and I would slow down. She ignored the question and changed the subject. 

Then she stopped talking to me, canceled us hanging out, and won't acknowledge me if I say something sweet. I apologized for making things weird and she acted like she didn't know what I was talking about. 

If I'm going too fast I just need to know, if she wants space I'll back off and leave her be. I know somethings wrong but she won't tell me whats upsetting her. I've always tried to be 100% honest with her about my feelings and her silence is frustrating. 

I genuinely care about her and just want her to be okay. Over the weekend I realized I was falling hard for this woman and I want to be with her in anyway I can but I have no idea if I should just leave her alone for a few days or keep trying to have a relationship with her. Per my last post I'm a baby gay and I don't know what I'm doing in the slightest. 

Any advice would be greatly appreciated, as I feel like I have no where to turn. ",actuallesbians
Mild identity crisis,"I hope I've come to the right place for this but here we go...
Over identified as a lesbian since I was like 13 I'm almost 18 now, I feel absolutely no attraction to men but I was recently talking to this person who I found myself attracted to who I knew initially as female but then he told me he is Male but hasn't started transitioning yet... it really tripped me up like it feels wrong to be attracted to this person with a female body and a mostly feminine personality who identifies as Male I feel almost as if I was being inconsiderate to their identity... what do I do?? have any of yall ever been in this situation?? 

I'm not sure if this makes any sense so feel free to ask for clarification",actuallesbians
Non mon until we end up married 🤣,Life is so funny the way it works sometimes. Started dating another non monogamous individual and we ended up monogamous and I have never been more happy. Any one relate? ,actuallesbians
Shuri Though... 😍,,actuallesbians
Headed to London in Mid September,Any suggestions on where to grab a pint or can't miss spot? Do you have any wlw favorite pubs/hang out spots? Thank you.,actuallesbians
Is it wrong contacting a girl on Instagram or Facebook that you found on a dating website?,"So, just a bit unsure what to do here. I got a profile on OkCupid, and this cute girl came up. Beautiful and with the most amazing heart. Found out we have so much in common (even more than I had with my ex) and so I sent her a message. Of course the annoying thing is that you can’t see the profile or message until they answer back. In hindsight it was not a very well worded message, and she is so pretty that I feel it probably is far way down in the list of likes. She shared her Instagram profile and blog url, and was pretty open about who she was. Now, I’m not good at knowing how long time it takes before one gets an answer on these websites, and frankly this is the first real try at internet dating since my breakup last year from a 10 year long relationship. I don’t want to seem desperate, like a stalker or creepy, but I also don’t want to give up without trying. I have found her on Facebook, since her Instagram profile had her real name and all. So, any thoughts. Would it be stupid of me to contact her on Facebook, and reference it to the message I sent on OkCupid? Thanks",actuallesbians
I'll just see myself out...,,actuallesbians
Engagement advice?,"So i want to propose to my girlfriend in December.

&amp;#x200B;

I have the ring, planned a trip out to Orlando to take her to Universal studios (shes a harry potter nerd, so yeah haha), bought our flights, hotels and made reservations at a nice restaurant for afterwards.

&amp;#x200B;

The only thing I'm a little stuck on is whether or not I should ask for her fathers blessing? It seems a little hetro-normative to me and I also find it weird that our society has this tradition because it somehow implies that fathers own their daughters? But it seems like the kind of thing her Dad would appreciate.

&amp;#x200B;

Should I ask? and if so, what do I even say?",actuallesbians
One of my favorite quotes from one of my favorite shows. 💕🌈,,actuallesbians
"I’m nervous as hell. I’m seeing the girl I like for the first time since she messaged me saying she liked me back, and my idiot gay brain is overthinking as usual.","I KNOW that everything’s probably going to be fine, most likely more than fine, and I KNOW that nothing will be the end of the world, but my brain seems to dismiss any of the logic and rationality I try to apply to this situation. I’m super anxious about saying the wrong thing or screwing up, even though I know how much of a kind, sweet and accepting person she is. It’s mostly just nervousness and the sense of disbelief I have that our feelings our mutual (I’m still in shock that she could actually like *me*)

I’m going to try my best, and we’ll see what comes of it. ",actuallesbians
W/W Spaces in Boston?,Would love some suggestions! Just moved!,actuallesbians
Contribute ladies!,,actuallesbians
i'm her first girlfriend--intimacy advice?,"I've been dating this wonderful woman I met on OKCupid; we have much in common in terms of interests and preferences, and she's so sweet &lt;3 She's a photographer and I'm a poet, so we've even started collaborating since she attends a graduate program at a high ranking art institute (I know, barf). 

Everything seems great, except during sexy-time. I haven't been able get her off, and it's concerning me because we've slept together about 5 or 6 times now. I've never had this issue of not being able to satisfy my partner, and I've tried a few things like asking her to show me how to touches herself, asking her during and outside of sex what she's into, and trying to ground each encounter with intimacy (touching, kissing, caressing, etc.). Yesterday, we bought a vibrator but she didn't climax. 

She seems genuine when she says she's not bothered and disagrees with me when I say I feel inadequate. She's explained that--frequently--she doesn't actually climax, and then last night she said this was because she's only dated men, wherein those relationships her pleasure was mostly ignored. I don't think she's straight or straight-leaning and just experimenting with me; she's told her roommate and friends she's dating a woman and I believe she cares about me. I just don't know what to do at this point. 

What also makes me feel bad is: I'm HIGHLY sensitive so I'll climax several times... I feel like its so easy to get me off while I can't seem to get her off.  Eek, I'm so embarrassed...

Any advice on dating women who are new to wLw or anything related is very much appreciated!",actuallesbians
Can we take a moment to appreciate this goddess?,"https://www.instagram.com/p/Bm_8uyzhncw/?utm_source=ig_share_sheet&amp;igshid=12ce3tc2vhk3t

I mean come on 😍 *swoon*",actuallesbians
What is a normal sex life for a lesbian,,actuallesbians
Who's the smoother bae? Holland vs Sarah,,actuallesbians
This dude in my class has the smelliest feet and it just made me 150% gayer,,actuallesbians
Not hypocritical at all,,actuallesbians
"I’m 16, is it strange I’ve never been in a relationship?","Hi,
I have never been in a relationship, never kissed anyone, never even held hands with anyone anything but platonically😂 I have had plenty of crushes of course! But I only realised this a few months ago because I thought I just really wanted to be those girls, when in fact, I wanted to be with them. 

I had a crush on a girl who I think liked me back but it didn’t go anywhere, we just seemed like incredibly close friends, but I caught her staring at me more than once, so idk it was weird.
 
This generally doesn’t bother me but my friends just had a conversation in a group chat where they were talking about relationships and I am the only virgin... 

Anyway! Am I a strange little incel or something? Or is this common? Where do people even find girls to go out with? Being out would probably be a good idea I guess...",actuallesbians
My dishwasher has the same settings as my girlfriend.,,actuallesbians
Butch..,"How do you know when you *look* butch? I’m sorry this feels dumb lmao but I’m really bad at fashion and the like. My friends and my girlfriend call me butch but I’m not sure what actually quantifies it, if that makes sense.",actuallesbians
My sexual awakening!!! Who spearheaded yours?,,actuallesbians
Just needed to share - made a move!,"There's a local restaurant near the law school I go to. I've been having the ""gay eye contact"" stare with this waitress the past couple times I've been there, and tonight she was the waitress for my table. I left my number on the receipt, so here's to hoping she calls/texts! And I also hope I didn't make her uncomfortable, I've never done this and didn't wanna seem douchey but I really like her and think she's also into me! Just had to share with someone!",actuallesbians
Tuesday Daily Chat Thread,"Welcome to the daily chat thread! These are a a place to talk with fellow WLW (Women Loving Women) about whatever you like. The threads will show up five days a week. The two days without chat threads are Selfie Saturday and Wedding Wednesday, so save your photos for those days.

Daily threads go up at 9am EST every day and remain stickied on the front page until the next day's thread replaces it.
",actuallesbians
my exact face when little me was invited to take pictures with the pretty girls,,actuallesbians
I noticed my girlfriend’s fingernails today...,,actuallesbians
"Update: I gave her my number two nights ago and she still hasn’t texted, so I followed up yesterday but still nothin 😭😭😭 maybe she’s super busy and doesn’t check her apps? I’d be heckin heartbroken if I never meet her tbh",,actuallesbians
I’m a useless lesbian,,actuallesbians
I swear I thought this commercial was a movie preview at first. It’s ADORABLE and I need more of this story!!!,,actuallesbians
Unintentionally drawn to other lesbians,"So, I recently noticed that every time I start a new job or at a new location, I always hit it off with a woman in particular. Later on, it comes out that she is a lesbian. I keep being drawn to lesbians without even realizing they're lesbians. It should be noted that this is not a romantic or attraction thing. Has anyone else encountered this kind of an unintentional preference towards lesbians? ",actuallesbians
Is this a date??,"Hi, I'm a bit clueless when it comes to dating, and I'm not actually sure about the difference between meeting up and a date...

Anyway, I started talking to a girl on here about a month ago because she wanted to know if anyone was going to a particular event. At the time, I was going so we exchanged numbers and agreed to go together. Unfortunately I can't go any more so I let her know about a week ago. I never expected to hear anything from her again so I deleted her number etc, but the other day she messaged me asking if I'm free to meet up anytime soon. I said yes and we have arranged a day to meet. I said I'd take her out for a meal and she told me what kind of food she likes, so I had a look at some restaurants in the city and I think I've found the perfect one and I'm actually quite proud of myself :p But when I told her I had found a restaurant, she didn't ask me where it is or what it's called etc, she just gave me more information about what food she likes/doesn't like haha, so I asked her if she wanted the restaurant to be a surprise (because I thought that would be more exciting :p) and she said yeah.

So basically I'm surprising a girl by taking her to a great restaurant where they serve only her favourite food and I'm not sure if it's a date :D",actuallesbians
"Me, trying to break the ice when I meet a cute girl.",,actuallesbians
Does your town/city have a lesbian bar?,"My wife and I travel a great deal and we always love to hit up the different ""gayborhoods"" in each city. We've found that lesbian-specific bars are a dying breed, although there are a few hanging on. We live in Dallas and have good ol' Sue Ellen's. What are your lesbian hangouts? ",actuallesbians
Truth.,,actuallesbians
Wife left me,"Wife left me, she left the state on a last min Decision she went into an episode she has borderline personality disorder after about three days I called her and ask her when she was coming home she told me that she wasn’t she’s done with me she said we argue too much I thought our argument was relatively regular comparative to other friends. I don’t think it was excessive we just got the lease together for about one month into it I’ve never lived alone I’ve always had roommates or girlfriends or family I have a puppy and I Walk her go on little hikes but I don’t know how to live alone without my wife had no idea we were this bad She won’t reconsider coming back and living with me for a while or therapy or even I don’t even know where to restart my life",actuallesbians
"Not gonna be original: I KISSED A GIRL (or rather, a girl kissed me)","Sorry, I have no great romantic story to tell, and there's going to be some blabbering, but bear with me, please, I still gotta share it somewhere and what better place than here

You see, I'm 22 and I have never ever been with anyone of any gender, never even held hands, never even flirted through the internet, nothing (that also has to do with some mental bullshit that I haven't yet decifer, but that's not the point). Not that I'm in a hurry to get in a relationship, more like not at all, but I got some feeling of missing out or something?

This happened like a week or two ago

So I'm at the little party - not even party, really, just four girls hanging out - at my friend's flat. And I must note that this was somehow the one and only group of people with whom I'm comfortable and not nervous hanging out. And that flat is the only flat where I don't want to escape from immediately (besides my own, of course). Dunno what that magic is, but my anxiety calms down around those people and in that place.

So we're all drunk. Like really drunk - but pleasantly, no one got sick or whatever, it was nice. And I don't remember what we were discussing, but I exclaimed something like ""Dammit, and I'm 22 and still haven't been kissed, what the hell, it pisses me off""

And then one of my friends, the owner of the flat - she's pan btw, and also the nicest person in general, the kind of a ride-or-die friend who'd help you hide a body without asking questions - she goes like

""Well shit, I could fix that, if you wanna""

And at this point I'm like. Half ""wait what"" and half ""why the hell not"", so I squeaked something like ""Well I wouldn't be opposed to that"". 

So she did kiss me. And you know what? That was nice. No fireworks or whatever - I guess you have to actually be in love for that - and I didn't do much, since I was both drunk and not experienced at all, but. Yeah. That was really nice. And whatever my inner homophobia tries to tell me, I'm definitely gay. Yay. 

And now that I know the feeling - I'm perfectly content to wait till I meet someone with whom I actually fall in love (and learn how to kiss properly). Without this question buzzing in the back of my head anymore. 

I'm lil gay happy about this, is what I'm trying to say.

(Just in case - yeah, I'm sure that was platonic (do I use the right word?) on her side, no ""useless lesbian"" blindness here. Not gonna go into details, not my life to discuss, but just in case anyone will think that I'm friendzoing her x) Nor am I in love with her. I just trust her. She's that kind of a person.)

Oh, and also - holy hell Katy Perry's ""I kissed a girl"" lyrics make so much sence now!!! The describing parts, anyway.

P. S. Forgive me if my English is wonky anywhere. Not my native language. I am a translator actually, so should be fine, but it's 4am here, so my head is so-so x) ",actuallesbians
Lesbifriends?...,Anyone interested in just doing a daily hey how are you chat kind of thing one on one? I'm married so there's nothing at stake. I'm just a not so little transbian looking for friends! Feel free to dm.,actuallesbians
I think I’ve finally figured it out.,"A little while back, I thought I could’ve bi because I find some men attractive. However, even afterwards, I kept questioning and questioning and questioning... But I think I’ve finally figured it all out. I think I kept pushing my aesthetic attraction and thinking it was romantic/sexual... but I can’t see myself kissing a guy, acting sexually with a guy, spending the rest of my life with a guy, etc. I only fantasize about women. In short, heteronormativity is not okay and has screwed me up. I’m pretty dang sure I’m a lesbian.",actuallesbians
Venting,Not sure why im posting but i guess its how ive been feeling lately.. ive seen alot of post like this i just feel as tho ik people will say just be patient it will happen when its meant to blah blah but i want it now.. someone to say i love you to and i can kiss tickle just show them that i wanna be there but anytime i try to reach out they see me and nothing or they have a man and want to add another female and tbh i wanna be selfish and have her to myself .. just been nagging at me for the past year im ready for love but i don’t think she will ever be here just wanted to vent just hard craving something u can’t get.. and u see other couples im jealous deep down but i try to remain positive just sometimes its hard.. smh :(,actuallesbians
Any ladies going to DragonCon (Atlanta) this weekend?!,I’m going to be there this Saturday and was wondering how many people from this sub were gonna be there! ,actuallesbians
Convince me to move to your state.,"I’ve been thinking of moving out of state for awhile now. California born and raised - both southern and northern CA. Currently located in Nor Cal. It’s time to make a new, fresh start as life has become rather stagnant for the last 4-5 years now. 

What are the pros and cons of your state? What do you love and dislike the most about where you live? Is your state LGBTQ friendly? How’s the job and housing market? Any cool state/national parks? Outdoor recreation? Affordable college? How’s the weather? Tell me anything.

CA is so damn expensive but I love the mountains, lakes, valleys, ocean and deserts. Any outdoorsy stuff and bodies of water are a huge plus. 

Midlife crisis is starting to bog me down. Bleh

",actuallesbians
A foolproof way to pick up a woman 🤔🤔,"
https://imgur.com/a/44v03EH",actuallesbians
That wink 😉💜,,actuallesbians
A little disgruntled... and I don’t wanna be!,"Hey, guys!

For this one I wanted to post in the Relationships sub, but I dunno - I figure you guys would gimme something better. 

So my girlfriend and her friends (2/3 that I know and get along real well with) have planned a trip to America - a road trip sorta deal. I’ve never been out of the country and have always wanted to go to America, so when I was told no couples/significant others were allowed to go, I was kinda bummed. 

My issue is that I wanna be cool with this - REALLY, REALLY do, because I want her to experience all that great stuff - but, let’s face it, I’m jealous and sad, and I can’t help but resent the trip. I’ve planned my own USA break to try to get over it, but I feel like a huge jackass. I guess I’m torn because all my friends have told me they’d be pissed, too, and on some level I feel like a spare dick. We’ve never gone on holiday together where she and her friends have and I guess I figured she’d use her resources to travel with me, or at least maybe wanna include me in something so life changing/something I’ve always been interested in. It could be that our relationship is still in its infancy or maybe that she hurt my feelings lately when she wasn’t there for me last week when my great aunt died, which was my first family death. 

The whole thing’s keeping me up st night and I don’t want it to. I’m torn between having a conversation with her about it because it’s festering or leaving it because I don’t wanna be an ass. It just seems like she plans more stuff with her friends than she does with me, and I can’t help but feel hurt. I just want rid of the feelings I have. She’s also going for three weeks - we’re pretty inseparable so it’s gonna be hard. I know it has its perks because I can do lots of stuff alone, but gawd. I dunno why I feel like this. Maybe my period’s coming.",actuallesbians
Um. Guys.,,actuallesbians
"I don't know if this is technically gay music, but I feel like we could all use more Kim Boekbinder.",,actuallesbians
"“I like my women like I like my honey, sweet. A little selfish.” 🎶 A top tier song by Kehlani &lt;3",,actuallesbians
On a date in Alabama - a woman on the street yelled at me and my girlfriend,"We left the coffee shop in downtown Decatur. A middle aged woman and her spouse were walking towards us. We held hands and started crossing the street to our car. The woman yelled something at us. We turned around and said ""What?"" She yelled again:

""Good on yall for being open! In Decatur, Alabama too! Thats awesome!""

We thanked her and then giggled in the car for a good 5 minutes 😂😂😂",actuallesbians
I bet it feels great,,actuallesbians
"Anyone from or currently living in Eugene, Oregon?",I’m in the running for a job there and I was wondering what ya’ll think about it. The closest I’ve been is Portland. ,actuallesbians
"Opinions. Blatant homophobia, no? Another pic in comments.",,actuallesbians
How did you meet your partner?,,actuallesbians
This Morning,"I'm staying with my mom while we clean out my childhood home. So this morning I got out of the shower, and she has these shower rings that are ducks with googly eyes. All the googly eyes were pointed down and ""looking"" at me so I said out loud, ""Stop looking at my tits!"" And then I laughed all by myself, naked in the bathroom.

&amp;#x200B;

So anyway, I should probably start dating again before I get any weirder, so if you happen to look like any of the The Outsiders, get at me.

&amp;#x200B;

;)",actuallesbians
Know any good lesbian books?,"The romance can be the main story/sub plot. sjsjsj I'll even take it being a side character's romance. I'd really appreciate any suggestions.  Also any other lgbt+ books are great too! 

Also can u say where I can get/read them thanks!!!",actuallesbians
"It's not just that I love women, but I'm repulsed by men with women, and I feel like that's abnormal.","I don't understand myself.  And this is something I've never really been able to discuss with anyone, because immediately I'm called the stereotypical man-hating dyke.

I'm a 35 year old lesbian.  And I do want to make it clear that I didn't default to women simply because the thought of being with a man makes me feel actually sick.  I actually thought I was into guys - or maybe I was then!  At that age it was all theoretical - as a teenager.   That just kind of went away as I got older, but my attraction to women stayed/got stronger.  

But my feelings aren't just ""Eh, I'll pass,"" or even ""Ew, no.""  The thought of kissing a man, or seeing a man kiss or touch a woman, fills me with this visceral disgust.  However, I don't have this issue when I see two guys hooking up.  I actually love gay porn.  I'm just very specifically repulsed by heterosexual actions.  

I've been romantically attached to two men in my lifetime, and the thing is, the thought of kissing these people I genuinely was in love with (or thought I was; honestly I was in such a bad mental place then it was really probably obsession, not love) turned my stomach.  

I would get it if I were just grossed out by dudes.  I mean, you're not into what you're not into.  But the fact that I find dudes doing other dudes (or themselves) hot, but feel sickened by seeing men touch women, makes me feel crazy.  And sick and abnormal.   

I don't know why I'm asking reddit.  I can't think of anywhere else, I guess.  And maybe in this sub I won't get a bunch of cishet men explaining to me that I'm actually bisexual, not a lesbian.  That's getting old.  ",actuallesbians
Looking for a friend!,Honestly... I need more lesbian friends PM me! Pleaseeee,actuallesbians
how to deal with living in a homophobic society?,"hello! something happened today that really bothered me. so people in my society are really ignorant when it comes to lgbt and gender studies. two girls I know were having a conversation about lesbians and the other girl's reaction was disgusted and scared by them lol. she then ended up saying ""why do they choose to like girls i feel like guys are much better"" and the other girl responded by saying ""of course this is a huge sin."" 

I was so frustrated and pissed at that moment but I couldn't say a thing. when will people understand that sexuality is not a choice? I didn't want to speak up or make a scene because these people are super conservative. They'll probably judge me and look at me negatively. ",actuallesbians
Kicking myself,"Went on a date with this girl that I'd been crushing on this whole semester. She was beautiful, accomplished, completely out of my league. I really wanted to kiss her and I think the feeling was mutual - at one point we were chilling on the grass and she offered me a mint after taking one herself (that's what that means right? right?) - but time flew by so quickly and we had to end the date in a crowded place, so I chickened out. This is next level gay panic, even for me, ughhhhhhhHHHHHHh (throwaway for obvious reasons)",actuallesbians
How do I figure out my feelings for girls are real...,"How do I figure out my feelings for girls are real...and I’m not just convincing myself that they are? 

I am 22 and...

Anywayyyyy I’ve gotten to a place where I am super confused about my sexuality. I feel like if I think back to growing up there are a so many red flags that should have got me to this point a lot sooner but here I am. 

What are some genuine questions I can ask myself so that I can try and figure it out in my head 😩",actuallesbians
While you were closeted,"while you were closeted, did you ever hate or get irrationally or oddly angry at women you subconsciously or consciously found attractive and or liked? Ever ignore or stop talking to them randomly? ",actuallesbians
I was 0/7 as a Child. Thanks Abstinence Only Education!,,actuallesbians
"Even if it's a kid's show, this is still my favourite lesbian couple.",,actuallesbians
Desiring a closeted religious bi girl: a heartache in vignettes,"you breathe my name out like a prayer with the lights turned off;  tell me you can’t want me as you devour my lips like communion wine;  speak your god’s name as you die over and over again. our legs entwine –  thorns in his crown – from between both blood burgeons.

&amp;#x200B;

every word after is considered. sorry, you say. sorry you can’t love  me like a lover can’t walk away from your creator can’t embrace sin. in  the night i feel you drifting away on your dreams.

&amp;#x200B;

morning light brings deliverance – sins washed clean like your hands  that you pull away from me as if to tidy your hair. you cross the road and keep on walking. you cannot bear to meet my eyes even as you call to me.",actuallesbians
"Saw a commercial for this movie and i'm left thinking ... ""But is it gay?""",,actuallesbians
You Guys Are Awesome!,"Since coming to terms with my sexuality I feel like this dark cloud that has been sitting over my head for the last 10 plus years is finally starting to disappear. I’m happy, like truly happy for the first time in forever it feels like. I would have moments of happiness, but they were never long lasting because I had to deny these feelings and thoughts that I would have. I have been so afraid of these feelings and thoughts and have been pushing them down as far as I can because if I accepted them then It would mean accepting that I’m a lesbian. And I didn’t know how to live in my life or with my family and not be straight. I ignored all the signs that I wasn’t straight because I was scared of how my life would change. Im from a family that has sent members to gay conversion therapy. I’m not out yet, but just admitting to myself that I’m not straight is a huge for me. I have ignored all these signs of why relationships with men didn’t work and realizing that I really didn’t want to have sex with them and why it felt forced and uncomfortable. Also realizing that  while my friends would crush on men in movies and shows it was always a woman for me. If it wasn’t for this Sub and The L Word I don’t know if I ever would have admitted it to myself. I just want to Thank this Sub for what it has done for me! ",actuallesbians
Good Seattle places for queer women?,"I've been a Seattleite all my life and I don't know any good places to meet people, especially other wlw. I've been to the ""lesbian bar"" Wild Rose but it is... not a great time, any suggestions from other seattle lady loving ladies and NBs? ",actuallesbians
How do you feel about lesbians who sexually objectify women?,"I was watching Dead Sara's music video for ""Mona Lisa"" and I was surprised to see scenes of a (skinny/young/white) pole dancer featured throughout. Often with her head cropped out of the frame. It wasn't even like some sort of commentary on objectification (though that's a bad excuse anyway), it appeared to serve no purpose but titillation. Compared to your mainstream male singer I guess it's not a big deal but I kind of expected more from a lesbian-fronted alt-rock band. Is that unfair of me? Idk.

Do you think sexual objectification is ok in lesbian art? Am I just being a kink-shamer?",actuallesbians
How can I tell if someone is into me?,"I'm back with another hypothetical! Add fast as I know, a girl has never really been into me. Though, I suppose it's possible that I just didn't pick up on any signs or hints or anything. So, I guess I would like to avoid missing something? 

Thanks so much for any and all advice!",actuallesbians
Sapphic pendants?,"Fellow leslies! 

I’m a rather femme gal and I’ve been told I pass as super straight until people actually get to know me. I’d like to gay it up a bit! 

So I am shopping for some sapphic pendants. Any suggestions from Etsy or elsewhere?

My everyday casual wear is usually high waisted jeans with a tucked in tee shirt and diadora sneakers. I’m picturing something like a scissoring pendant or low key yoni pendant. I’m not big on overt rainbow/ colorful jewelry. 

Lemme know!",actuallesbians
my friend needs help,"hello my friend is transitioning and she really likes this girl and is in a relationship that really matters to her (with this girl) and both of them are worried her girlfriend is worried that she wont be attracted to my friend anymore and my friend is worried about the same thing, (she was to shy to make this post so I said I would), is there anyway to make my friends girlfriend like her?",actuallesbians
I really love her,"So I already posted about this topic before but I need to add a little bit more information.

So I have been talking to a girl for 2 months, but she lives in the Philippines and I live in the US. Well today I started to learn Tagalog with help from her. I'm hoping to know how to hold a conversation in Tagalog by the time I'm able to see her in the Philippines.

That is all for now.",actuallesbians
Juggler,,actuallesbians
Potential First Girlfriend,"I started talking to this girl on Tinder a few weeks ago. I've met her before at parties but she's always been drunk and just seemed like one of those friendly drunk people. I thought nothing of it. School recently started and we've met up a few times. I don't want to get ahead of myself, but the time we've spent together so far has been great. She shares my sense of humor, weirdness, everything. At the same time, she's so incredibly confident and speaks her mind. She's so secure in herself and I feel her demeanor makes all the difference between being a girl and being a woman. 

&amp;#x200B;

We went to a party this past weekend and got pretty drunk/high. I'm still in the closet, but for the first time I didn't care. She held my hand, cupped my face, played with my hair, etc. and everything just felt so right. A lot happened that night and just multiplied how strong my feelings are for her. I got really nervous during sex (not at all confident in my ability to pleasure her. Still freaked out about it and don't know what to do) so she stopped and just held me. I hate admitting this, but I cried. I told her about still being in the closet and how it's not fair to her. About how I was too nervous to be intimate with her. About not feeling like I could ever come out. She just talked and held me until we fell asleep. Like I said, I don't want to get too ahead of myself...but I really feel like she's going to be my first girlfriend. Last night I asked her if I could take her to dinner, so we'll be going this afternoon. 

I never thought I'd be so excited to impress someone. I can't wait to do cute little stuff for her and take her out, etc. I feel like I have so much to offer and really want to show her that. It's so nice for someone to like you as much as you like them. I feel all gushy and it's uncharacteristic of me, but my heart's beating harder just writing this and thinking about how great she makes me feel. 

&amp;#x200B;

I really want to earn her love and respect these next few weeks. ",actuallesbians
Conflicting information,"I'm rather inexperienced with pretty much all things romance, including flirting. So, I've been watching videos online and asking around how people flirt. In doing this, I've gotten conflicting tips on one subject in particular. Asking whether or not you can kiss someone. Some people say that it's really good to ask, and others basically say that it's a turn off. I was hoping someone could help me clear this up?",actuallesbians
BFF or Girlfriend?,"Hi all, I need some advice!

So my best friend and I are both queer. We were out celebrating pride weekend with a main goal of meeting people and maybe getting out there and finding relationships, but no matter how we dressed or how hot we looked we weren't getting anyone to dance with. When we made friends over the weekend, we learned that we are essentially twatswatting each other because we look like a couple. 

She's my best friend but I don't want a relationship with her lol. How do we navigate still being able to go out together and also be able to pick up women? 

Thanks!",actuallesbians
Uhm... I just fell in love🙈,,actuallesbians
Even Sappho fell in love with a straight girl,,actuallesbians
"Strongly considering losing my virginity to a woman from Tinder, thoughts?","I’m a 25 year old girl who hasn’t had sex yet (I know...late bloomer). I have gone on dates and kissed a girl but the last time it progressed in the direction of sex I panicked.  I’ve been talking to a woman on tinder, she is 30 and in the same field of work as me, and honestly I really like her. 

The thing that sucks for me is I would love to go on real dates but she wants a private friends with benefits type arrangement. She is really patient and seems affectionate though which is good for me.

I have come a long way with my body image and I truly feel ready to have sex, which I couldn’t say for myself the last time I had the chance to have it. 

I guess I’m posting here because idk if I’m completely out of my mind for considering this? I feel like I should be more apprehensive than I am about the whole situation.  The plan is to meet for the first time under regular circumstances and take it slow, not just have a one night stand.  I’m mostly worried about developing feelings and having my heart broken.

Thoughts from anyone more experienced than me? ",actuallesbians
Any ideas on how to help her smile ...,"Hey guys, I have posted on here before about my own depression hitting pretty hard and just needed some venting - etc... I've come back this time because my lady is having a major bout of depression this time. 

Her sex drive has been slowing down for almost a year and I do blame the Mirena (hormonal IUD, originally placed to help make periods more scarce and less painful). She got it put in last September, and I'm 98% sure that's when our sex life slowed down. A lot. 

I've found a way to deal with my own feelings about her lack of interest in sex; but it's gotten so much worse. Now she is depressed enough, she only wants to sleep. 

I'm worried and struggling and trying to come up with some ideas to get her out of bed and proactive about it... But I'm also worried that if I put too much pressure on her, she will feel worse about not wanting to do things / not being able to. 

Does anyone have some ideas on small gestures or ideas that wouldn't be too much to ask? 

Normally, I would think of my own episodes and what I wouldn't mind doing ; but to be honest, I am almost always strong enough to do what is asked of me, if it is something *she* is asking... 

I dunno. I kind of think asking for ideas is crazy because nobody knows her or me well enough, but I don't know what to do and I'm struggling. I miss her, and she's right here beside me. ",actuallesbians
Dating is feeling like a huge bummer,"I'm just not finding anyone I connect with and haven't in a while. Keep going on dates with no chemistry, no spark or some chemistry but no future. Everything just feels like a big NOT GONNA WORK sign from the universe that makes me want to fold it in all-together. I literally can't even fathom how I would meet someone if I wasn't active in dating or on apps, people who run into their significant others in every day life BAFFLE me. 

Sweater weather is fast approaching and I refuse to be cold this winter by myself. Gonna adopt 6 dogs. That'll fix everything.",actuallesbians
Halo!,"I know this may not be appropriate and if not please just say and I'll happily take this down. 

I'm looking to make a friend, as I'm a lonely lesbian with no friends. I'm F15 and I live in Pembrokeshire West Wales. Anyone wanna be friends? 

I'm starting my second year of GCSE's and it would be nice to have someone to talk to.  I realise how weird this is,  but I'm just looking to make a friend as I'm a depressed, anxious, lonely lesbian. 

Anyway feel free to msg me anyway, if you need to get something off your chest or if you too would like to make a friend. 

If this isn't appropriate for this sub just tell me and I'll take it down. Thanks : )",actuallesbians
Asking Coworker to Lunch..,"How do you as a coworker to lunch without it being weird?

I started a new job about a month ago and I have a really cool coworker who’s been here 6-7months. I don’t talk to her on the regular. We work on the same project and occasionally interact when I have questions. I don’t sit anywhere near her to ask “casually” in passing. ",actuallesbians
Was trying to explain to my mom I wanted to wear a suit to a wedding,"Me: well it’s in late October so I don’t want to get cold. Plus I think I would look good in a nice blazer. 

Mom: well I’m wearing a long DRESS. If you’re going to wear a suit at least wear....a frilly top or something

I asked my future sister in law if me wearing a suit to her wedding would offend her and she said obviously no. My brother chimed in and said “our dress code is formal, not heteronormative!”

I love my brother. 

Any suit recommendations? I’m a newbie. Tall and athletic build with legs that go up to heaven!",actuallesbians
Looking for some advice,"So I started chatting with this girl on OkCupid. I'm 20 and she's 28 if that matters. We were both busy so it was kind of a one message every few days kind of thing, and she'd message again if I didn't reply within a day or two, and then she asked to move to texting and I agreed mostly because I didn't want to hurt her feelings. We met up for coffee yesterday and she seems nice but really clingy and also kind of pushy? Like she's already talking about meeting up again even though I told her I have a really busy week. I don't know if maybe I'm just not as interested as she is? I'm really new to dating, so I don't know if I'm doing something wrong--I figured out I'm gay pretty early (14/15) but I grew up in a homophobic religious environment (my household, churches, private schools, a lot of time in a small Bible belt town) and really internalized the whole ""if you can't pray away the gay, God wants you to be celibate/alone your entire life"" mentality. Just now working through that with a really great therapist at my college. Anyway, that's a bit of a tangent, sorry. I'm just looking for some advice from someone with more dating/relationship experience, I guess!",actuallesbians
Lesbian Youtubers,"Hey all! I want to subscribe to more lesbian Youtubers, who are your favourites?

(Also, I have started a Youtube channel with my girlfriend and i'd love it if you checked it out! ;) [https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC7DSt6rOzc5O1cl\_jKxVhYQ](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UC7DSt6rOzc5O1cl_jKxVhYQ)",actuallesbians
Had to share,,actuallesbians
Halsey Plz,,actuallesbians
Fairly new to the board and wanted to say hi!,"Hey fellow Raptors! I have been spending more and more time on the board and wanted to say hello and share a picture of me and the wife on our recent trip to Chicago (I'm on the right). I'm trying to get her on here too, but she doesn't have the Reddit addiction yet. 

[https://i.imgur.com/DdkWz8H.jpg]",actuallesbians
